/r/LifeProTips will be going dark from June 12-14 in protest against Reddit's API changes which will kill 3rd party apps.

		-- u/killHACKS, 53918 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT - As and adult if new friends invite you to something, say, "Yes."

When you're in school the "talent pool" for new friends is huge. Also, kids are doing fun things all the time. There will be another party, another gaming session, another thing to do next week.  When you're an adult there are maybe one or two people at the office you'd want to be friends with outside of work.

There will be a time that they invite you to a hockey game, concert, hike, or whatever and you're feeling like, "Meh, I like that thing but right now I feel like watching youtube."

Watching youtube is a mistake.  Say, "Yes" to the opportunity. By saying, "No" you are sending the message that you don't want to be invited next time.  They might invite you one more time or they might write you off immediately.  As an adult, these opportunities are more rare and if you want friends, you have to make the most of the chances to form a friendship when they happen.
		-- u/vanguard_anon, 42353 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT - Dogs cost roughly the same as financing a small car: an initial investment, and then monthly flea and heartworm meds, regular vet checkups (and the occasional emergency), and bags of expensive food...for many years. If your budget can't handle financing a small car, please don't get a dog.

		-- u/[deleted], 46054 upvotes, 0.57 ratio.
%
LPT - End of year raises - less than 5.4% is a pay CUT

More of a PSA than LPT but wasn’t sure where else to put it.

Edit: the LPT is be aware of the inflation rate when discussing raises with your boss. It is a strong negotiation point. One your boss can’t argue.

For those of you who have stayed with the same company through this pandemic or even just for the past year. End of year is fast approaching and it’s time for performance reviews  raises.

The inflation rate this year is 5.6%. This is very important for those of you working in corporations that like to put out flat 2% raises or cap raises at 3-4%. Companies adjust their prices regularly to account for inflation and should adjust pay as well but it’s not in their interest to do so. Many will try to use excuses that “be happy you got a whole 3% that’s more than most/I even got” or even “you got a whole 4% RAISE. That’s huge.”

But the fact is 5.4% is just to maintain. If you get less than a 5.4% raise you are getting a pay CUT and if you get a 5.4% “raise” they are just paying you the same as before. Your company may be struggling or needing to cut back and unable to give you more. But you do need to be aware that even if they are giving you a token “raise” it is a pay cut.

The practice of giving/accepting 2% flat raises is why people find coworkers getting hired for more than them after a few years. It’s because you have been accepting pay cuts every year.

Edit: my apologies the data I looked at didn’t was a month out of date the inflation rate is actually 6.2% as of October.

This is for US. Every country has its own inflation rates and rules around it.

Please refer to this site for running information on inflation.
[https://www.usinflationcalculator.com/inflation/current-inflation-rates/](https://www.usinflationcalculator.com/inflation/current-inflation-rates/)
		-- u/Zephyrs_rmg, 40068 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT - If learning a new language, try watching children's cartoons in that language. They speak slower, more clearly , and use simpler language than adult programming.

		-- u/neocamel, 38188 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT - If you get carsick or seasick, put an earplug or noise-canceling EarPod (create a seal) in ONE ear and wait two minutes. Reduces nausea by 75%+

No idea why this isn’t common knowledge. I saw it in a TV show and tried it with my fiancé and it worked! It is now our go-to and everyone we tell is baffled. Try for yourself and enjoy the ride.
		-- u/tylerlcatom, 48610 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT - If you need to wait until your boss is in a good mood to ask for something as simple as time off, you're in a toxic work environment and you need to take steps to exit sooner than later.

		-- u/CryptoBasicBrent, 67401 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT - If you offer someone a vice of some kind (alcohol, cookies, et al) over the holidays and they say no, drop it. The holiday season is the most difficult time of year for addicts.

		-- u/[deleted], 74709 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT - It takes 5 minutes a day and almost no cost to maintain dental hygiene. It takes a lifetime and a lot of money to correct it.

2 minute brush and mouthwash in the AM, 2 minute brush and floss in the PM. Doing these daily can prevent all sorts of decay and bacteria issues that would be extremely costly and time consuming to correct if left unchecked.
		-- u/leftonconnor, 41769 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT - It takes approximately three to six months to learn a new job. The two month mark is the worst though. The shine has worn off but you still don't know what you're doing.

And that's okay! You're learning the job and the culture. It is  perfectly okay if you have the "WTF have I DONE!?" conversation with  yourself. This is also the beginning of the turning point in your  knowledge. Give yourself some grace.

 

Edit: Thank you for the awards Kind Strangers! I’m glad this post was helpful to so many of you. 

The timeline I listed is very general -sometimes it’s less, sometimes it’s more. It’s based on my personal experience changing jobs, mentoring a ton of new-hires over decades, and conversations with other managers and HR people.

If nothing else, reading through these posts, remember that you’re not alone. I wish I could give all of you a hug, it sounds like a lot of us could use one (myself included!).

Breathe, learn, breathe some more. You got this.
		-- u/moose_tassels, 40901 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT - Learn about manipulative tactics and logical fallacies so that you can identify when someone is attempting to use them on you.

To get you started:

[Ethics of Manipulation](https://plato.stanford.edu/entries/ethics-manipulation/)

[Tactics of Manipulation](https://labs.la.utexas.edu/buss/files/2015/09/tactics_of_manipulation_1987_jpsp.pdf)

[Logical Fallacies in Argumentative Writing](https://owl.purdue.edu/owl/general_writing/academic_writing/logic_in_argumentative_writing/fallacies.html)

[15 Logical Fallacies](https://thebestschools.org/magazine/15-logical-fallacies-know/)

[20 Diversion Tactics of the Highly Manipulative](https://thoughtcatalog.com/shahida-arabi/2016/06/20-diversion-tactics-highly-manipulative-narcissists-sociopaths-and-psychopaths-use-to-silence-you/)

[Narcissistic Arguing](https://psychcentral.com/blog/psychology-self/2018/08/narcissist-arguing)

[3 Manipulation Tactics You Should Know About](https://medium.com/an-injustice/three-manipulation-tactics-you-should-know-about-2e4fa65dfede)

[How to Debate Like a Manipulative Bully](https://thepowermoves.com/ben-shapiro-debate-techniques/) — It is worth pointing out that once you understand these tactics those who use them start to sound like whiny, illogical, and unjustifiably confident asshats.

[10 Popular Manipulative Techniques  How to Fight Them](https://www.inc.com/jessica-stillman/10-popular-techniques-used-by-manipulators-and-how-to-fight-them.html)

[EthicalRealism’s Take on Manipulative Tactics](https://ethicalrealism.wordpress.com/2013/08/30/manipulative-tactics/)

Any time you feel yourself start to get regularly dumbstruck during any and every argument with a particular person, remind yourself of these unethical and pathetically desperate tactics to avoid manipulation via asshat.

Also, as someone commented, a related concept you should know about to have the above knowledge be even more effective is Cognitive Bias and the associated concept of Cognitive Dissonance:

[Cognitive Bias Masterclass](https://www.masterclass.com/articles/how-to-identify-cognitive-bias)

[Cognitive Dissonance](https://www.verywellmind.com/what-is-cognitive-dissonance-2795012)

[Cognitive Dissonance in Marketing](https://smallbusiness.chron.com/cognitive-dissonance-marketing-55693.html)

[Cognitive Dissonance in Real Life](https://www.everydayhealth.com/neurology/cognitive-dissonance/real-life-examples-how-we-react/)

[10 Cognitive Distortions](https://www.healthline.com/health/cognitive-distortions)

EDIT: Forgot a link.

EDIT: Added Cognitive Bias, Cognitive Dissonance, and Cognitive Distortion.

EDIT: Due to the number of comments that posed questions that relate to perception bias, I am adding these basic links to help everyone understand [fundamental attribution error](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fundamental_attribution_error)  and other [social perception biases](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Social_perception). I will make a new post with studies listed in this area another time, but [this one that relates to narcissism](http://www.columbia.edu/~da358/publications/ames_kammrath_mindreading.pdf) is highly relevant to my original train of thought when writing this post.
		-- u/pounceswithwolvs, 56041 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT - One of the most important questions you can ask in a debate/argument is, “What proof or evidence would it take to change your mind/opinion?” If they can’t give you an answer or if they refuse to accept the evidence that they asked for, then quit wasting your time arguing with that person.

Inspired by Neil deGrasse Tyson
		-- u/RellimCire, 67301 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT - Place your cat’s drinking water away from their food source. Instinctually, cats hunt away from their food source because evolution taught them prey can contaminate their water.

My 13 year old cats drink water all day long now that I’ve separated the two. After a few months of this, I got one of those fancy fountain style units too and they LOVE it. 

EDIT: As pointed out by u/Healing__Souls - cats hunt away from their water source as they know that carcasses can contaminate the water.

EDIT 2: As pointed out by u/Kidbeninn - excessive drinking can be a sign of heath issues such as kidney disease, if you think this is the case call your vet!
		-- u/paulyjm01, 37683 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT - Use the weekend to build the life you want, instead of trying to escape the life you have.

A lot of us work Mondays to Fridays and dump all the negativity and pressure from the week during the weekends by escaping reality. Some party. Some use substances. 

But this won't change your life in the long run. You're only living in a loop. To break the cycle slowly use the time in your weekend to build something new. 

Small habits are underestimated. 

For example.

* Reading 20 pages a day is 30 books per year.
* saving 10 dollars a day is 3.650 dollars per year.
* running 1 mile a day is 365 miles per year.
* becoming 1% better per day is 37 times better per year.

Try not to let the bigger picture intimidate you. Lay a brick each day to build a new life. And if that's too much. Try it during the weekends.

And remember this. This helps me personally a lot.

Support yourself instead of finding ways to shit on yourself. It's impossible to win if you're not on your own team.
		-- u/Bigger_ThanLife, 43762 upvotes, 0.71 ratio.
%
LPT - When a baby is unhappy we understand they’re probably missing something basic: food, water, sleep, warmth, etc. This is true of you, too. If you find yourself unexpectedly in a bad mood, chances are it’s a simple fix.

		-- u/RobertoBologna, 60411 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT - When sharing your opinion on subjective topics, music, movies, food, etc. There is no need to be hostile. The music doesn't suck, you just don't like it. The pizza topping isn't horrible, you just don't like it. People's opinions of you won't decline if you're just sharing your likes/dislikes

		-- u/[deleted], 73170 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT - When you're about to cry, think of words that rhyme or count backwards from 100 in sevens. Engaging the logic part of your brain shifts bloodflow away from your emotional centers and helps you maintain your composure.

I read this in the book "Moody Bitches" by Julie Holland, if that's relevant. 

Edit: I absolutely support people expressing emotion in healthy ways, and I encourage all people to cry when they need to, in whatever context. That's up to an individual person to decide. I just wanted to clarify that this advice is directed at people who have made the decision to hold off on crying until another time, for whatever personal reason, not to discourage people from crying.
		-- u/Mkelseyroberts, 51133 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT - take yourself out for "dates" every so often when you are younger (early 20s or 30s), and don't rely on your phone for company. It feels weird the first time, but after facing the fear of being alone in public you'll be surprised about how much confidence you have in different situations.

Edit: Thank you all so much for the love! I honestly did not think that this post would gain so much traction. So just to provide a response to some of the comments I saw:

Yes, this can be done at any age. I put for younger people because when I was in my early twenties I needed for someone to tell me this. After college I move 800 miles away from home and everyone I knew and started new. I told some of my family I started going out to eat alone and they told me that was sad and I shouldn't do that but I honestly enjoyed it. (For background I grew up on a farm in a very small town. No one did anything alone and just going out in town you were bound to run into someone you knew) 

It seems like for people who grew up in the city this is common practice but for many this is unheard of. So if you are someone who needed to hear this I'm glad I could help.
		-- u/cjk65916, 45175 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT - the best way to fix a bad sleeping pattern isn't by going to bed early, it's by getting up early

I'm one of those people who constantly find themself up at 5am watching some men build a swimming pool out of dirt. I used to try and fix my sleeping schedule by going to bed early the next day but obviously I couldn't sleep because I had slept late previous morning. It then took me several days and potentially and all-nighter to fix my sleeping pattern.

Recently, I've discovered that the best way to recover from this is by setting an alarm for the morning. Yes you may be a bit tired during the day, but it means you will fall asleep earlier that night and hey presto you are back to being awake in the day time.

Edit - thank you for the awards! I didnt expect my first big post to be about sleep deprivation but I guess it does make sense.
		-- u/mikeusslothus, 63239 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT - touch your puppy’s teeth and paws as much as possible early on, so they’re comfortable when it’s time to start brushing their teeth and trimming their nails

		-- u/jk72788, 56540 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT - when someone insults you during a meeting, pretend as if you did not hear them and ask them to repeat what they just said. They will either apologize or confirm their unprofessional behavior to the meeting audience - the latter can not be accepted.

Psychological safety makes or breaks teams. Aggressive language should therefore be avoided at all time and actively eliminated from corporate cultures. The tip above helps flagging that insults are not accepted in the workplace.
		-- u/Annual-Mode-1981, 64797 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT : As a manager, give praise in public and discipline in private.

		-- u/nerooooooo, 71257 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT : Dont't throw away annoying Silica gel little pockets, that come along with new electronic devices, shoes, or purses. Silica gel can prolong the life of anything that would be affected by excess moisture or condensation. Here's what you can use them for:

~  Throw them in your gym bag and you can prevent bacteria or mold from growing. It also gets rid of nasty odors.

~  Put some of these in your toolbox — they will keep your tools free of rust.

~  You can preserve your old photos and books using them.

~ For photographers: Put some pockets in camera bag 

~ Forget about rice, put a wet phone or other electronic devices in silica.

~ They can help keep your makeup bag fresh. Also put them in with your jewelry so it won't tarnish as quickly.

~ If you ever have to pack moist clothes, especially when you are on holiday, just put some of these packets into the luggage.

~  You’ll never have to wait for your windshield to clear up in the mornings again. Just put few silica sachets under your windshield. They will absorb the moisture, leaving your windshield clear.

~ Keep Dry Goods Dry -  it can help keep foods like dried herbs, bread crumbs, crackers, and anything else that should be kept as crispy as possible from getting soggy. So, you can put some silica gel bags in the food wardrobe

~ Keeps the razor blades-sharp edges from rusting and dulling very well.

**Silica gel is non-toxic, still they are not edible! Also make sure you keep it away from children and animals!**
		-- u/Beast667Neighbour, 51608 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT : Don’t wait around for others. Make your own plans and stick to them. Don’t be the person who never gets out just because nobody else can go with you.

		-- u/en16m4pro9, 55534 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT : Get yourself a safety razor, save $$ and save environment

I overlooked safety razors for 15 years thinking it to be a vintage tool. Recently delved into double edged safety razors for the first time and I am fully in love with it. They provide clean shave and to me it gives a lot better shave than premium cartridge type razors. Since you just need to change the metal blade, which is almost fully recyclable, you are saving the environment too. Safety razors are damn cheap. In my country Gillette Fusion Razors cost 200 times the price of safety razor blades.

Get yourself a safety razor, save the planet and save some $!
		-- u/sparrow-head, 38771 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT : If a small business goes above and beyond for you, especially if they gave you a discount, and you're going to leave them a nice reivew, don't give details of what they did or else others may expect the same treatment and you could hurt more than you help.

		-- u/drforrester-tvsfrank, 43425 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT : If you are asked to create an account in order to continue browsing a website, hit F12 and click on the dim area, this would select it and you can delete it with DEL key, hit F12 again and resume your browsing.

This only affects the display on your browser, but it's a simple way to bypass the infuriating "create an account" or GTFO situation on shitty websites when you just need quick info

Edit: Thanks for the gold!

There is some amazing tips in the comment section, it's not easy to edit them in on mobile, I'll mention the best ones once i'm home.

Edit 2 : Here are some other tips from the comment section that are IMO even better than mine

/u/reversedfate : In Chrome, press Ctrl+Shift+c, to instantly select elements.

/u/browndizzle and /u/Bloorim : I prefer to right click and say F*ck it. Glorious extension here:
https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/fck-overlays/ppedokobpbdajgiejhnjfbdjlgobcpkp

/u/DaughterEarth : Easier is to right click the offending bit, choose inspect element, hit delete, then escape

/u/lookatmemomnospans : Command+Shift+C For MAC users

/u/squidgod2000 : Behind the Overlay Chrome extension—very useful: 
https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/behindtheoverlay/ljipkdpcjbmhkdjjmbbaggebcednbbme
		-- u/_TuxedoCat_, 91668 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT : If you are hiking / running / walking with someone in a worse shape than you, let them lead the way.

I know this might not be the greatest life tip of all but this is something I realized over the last couple of days. By simply being there, these friends are motivated to get back in shape and make an effort. Going first and imposing a strong rhythm will make them feel terrible about their stamina or global physical aptitudes and have a deterrent effect that might stop them from coming again. Stay behind, walk at their pace, pause when they do and humor them if they feel tired. Acknowledge the difficulty of the effort (don’t overdo it). I feel like this can go a long way in keeping them motivated to work out and improve their overall stamina and physical shape.

Edit : thanks to all for the support, awards, personal stories and debates !
		-- u/FreddieDodd3661, 50524 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT : If you have little money to donate but wanted to give as much impact as you can, consider donating to third-world country scholarship. In my country, 50 USD could secure living cost of 1 student for an entire month.

For reference, in Indonesia, 450 USD covers engineering tuition for 1 semester. 1700 (or less) USD covers medical school tuition for 1 semester.one decent meal costs 0.6 USD.

 Living cost in Bangkok, Thailand is around 500 USD/month. Minimum wage in my country is ~150 USD/month. 

Of course, this is just to give you an idea how "little" amount of money can help people in developing countries. I'm not saying it's better to donate to poorer countries

.

Edit : wow turns out many people are excited about this LPT, check the comments, there are some donation recommendation from various countries. Dont forget to background check everything, don't get scammed ok. Good luck!

.

Edit 2 : what if... We create a subreddit to personally connect people that might REALLY need that extra 20 bucks a month? It would be similiar to r/language_exchange . No middle person, no corporation. DM me if you have ideas on how to do that effectively, with little-to-no chance of abuse

.

Edit 3 : [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/findareddit/comments/jj97yl/is_there_sub_that_connects_donator_and_receiver/?utm_medium=android_apputm_source=share) suggest that similiar sub already exist, but it's much broader. Do you think creating a sub for small 1 to 1 donation for academic purpose only is still needed?
		-- u/nicknameedan, 38870 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT : Start to enjoy being alone, learn to do things by yourself. You are going to miss out a lot of fun moments, if you keep waiting for someone else to join you.

		-- u/Beast667Neighbour, 40057 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT : You can easily retrieve unsaved closed documents on windows. Nice in private life, and can win some easy good points at work. Done by using the "roaming" file.

Hello,

For the small story, father lost hours of work by closing Excel file by mistake (angry and sad) found it back in a few minutes with this trick :

windows+R (windows key is windows icon bottom left of keybord)  
It opens a "Run" box  
Run : %appdata%  
It should open the roaming file.  
Open the microsoft file from roaming.  
Open excel (or Words or whatever "Office suit soft" depend on what you lost)  
Open the "whateverthename UNSAVED" file.

There you go, you didn't lose your last Xhours of work just by forgeting to save, or computer crash etc. Nor your coworker, or you manager.

I think it's worth sharing, not everyone knows the trick

Edit : Thanks to u/Tokenside that helped me edit this post for better clarity, english is not my langage and instruction are better thanks to him.
		-- u/SnooGoats4595, 39625 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT : stay away from *that* older guy

mainly directed to teen girls/ young adults (15-20 ish):
that older guy who thinks you're 'mature' is lying to you. he knows you're young and finds you vulnerable. stay away, there's a reason they don't go for girls their age.
disclaimer: once you're above the age of consent, its fine to sleep with those also above age. I'm on about very specific people who prey on teens or new adults who can't spot the red flags.
		-- u/viberson, 47481 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT Before getting a tattoo, make it your wallpaper first for at least a month.

You can assess how you feel about it over time, allowing you to make changes before finally getting it inked.
		-- u/vajranen, 42529 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT Do NOT pour hot or even warm water on your windshield to outsmart the storm and melt the frost/ice quickly. It will crack your windshield.

		-- u/HFIntegrale, 42321 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT Don't get overwhelmed by perfection or nice looking but arbitrary figures when shooting for goals. Do 17 pushups, save $138.93, read 1/3 of a chapter, but keep moving.

When approaching tasks, errands, projects, etc., somehow, my instinct is to throw the thought of doing it at all out the window, rather than do what's possible or even just easy. The thought of not having time to completely clean my room, may deter me from making my bed, which would go a long way to make the room clean, inspiring me to actually finish it. 

I have been trying to get back into the gym regularly too. When I do make the trip, especially if I haven't been in a while and my usual reps are hard to achieve to the point of not achieving my initial goal, I can still say to myself "Dammit, I went". 

That may sound a little pathetic and being content with mediocrity, but it's usually a step in the right direction far enough that I'll want to go the next day too. 

I've been putting away $75 a week for a few months. Times are tough right now, but instead of saying "Eh, I just won't invest this week" I'll put $25 away, even though it's miniscule. The value might change but the mindset does not. 

As dumb as it sounds, I say to myself "Something is something, and nothing is nothing." 

Because truly, doing something incompletely, is better than doing completely nothing.

Edit: I am truly humbled by everyone’s thoughts and feelings regarding my post. If one person takes one step closer toward their goals that makes me happier than I can put into words!
		-- u/Smoke1000Blunts, 61921 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT During times of war, inflation, people have been encouraged to build themselves a small garden. This lowers a family's cost of food during the war, and prevents shortages. Having a victory garden in 2022 could be a great idea for your home, even an apartment, to lower the rising cost of food.

[https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Victory\_garden](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Victory_garden)

You should start a small garden. Even if you live in an apartment, a small garden can help lower your food bill, and relieve stress on the nations food transportation chain.

If you live in an apartment, you still can have an indoor garden. You place it in front of a sunny window.

This year could spell food prices, that some people will have to decide, to eat or to pay bills. This can help you do both, and food that grows in the garden nourishes you and is healthy. So grab a pot, plant a tomato vine, and watch it grow so you can enjoy the fruits of your labor :)

Edit: many people are missing the word "shortages". This LPT prevents shortages, as well as lowering costs. I highly doubt any redditors lived thru the last depression and war, but let me tell you, the government set rations. Rations do not apply to your home grown garden (or apartment balcony). So if you had a garden, or have a garden, you allow yourself to eat as you wish. I hope none of us ever live thru that, but you should always be prepared.
		-- u/ChildlessTran2222, 46053 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT Hotel Pillow Trick

I travel a bit for work, and when I’m home I sleep best with a somewhat firm pillow that supports my head.  At most hotels the pillows are to be incredibly soft, and I feel like my head sinks almost all the way down. For me at least, it’s hard to sleep like this. I’d bring my own pillow, but they are usually too bulky for air travel.

So here’s my trick: I take one of the large bath towels, fold it to be about the same rectangular size as the pillow, and carefully tuck inside the pillow case with the pillow itself. If I do it right, it’s not lumpy at all but is completely flat inside. This adds a bit of firmness and prevents my head from sinking like a stone!

Anyway, it helps me, hopefully it’s useful for someone else…
		-- u/azrubicon, 56440 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT If a bee colony has set up a hive that you need removed, don't call the exterminator. Beekeepers will relocate the hive often for free. This is an easy way to be nice to the bees and to your wallet :)

		-- u/cool_much, 81887 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT If a company says, I can’t pay you too much now, but if you stick around you’ll be greatly rewarded…. Leave. They’ll just dangle it like a carrot if you want a promotion.

		-- u/Xcboots, 59455 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT If a place is "always hiring" there is a reason why and it has to do with a very high turnover rate.

That said, places that are hard to get into are generally better. For instance, I once looked into getting a job as a local firefighter. The fire chief shook his head and said, "No one ever quits. The pay is good, the benefits are great and the pension is even better. The only way anyone ever leaves is if they are fired, retires, and I haven't lost a firefighter yet."

The ones that are tough to get are the way to go, usually.

Edit: As some people have correctly pointed out, there are exceptions to this. For instance jobs requiring rare skills, jobs no one is really interested in, or businesses are need more people because their work volume keeps increasing.
		-- u/Sarchasm-Spelunker, 46418 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT If somebody comes to your door selling a home security system and asks if you have one, always say yes.

If they ask which company, tell them it's none of their business.

Many people looking for homes to rob will come to your door asking about security systems. It gives them a chance to case the home and look for weaknesses like if you don't have a dog or if the house is homed by women or the elderly.

Edit: Great advice from /u/OA27

&gt;Furthermore, document the encounter to the best of your ability. This is not the time you want to shoo someone away immiediately. Be comfortable being uncomfortable and without escalating the situation, ask as many questions as you can. Who are you with (even if they lie, they likely have told that lie before), contact numbers, etc. Did they come in a vehicle? Take the plates down, make, model, any damage to the vehicle. Which direction did they go in, did they talk to any neighbors.

		-- u/CleanFlow, 39900 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT If someone has an aging/elderly pet, don't ONLY talk about how old they are/how you can't believe they aren't dead yet. The owner dreads the day they have to say goodbye enough, and just wants other people to see their pet as pure and beautiful, as they'll see them until the end.

		-- u/BLACK_SHEPHERD, 55511 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT If you are a very talkative person, get in the habit of questioning what you gain by sharing information with the people you talk to. Sometimes knowing when not to talk is just as important as knowing what to say.

		-- u/[deleted], 81552 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT If you ever forget your WiFi password or you want to get your school WiFi password etc. Just type this command into the command line of a computer already connected to that WiFi: netsh wlan show profile WiFi-name key=clear

		-- u/[deleted], 103242 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT If you feel tired and want to sleep with kids in the house. Tell them to wake you up in about 30 minutes so we can start cleaning the house and they will do literally anything to avoid waking you up.

		-- u/eljuan1161, 95378 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT If you have to make a presentation in front of a group of people volunteer to be the first one up as everyone else will be so nervous about their own presentation that they won't pay attention to yours and will more than likely forget any mistake or stupid thing that you might do.

Forgot a comma.
EDIT: ATTENTION! I have received some messages referencing studies done on the primacy effects and recency effects that say that my LPT is scientifically entirely untrue. I will let you decide for yourselves however: 
https://www.polleverywhere.com/blog/how-to-structure-a-presentation/
I personally tend to hold the first speaker as the more dominant and would be more forgiving of any mistakes simply for the fact that they took the pressure off of the group. I also would, as I mentioned, be so nervous about my own that I wouldn't be paying much attention to anyone else's presentation until my time came up.  It has definitely been interesting to see both sides of the opinion though.
		-- u/swankyjerboa, 57568 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT If you lose your dog in unfamiliar terrain leave your coat overnight for the dog to find

If your dog takes off in a panic when they are in unfamiliar terrain it may take them a good while to stop panicking and running. By the time they calm down they may be completely lost. If you have to stop searching at night you should leave your coat or a blanket that smells like you/your home/your dog at the place you were last together. If the dog retraces its steps at night and finds a familiar item they will often just lie down on top of it. If you make sure you are back at first light in the morning you might find them there waiting for you.
		-- u/plantsheep, 61994 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT If you think someone has forgotten your name, skip the awkwardness and mention it in third person.

Last night someone I’ve volunteered with on-and-off for 2 years, I’m pretty sure forgot my name, so I worked into conversation said something like *“I have a tendency to leave things till the last minute, and my roommate is like ‘Alybank! Why are you like this?”* I could see the relief on the other persons face when I said it.
		-- u/Alybank, 54655 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT If you want to look for an indivual frame in a youtube video press "," or "." to skip backwards or forwards 1 frame

		-- u/[deleted], 54734 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT If you're planning on visiting San Francisco please for the love of God do not leave ANYTHING of even a vague resemblance of value in your car, or your windows will get smashed and you'll lose it.

I'm not talking about a laptop or a purse. I'm talking about a hoodie, a blanket, a travel mug, a USB cable, or heaven forbid a few coins in plain sight. Hell, even kids toys aren't safe.

Tinted windows are practically a guarantee your windows will get smashed. The biggest pain in the ass is getting the windows replaced, not necessarily whatever gets stolen.

Buddy of mine who used to live in lower Haight got his car windows smashed so often he decided to just leave them down one night. He woke up to find THREE homeless people sleeping in his car.
		-- u/[deleted], 97891 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT It's okay to admit when you are wrong, nobody will judge you. In fact most people will have more respect for you and see you as more humble and intelligent. If you keep pretending you are right even when it is obvious you are wrong you will end up looking arrogant and stupid.

		-- u/[deleted], 59340 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT Leaving the house at least once a day does wonders for fighting seasonal depressio.

Staying inside all day and not leaving just compounds your mental struggles. If you are an introvert and think this doesn’t apply to you, just going for a walk with headphones in helps your headspace immensely. No socializing required.
		-- u/deathsan1, 43957 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT Request: How does one work a 40hr a week job and not make it feel like it’s taking up all my time?

When I get home I just want to go to sleep and then I spend the whole day thinking about how I have to go to work the next day. It feels like it’s taking up all my time and energy. I know it’s only a regular full time job so maybe I just have to get used to it?
		-- u/matt2085, 46115 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT Request: Stimulus checks for the homeless.

I saw this as a post by Hamdia Ahmed on Twitter. She writes: 

"I was really upset that homeless people did not have access to the $1,400 stimulus check. 

"I just found this out. If you are homeless, you can go to a tax return office where they will file something called EIP return. They will put the money on a debit card after."

If you see or personally know someone homeless, let them know!
		-- u/theatremom2016, 59578 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT TIPS: What you should never to bring to a dry cleaners

I owned a dry cleaners for 5 years, and before that, used to work in one for 10 years, both front and back end. I know the whole process. I'm going to spill the secrets on garments you should never bring to a dry cleaners because you are being ripped off.

EDIT: Disclaimer: My experience in the business may not be necessarily reflective of ALL dry cleaners so take that into consideration.

DOWN JACKETS -  Down items are expensive. It could cost $40 to have a down coat cleaned. Down items have to be washed by themselves, lest they spill feathers onto other items, so that's why they're so expensive, to ensure profit from the isolated load. Down coats are rarely dry-cleaned, but laundered, and then hung to dry overnight, and then placed in a dryer for a few minutes to plump out the feathers, and good to go. Down items are not pressed. You could wash a down jacket yourself, hang it to dry, and get the same processing

COMFORTERS - Never bring a comforter to a dry cleaner unless it specifically says "dry-clean only."  Dry cleaner owners won't dry clean a comforter unless they have to, because it's cheaper to launder. Comforters can range from $39.99 or higher and you're getting less quality than you would at a laundromat. Comforters are rarely ever spotted for stains, and they're laundered in a basic commercial wash machine with a standard setting, hung to dry over night to save on drying time, then placed in the commercial dryer, and then finished. If your comforter had any bad odor before you brought it in, it probably is still going to have that odor. You're better off paying $5 at a laundromat, and choosing your own cycle and spin settings.

SPOT-CLEAN ONLY DRESSES - Many customers don't check or understand their care labels, and dry cleaners love that. Some formal dresses are "spot-clean only", which means, it can't be washed in the conventional way.  It might fancy sequins glued to the fabric, which dry cleaning will melt and damage the dress. Dry cleaning is oil-based and will melt glue and plastic. Dry cleaners may charge you up to $30-50 due to the fanciness of the dress, when they can't even clean it. They may go over the spots and individually spot and treat them, or, at best, hand wash the item by soaking it in cold water, and hang drying overnight, nothing you can't do at home. Again, with the fancy sequins, the item typically can't be pressed.

WEDDING DRESSES - Wedding dressed could cost up to $200 even though they are dry cleaned the same way as a $6 pair of pants, but, if you bring a wedding dress, NEVER opt for the preservation box. Dresses are more if you get the preservation box, which adds $50 or more to the cost - but dry cleaners DO NOT press wedding dresses that get placed in the box, which is typically there for an indefinite period. By the time the customers opens it 3 years later to notice it isn't pressed, it's too late to take back to the cleaners for a redo.  So you're paying more money for the dress WITHOUT the pressing. You get more for your money if you buy the preservation box elsewhere, and put it in there yourself after you get your dress cleaned and pressed.

LEATHER: Leather is the most expensive item to clean, around $50 for a coat, but dry cleaners rarely ever do leather on premises, but send it out to a third party leather cleaner. So you're paying more than what the dry cleaner pays to have it cleaned. Also, there is no special Leather dry cleaning method. Leather is simply lightly spot cleaned with a dish-soap leather formula and then hung to air dry in a moisture-free environment overnight. You're essentially just paying for the labor charge. To save money, you could lightly go over the jacket yourself with Dawn soap, water, and a microfiber towel.

WORTH IT:

MEN'S BUTTON-UP SHIRTS - Men's shirts only cost around $1.25-$2 a shirt, They're laundered by the bulk and then heat-pressed on their own machine in less than 20 seconds. Dry cleaners don't make their money off of this, so it's a great value to the customer.

WOOL PEACOATS - Wool peacoat are notorious for getting lint on them, and they're dry-clean only. Counter employees will often remove the lint by scraping and shaving the fabric so it looks much nicer at pick-up.

D/C Only items - suits, silk shirts, cashmere sweaters, etc.

Oil/grease spill - Dry cleaning is oil-based and will absorb oils on fabric such as food, yellow body perspiration, motor oil, that water can't get. If you get oil on your fabric, it's worth it to request dry cleaning at a dry cleaners. It's especially great for removing the yellow body oil stains around the armpit and collar areas.

Also want to add the benefit of opting for"press only."  Baseball/hockey jerseys cannot be dry-cleaned as it will melt the logos. They are laundered. However they do look nice when pressed. So you could save money by washing items like jerseys and Polo golf shirts yourself and then bringing them in for "press only" if its the pressing you like - and save a few euros off the price.

Bottom-line: To get the most of your money, if you drop something off at the dry cleaners, make sure it can benefit from the professional-grade pressing.  If your item cannot be pressed, you are often paying more for an item you could be doing yourself.
		-- u/BleedBluePunk, 47198 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT Temporarily homeless? Join a gym, most gyms right now are hurting and prices have dropped.

LPT I found out one of my students (college) was temporarily homeless and living in her car. She did have a part-time job and I convinced her to join the local gym ($15 per month) where she can not only work out but shower, use wifi, use a clean bathroom, and study while on the bikes. I also hooked her up with the college pantry as well as other pantries in the area. She graduated top of her class and to this day I still get letters of the utmost appreciation from her. Luckily her homelessness only lasted 3 months.

EDIT- Thank you everyone from the bottom of my heart for all the wonderful comments and awards. I also need to add that I didn't want to overstep my boundaries with the student-professor relationship so I bought the student a cart full of groceries, all non perishable, and toiletries. I had a friend of mine deliver it to her at the college. It was such a wonderful feeling to just help her get started.
		-- u/lambchopscout, 56083 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT Ubers are cheaper than DUIs, and funerals. Stay safe out there, happy New Year's.

If you plan to party, have a planned out ride or safe way to sleep it off.

I'm no saint, I've spent more than a few evenings sleeping in my car to sober up.

If you plan to ever sleep in your car, have a blanket and a few insulating jackets handy. Also, a beanie is great to block out the light and some noise.

When you wake up, drink water and get out of your car to walk around for a second to make sure your equilibrium has entirely returned. If it has, you can safely drive home.

**Edit: I don't support Uber or Lyft explicitly, i just want a safer New Years.**

Many are saying cabs can be cheaper on holidays, and considering these price surges from the ride sharing apps.. Uber and Lyft should instead be offering discounts, if anything, on nights like this.

That being said, please still tip well, it's your driver's holiday too.

It's also really endearing to hear about Coors' and AAA Insurance's free ride services for tonight. All these programs I'd be oblivious to without your comments. Thank you all, please take care.

**Edit 2:** For all those saying this post is common sense, yes, "don't drink and drive" is common sense. Although not common enough imo.

However, perciving the perspective that an even an $800 Lyft could cost less than a DUI, (I'm hoping) could possibly make at least one person think twice before deciding to write off the safer options of getting home tonight.
		-- u/WarProgenitor, 51671 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT Vet It Before You Spread It. Seriously folks, if a claim seems excessively preposterous or incendiary at least do a quick fact check on Google. The world will be a better place.

Edit: I figured this would get a bit if traction. It looks like I hit a nerve because there's a lot of updooting and commenting going on. A few bullets after reviewing many of the comments:

- Folks still have a sense of humor in a climate where it can be easily lost. Keep it up!
- Lots of concerns that this LPT is "preaching to the choir." I share those concerns.
- The goals of increasing the level of amity and honesty in the public sphere seem largely unattainable in light of how "they" consistently pervert and corrupt information.

I get it. This is too big an issue for us to address on our own. We are, however, not alone. So far it looks like at least 40k people kind of agree and nearly 1,000 care enough to comment. We are not alone. 

It gets tiring. I get frustrated when the same people do the same stupid shit. Lots of people (most?) will not change their behavior. However my hope when I respond by providing alternate sources is not necessarily that I will open op's mind to the glorious world of honesty. My hope is more that people watching the exchange will rethink their opinions. Lots of people follow conversations. Hopefully some of them will question the original post/comment. Shoot, they may even start researching on their own. 

I also feel some satisfaction when I see that my challenge to a post killed the thread. Minds may not have been changed, but at least I plugged one leak.
		-- u/ManosVanBoom, 49784 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT When someone shares something about themselves, don't interrupt with a relatable story about yourself. Just listen.

		-- u/jutepod, 70320 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT When your kids move out, tell them, if they meet any hardship, they are welcome to come back at any time. It's like a invisible security net that makes them feel more secure, knowing you have their back if something goes wrong.

		-- u/losacn, 47037 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT as you get older, do your best to get used to being taught things by people younger than you, respecting them for their knowledge. don't condescend because of their age or take it as a hit to your own ego.

I'm almost 30 it's getting to the point where I'm getting older and I'm still learning.

For example I'm taking voice lessons from someone who's about 10 years younger than me.

I remember how my parents acted when being taught something, or shown something, they would just write it off as something the "kids" can deal with, and unimportant.

I'm doing my best not to do this to other people as I grow up as it leaves the older person unable to function, and the younger person frustrated enough to want to jump through a window.
		-- u/embarrased_to_Ask_42, 82532 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT go for that run, no one is looking at you, dont overthink it, do it

		-- u/Northernirelandguy, 37131 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT if you have to give your email to a company, use the company’s name as your listed first name. That way if they sell your information to third parties, the spam emails will be auto-filled with the original company’s name instead of your own so you know who sold your info.

Obviously only do this with unimportant accounts and only if your name isn’t important for legal reasons, but I’ve done this for apps, conferences, demos, etc. Just recently I got spam email that said “Dear XYZ App Trial, don’t miss out in these deals!” - so I knew XYZ App sold the data.

Edit: To those asking what you can do, if a company sells your data without your permission you can file a formal complaint with the FTC here: https://www.consumer.ftc.gov/blog/2015/08/want-privacy-tell-us-about-it

2nd Edit: I've been made aware in the comments that others have had this idea and posted it to the sub before and that I'm an idiot. My apologies for not knowing that, I hope I didn't ruin anyone's evening too badly.
		-- u/Bbiron01, 56915 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT if you’re running even slightly late for work, text your boss and tell them.

They’ll text back and instinctively say “no problem,” you’ll instinctively calm down and drive like a sane human being, if you end up being on time, you’ve just exceeded expectations, and if you’re seen coming in late, you don’t look like a weasel trying to sneak in.
		-- u/aranhalaranja, 41734 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT we all know about CTRL + C, CTRL + V. But how about WIN + V instead of CTRL + V. It brings up the clippboard and lets you paste anything that has been copied previously. Super useful when copypasting different stuff multiple times.

		-- u/Twotificnick, 63991 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT you don’t always have to have a logical reason for saying “No.” “I’m not comfortable with that” is a really good reason.

I have a hard time saying no, and today I was asked to use my personal social media for work purposes. ex. Sharing communications to social media groups. 

The only times that I can comfortably say “no” is when I have a solid reason. I do not have the access... or I will be in a mandatory meeting at that time... 

But I had no reason other than I was very uncomfortable with it. So I politely told them that. They said okay, and we continued business as usual. 

I know that this LPT is not profound but it surprised me that it worked. I hope that it helps others by me sharing.
		-- u/LittleShyt, 48102 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT — Quickly find out whether a power outage is affecting your neighbors too by whipping out your phone and scanning for Wi-Fi networks. If there's a lot less networks than normal, your neighbors' power is probably out too.

Generally, no power = no router = no Wi-Fi = no fun.
		-- u/751assets, 37611 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT- Don't tell scammers that you have a Dash Cam.

If someone tries to scam you while you are driving a vehicle, do not inform the scammer that you have a dashcam. They will just leave the scene immediately. Instead, just call the police. Do not exchange insurance info without police present. When the police arrive, allow them to get a statement from the "victim." When they come to you for a statement, show them your dashcam footage. Falsifying a police statement is illegal, and they will not only be caught red handed scamming someone, but their charges will be more severe for falsifying a statement. Plus if they are in a vehicle when they tried to scam you, their insurance premiums will probably go through the roof. Remember, if they tried to scam you, they have tried to scam someone else, and are likely going to continue trying to scam others in the future. Let's stop allowing them to get away with it so easily.

Update: Lots of really good discussion. Plenty of people who think my LPT is crap, and that's fine! Happy to see people having good discussions and sharing their own experiences, and how/why this LPT might not be good advice for people in their areas. 

Also, lots of questions on what dashcam to purchase and how they work. I got a $45 dollar dashcam from Amazon. It had pretty good reviews, which is what I look for in a product. They come with a memory card, which stores the video as your drive. When the card gets full, it should automatically delete the oldest video's to fit the new videos. If an accident occurs, your pull the memory card and plug into your computer to save the video you want. The dashcam plugs into your vehicles cigarette lighter. As far as I know, no dashcam records multiple viewpoints. You will need to purchase more than one dashcam if you want front, rear, and side facing dashcams. Hopefully this helps to address some of the questions I have seen.

Update #2: someone says  dash cams that record multiple angles at once do exist. I didn’t know this, but great info! The commenter couldn’t remember the brand but I am sure someone can give more info.
		-- u/gargle-mayonaise, 59434 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT- Walking 3 miles will burn more calories than running 1 mile. It is easier to walk 3 miles while listing to a podcast, music, audiobook, etc.

		-- u/WhiteShadow3710, 57579 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT- You may not like being in pictures or taking them, but you will hate that you have no photos of some time period when you’re older. Take pictures even if it is out of your comfort zone occasionally, for your future self.

My wife has taken hundreds of pictures throughout our marriage and I only recently started. She has basically documented the whole time we’ve been together and I am extremely grateful for it. She has pictures from the day we met that we wouldn’t have if she didn’t snap a quick ‘for memories’ picture. You may hate the way you look, but years from now you will be glad you ignored that and took a photo. 

I also want to comment on the people who said ‘people didn’t always have technology’. That is a horrible excuse to not preserve memories. Because you’re too old fashioned? Cameras are a century and a half old at this point. You’re just being stubborn and pseudo ‘mystical’ to say you want to cherish the ‘spirit of the memories’ and never take a single picture. Lots of tech was lived without a long time ago but using it as a tool and not a crutch can bring us closer together as people and as a family.
		-- u/[deleted], 78437 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT. Never trust a call FROM your bank. Hang up and call them back at a number you know belongs to your bank.

Let me start by saying I'm not an* idiot. I usually can spot a scam. Today, I didn't. 
 
So I'm sure this has been said before in some shape, form, and/or fashion, but let me tell you how good these hackers are. Today I received a call from BBT. THE CALL CAME FROM BBT. From their* number I have personally called many times and have saved in my phone as BBT. It was their* fraud department and they wanted to let me know that there is suspicious activity on my account. A few minutes of verifying info and everything was cleared up. My account was locked and a new card was ordered. I was given a 1 time use login and password to re-setup my BBT online account and was told to allow 6-8 hours for everything to take effect.  Or so I thought. 
 
Within a few hours, I was wiped clean. $1.26 left in my bank. So I call BBT back to find out what's going on. I find out that I did not speak to BBT earlier today. I had instead been call spoofed by hackers and that I actually gave them all the info they needed (or better phrased, the last little bit of info they were looking for) to wipe my ass clean of all my money. I talked to the service guy for about 30mins. We hopefully have it official straighten out now. With my account actually locked and a legit new card on the way. There is a chance I may have to get a whole new account period. 
 
The one thing the service guy told me was that if I ever get a call from (my bank) to hang up and call back at a number I know is theirs. If it truly was them, they will know what the call was for. If they have no idea of any reason to call you, you were called by a hacker.
 
Edit: This has gained a massive amount of traction. I would like to thank this [comment](https://www.reddit.com/r/YouShouldKnow/comments/ejq9oy/ysk_to_never_trust_a_call_from_your_bank_always/fczynoa?utm_medium=android_apputm_source=share) for the idea to post it here. It has been interesting reading all the stories. Some with similar outcomes, some with way better outcomes. Either way, it has been a nice topic of discussion. 
 
If nothing else, I hope this post saves at least one other person from going through what I went through. 
 
Edit2: It seems in my slightly frazzled, yet still very amused, state last night, that I missed a few proof reading spots. I appreciate the red pen marks fellow redditors. Keep up the good work.
 .
 
.
 
.
 
**************Update*************************
 
. 
 
.
 
2 week edit. As it sits right now, the money has been refunded (minus an overdraft fee incurred during the event), new account has been made, new card has been received. 
 

 
To clear up some misconceptions, here's is some added info. 
 
1. BBT called me. It was not an unknown number. It was BBT's main contact number you can find on the back of your card. I usually do not answer the phone for anyone that isn't family. What led me to answer it that morning was that I had already received a fraud alert text from BBT about 5 mins before. Turns out, that was fake as well. BBT only uses one short code messaging system. 
 
2. I didn't give them any personal info. My SSN was not shared. My account number, routing number, or debit card number was not given out by me. They already had (almost) all the info they needed. My address, my telephone number on file, the email used for my account, the debit card "that was hacked". They used the info they had to tie my card to Google Pay. They only thing they needed was the code that got sent to my phone. Actually 2 codes. One to reset my password for the app, and one to add the card to Google Pay. He played it off that the first code had expired and had to send another one. He said the code was to "lock" the online account so that the fraud could be looked into. 
 
3. This LPT, like many others on here, is not accurate 100% of the time. They can and might call you. They should never make you verify your info. If you read the comments though, it is definitely a great practice if you get suspicious. Hang up and call from a different land line number or a cell phone. Read the comments for more info on the different land line stuff. 
 
4. The amount of money that was taken is kinda irrelevant. $1000 to me, is different then $1000 to you. Or to the guy living paycheck to paycheck. The part that matters is that it was everything I had at the moment. The spending money for a weekend date. Junk food for the kids while we are out on our date. Running money for 2 weeks. You get the idea. All gone. (Luckily, we had gift cards from Xmas and still got our date night.)
 
5. Lastly, thank you all for all the kind words and reassurances. It did all turn out fine in the end. Lesson was learned.
		-- u/zynemisis, 55688 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: "Anything you say can and will be used against you" also applies in everyday life. All the time, every time.

		-- u/arctic_fox05, 49986 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: "Do you know why I pulled you over?" Translates from cop speak as "Are you stupid enough to incriminate yourself for my benefit?"

		-- u/dafdfdffsads, 71223 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: "Do you know why I pulled you over?" Translates from cop speak as "Are you stupid enough to incriminate yourself for my benefit?"

Never answer this even if it is obvious. At best, you have just admitted guilt. A worse possibility is that you confess something else:

You:  "Because I didn't come to a complete stop / speeding / seatbelt?"

Cop:  "No, your tail light is out. But I'll write that down too."

Reddit, what is the best way to answer a question like this that may diffuse the situation and perhaps send you on your way without a ticket?

Edit:  Did not expect this post to generate so much emotion. For the record, I agree with those who encourage courtesy and politeness in dealing with any situation.

Edit 2:  In no way am I suggesting lying or dishonesty of any sort in encounters with law enforcement.  I think those who are recommending a polite, humorous response to this question have the right idea. 
		-- u/RutCry, 38753 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: "Instead of feeling that you've blown the day and thinking, "I'll get back on track tomorrow," try thinking of each day as a set of four quarters: morning, midday, afternoon, evening. If you blow one quarter, you get back on track for the next quarter. Fail small, not big." - Gretchen Rubin

		-- u/[deleted], 103742 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: "Off-brand" was a term created by branded companies to make their cheaper competitors look bad. Don't see cheaper alternatives as lower quality or knock-offs, see them as a competitor. Some often are better than the branded version but the marketing psychology stops you from seeing that.

		-- u/seanmashitoshi, 91011 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: "Who/whom" is the same as "he/him". If you use "who" in a sentence, mentally substitute "he". If you would say "him" instead, then "whom" is the correct pronoun in that case.

		-- u/AnomalousAvocado, 53811 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: 50% of a job is just being friendly to the right people.

A 'C+' worker becomes an 'A-' with the right attitude. Honestly, in many jobs you could practically skate by just being a delight to your co-workers. 
		-- u/ketoxin, 52789 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: A simple way to teach kids the difference between "good secrets" and "bad secrets" is that good secrets always have an end date (Christmas gift, surprise party, etc.) whereas bad secrets are told to be kept forever (sexual abuse, etc.).

Edit: Wow, I didn't expect such a response but that's awesome! So many clever ideas in the comments! Obviously there's no one-size-fits-all approach, but ultimately our goal is all the same; to get kids talking, however way we can. The greatest threat to a child molester is a child who spills the beans. Thanks all!
		-- u/WakeMeUpBeforeUCoco, 46143 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Act like your future self is a real person. So when you see a chore that needs to be done, you can say "I'll do this now to be nice to my future self". Helps motivate to get things done because you're doing work for someone you want to help.

		-- u/boibuster, 51061 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Actually follow the pre-interview instructions. Just had an interview that required me to watch a video that ended with "And remember, the keyword is 'pickle'". The first question they asked me was "whats the keyword?". Not everyone knows it, they said.

		-- u/Japan25, 37287 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Adopt an adult dog from a shelter if you want a companion but don't have time/ patience to train a puppy. They are already potty trained in most cases and love you all the same.

Plus there are a lot of them. It's a win win for every one involved.

Edit:  So as a few people pointed out,  adult dogs are not perfect and can come with some quirks.  Make sure you do your research and are fully prepared to take on the responsibility of a pet whether it's a puppy or an adult. 

Also,  check with the shelter staff about obedience training. They often know good schools or sometimes even do it in house. 

Please adopt responsibly.

Edit 2: Wow RIP my inbox. Thank you kindly for the golds and even a silver!  Im glad this LPT has reached so many people because that means so many people are more aware about the joy of adopting adult dogs from shelters, and it's also been great reading the comments about how people have adopted adult dogs and are so loving in their families.

Edit 3: Don't forget about cats!

Edit last:  Man I've loved seeing all the sweet stories of adoption in all the comments. And I've learned a lot from the not so sweet stories as well, they are a great balance to the rose tinted glasses as it were. 
Spread the love reddit! 🥰
		-- u/levelonesc, 58029 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Advice from my father… never be cheap and cut corners, when buying shoes or mattresses… if you’re not in one, you’re probably in the other.

		-- u/Brock_Rambone, 55879 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: After a bad break up, do 10 things that your ex would never do with you. You'll feel better and realize how much of yourself was being held back.

		-- u/[deleted], 84737 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: After a bad break up, do 10 things that your ex would never do with you. You'll feel better and realize how much of yourself was being held back.

I think this needs to be reminded.
		-- u/chaithzluci, 105183 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: After a miscarriage, do a few online searches for "where to buy cute dog clothes" so instead of being targeted with ads that remind you of your loss, you will be comforted by cats in tuxedos and puppies in panda costumes

One of the hardest parts can be waiting for your feed to catch up. Even with an ad blocker, some social media will offer painful reminders of what you just lost.  After all, it is a huge industry. A few quick searches in all engines for your favorite animal in cute outfits with a "where to buy" so the algorithm is sure to pay attention- and before you know it, you've got your own traveling source of aww. **Note: this works even if you're not grieving and just want a less horrible ad experience online.***

Edit: spelling of Aww :)

Edit 2: HOLY LORD. I went outside to garden and came in to this. 15k! Front page! I was so afraid to post publicly about this, and the fact that my first outreach touched so many people in any way is genuinely healing me right now. Thank you so much, Reddit. With that, I'm pretty sure mods deleted/locked the post because I mentioned another dog-related sub in my text.  I had read the rules before posting and didn't know it was wrong.  I'm sorry and it's been removed.  

...

Hopefully this can get back up, but it seems hilariously appropriate for me to make a technical error on my first viral post when so many of you have reminded me of the technical solution of ad blockers for my original issue.  To clarify: I do have one installed on my pc, but I am not very tech-savvy and ads still pop up here and there (especially on mobile which I use predominantly.)  I suppose I could have done a better job of troubleshooting the problem technically... but when I had this idea and tried it, I genuinely found happiness seeing ads for puppies in raincoats instead of non-stop babies.  I still appreciate the advice, and will keep learning how to be better at both Reddit and the internet in general :)

But mostly... if this does get re-posted and anyone reads this... *thank you.* I feel like something beautiful just came from the saddest few days of my life. I know it's just internet karma, and I know it's not "real."  But it *is* made up of *real people*. And you very real strangers made this girl feel a whole lot better today.
		-- u/TashInAwe, 49251 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: After any unpleasant event in your life you should always stop to ask: Did this happen to me or did I create it? It will help you either let go of guilt or take responsibility and grow as a person.

		-- u/SpotMama, 46393 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: After your wedding, ask the florist for a list of the flower in your spouse’s bouquet.

I did it and have been able to buy my wife flower arrangements with the same types of flowers that were in her wedding bouquet on special wedding anniversaries (e.g., 1st, 5th, 10th, the year we became parents, etc.).  I also keep a photo of the bouquet to show the florist.  She was so surprised the first time I did it.  It went over really well. She immediately recognized that all of the flowers had been in her bouquet.
		-- u/moxzil, 56918 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Allow people the freedom to change. If someone decides to modify their beliefs or behaviors in a positive way, refrain from pointing out their inconsistencies, being sarcastic, joking, or otherwise commenting.

If someone changes their mind and behaviors over time, it’s more likely a sign of correcting errors in premature decision-making or undoing bad habits. As life goes on, people gain more experience, perspective, and information to make better, well-informed decisions. Change is a sign of growth so it’s best to be supportive throughout that process.
		-- u/super_corndog, 65005 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Almost every Kidde Fire Extinguisher sold in the last 10 years has been recalled as defective. Please check your home and workplace fire extinguishers and replace them for free through the recall program.

		-- u/4Eights, 49890 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: Almost everyone who is 'good with money' shares a common trait: they make a detailed budget for the next month and stick to it. If you've never done so, tomorrow (the 31st) is a perfect day to start.

		-- u/[deleted], 55283 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: Always be nice and patient with customer service people. We have a lot of tools to help you, but we will conveniently forget them if you are rude.

First of all, you would assume that “being polite” wouldn’t need to be said, and we should all do it just as a standard practice. But if common decency isn't adequate motivation, just be aware that usually customer service people have a lot more options for providing different solutions, but we are very unlikely to engage them if somebody is snapping, raising their voice, or overall just being rude to us. I have both been a customer and I’ve worked in customer service, and I’ve seen both sides of this. If you’re nice, treat the person like an actual human being, and are patient and understanding, I’ve seen them bend over backward and I’ve truly saved hundreds if not thousands of dollars just by being nice. I’ve also spent additional hours and have gone well out of my way to support customers who treat me with dignity instead of assuming that I am below them or lesser than them for my customer service role. Sometimes there’s nothing we can do, but oftentimes we can do more than you might realize, but again we will conveniently “forget“ for somebody who treats us like shit.

**Edit to add:** All the people PMing me or commenting that I'm "bad at my job" for what I've outlined in this LPT, I never said I wouldn't do my job. I will do my job, and *only my job.* If a customer is reasonable and polite, I might find an extra coupon, expedite shipping, suggest an alternate solution to a problem. If they treat me like shit, I will do *exactly* my job and nothing else. Being shit on is not in the job description and y'all who say that we should be sugary sweet towards people yelling at us have clearly never worked in customer service and it shows.
		-- u/[deleted], 63399 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Always be prepared to leave your employer because they are prepared to leave you

		-- u/cheapseats91, 96933 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Always bring your own vehicle to family/friend gatherings so you can leave when you want to.

		-- u/akumamatata8080, 60409 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Always offer coffee to handymen who enter your house, you will get better, quicker service and fun conversations.

		-- u/Hondekut, 38956 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Always sign original documents in blue. That way there's never a question as to which document is the original and which is a copy.

		-- u/RobertoPetit, 50133 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Always take a video of your rental car before driving it. Just got a 900 USD bill for damages that were already on the car.

		-- u/FlippyFlippenstein, 47191 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Always talk well about people behind their back, especially at work

If you say good things about people behind their back, you come across as genuinely thinking these things and as a really positive person. It works in everyone’s favour and will boost your image! In my experience it’s helped me be more well-liked and fit in better in the workplace as well.
		-- u/szechk, 58174 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Always tell a child who is wearing a helmet how cool you think their helmet is. It will encourage them to always wear it in the future.

		-- u/mashingLumpkins, 135447 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Always tell your anesthesiologist if you smoke weed because it affects the amount of anesthetic you need to actually stay asleep! They do not care if you are breaking the law, they just need to know for dosage-sake.

Edit: this goes for really any drug. Tell your doctor. They won't dob you in, they just need to know to help you best.
		-- u/Winticles, 51140 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Amazon will be enabling a feature called sidewalk that will share your Wi-Fi and bandwidth with anyone with an Amazon device automatically. Stripping away your privacy and security of your home network!

This is an opt out system meaning it will be enabled by default. Not only does this pose a major security risk it also strips away privacy and uses up your bandwidth. Having a mesh network connecting to tons of IOT devices and allowing remote entry even when disconnected from WiFi is an absolutely terrible security practice and Amazon needs to be called out now!

In addition to this, you may have seen this post earlier. This is because the moderators of this subreddit are suposedly removing posts that speak about asmazon sidewalk negatively, with no explanation given.

How to opt out:
1) Open Alexa App.
2) Go to settings
3) Account Settings
4) Amazon Sidewalk
5) Turn it off

Edit: As far as i know, this is only in the US, so no need to worry if you are in other countries.
		-- u/[deleted], 67419 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Ambulance personnel don't care if you've done illegal drugs. They need to know what you've taken to stop you dying, not to rat you out to the police. You have patient clinician confidentiality.

This is a strange belief we get alot. It's lead to funny incidents of:

"I swear he's never taken anything"

"So that needle in his arm..."

"... It was just once!"

We don't care. Tell us immediately what you've taken. It's important so we don't accidentally kill you with medication. This includes Viagra which if we don't know you've taken it has a strong risk of killing you if we give another vasodilating medication.

Edit:

I write this as a UK worker. As many have pointed out sadly this is not necessarily the case in countries across the world. 

That being said. I still do believe it vital that you state drugs you have taken so a health care worker can support you properly.
		-- u/[deleted], 57105 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: An agrument is when you are trying to determine WHO is right, a conversation is when you are trying to determine WHAT is right.

In the business world we should all be having conversations, however in my experience this is very rarely the case, mostly it is arguments. So how do you change this? The first step is to point out the above. Ultimately this entire situation is caused by the ego, a universal variable most managers never take into account. Try to separate yourself from your idea and present it in a way that is purely beneficial to the company, if you do this enough times your ego will eventually be rewarded.

Edit: Agrument...I know...believe me when I say it is irritating me more than it could possibly irritate you :)
		-- u/Edenspawn, 50728 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Any job that requires a death certificate for time off to go to a funeral isn't worth staying at.

		-- u/Kithslayer, 67800 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Anytime you feel bad about not reaching out to a friend in a long time, just remember that they also havnt reached out in an equal amount of time.

		-- u/thirteenthdoor, 77263 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Anytime you think about contacting an ex or old crush, rub one out first

The post nut clarity is real, without the humiliation of getting said clarity after doing something you may regret the rest of your life
		-- u/WellThatsPrompting, 118575 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Anytime you’re doing a home repair or project, have your kids help you out. That way they learn about home systems, doing things on their own and saving money in the process.

It’s also a great way to bond with your kids. We inevitably joke about the repair that we are doing, like “what a stupid design“, or “There are 1001 other things I’d rather be doing”. You just have to find a way of making it fun or interesting.
		-- u/rigorousthinker, 41400 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Apologize to your children when required. Admitting when you are wrong is what teaches them to have integrity.

 There are a lot of parents with this philosophy of "What I say goes, I'm the boss , everyone bow down to me, I can do no wrong". 

 

Children learn by example, and they pick up on so many nuances, minutiae, and unspoken truths.

You aren't fooling them into thinking you're perfect by refusing to admit mistakes - you're teaching them that to apologize is shameful and should be avoided at all costs. You cannot treat a child one way and then expect them to comport themselves in the opposite manner.
		-- u/shotslagale, 53696 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Around 18 and having problems at home? Kicked out, running away, or abuse/neglect? The US funds a $300 million dollar Runaway and Homeless Youth Program with our taxes. Assistance could just be advice over the phone all the way to shelter, food, clothing, life skills, and housing help.

A state by state list is here: [https://www.acf.hhs.gov/fysb/grants/fysb-grantees](https://www.acf.hhs.gov/fysb/grants/fysb-grantees)Just click the state and then click Runaway and Homeless Youth in blue.

The real value of the places outside of the material support they provide is that they've been there! Wondering what happens if you runaway at 17 years old in a specific state when you're being neglected? They know! Did you just move to a new state and are considering reporting abuse by your parents but don't know what the foster care system looks like in you new state? They do! Can you open a bank account without a parent, etc. - they likely know! They also take calls from siblings, parents, extended family, kinship placements, child welfare workers, etc.

**There are 5 very important services funded by the RHY program.**

**Basic Center Program:** Shelter program which includes counseling, trauma-informed care, life skills, and other help. Usually for kids under 18, depends on the state.

**Maternity Group Home Program:** Shelter for youth with kids, must be between the ages of 16 and 22 to enter the program. Life skills, child development, parenting help, budgeting, nutrition, etc.

**Transitional Living Program:**  Must be between the ages of 16 and 22 to enter the program. Life skills, job help, nutrition, budgeting ,etc.

**Street Outreach Program:** My favorite program. Outreach workers meet youth where they are at on the streets, in parks, etc. These outreach workers adjust to whatever level of support you need- they could just drop off food and warm clothes or they could help you access emergency shelter and sign up for health insurance.

**National Runaway Safeline:**  1-800-RUNAWAY or [http://www.1800runaway.org/](http://www.1800runaway.org/). They were an actual switchboard back in the day that would allow kids to contact their families if they ran away. Now they have forums on their website where thousands of kids ask a ton of questions FROM ALL OVER THE WORLD about how to be safe. They work with Greyhound to provide bus trips home for runaway youth and also do a lot of outreach around issues concerning runaway and homeless youth.



In lieu of awards, please google your local youth/adult/domestic violence shelter and donate to them! Or start a group with your friends to help people out!

These are agencies in my area (Northern AZ) I fully support!

[https://northlandfamily.org/give-to-nfhc/](https://northlandfamily.org/give-to-nfhc/)

[https://flagshelter.org/](https://flagshelter.org/)
		-- u/redpatcher, 54180 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Artists, before you post your art online, crop the picture a little bit so if someone steals your work you will have the complete image as proof that it is your work

		-- u/[deleted], 52257 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: As a manager, give praise in public and give discipline in private.

In an old job in "Corporate America" I had a manager who would always share with employees encouragement and kind words of praise within earshot of other employees, and would offer words of critisicm and suggestions for improvement in private (in his office or a conference room). This set up an environment of positive reinforcement and gave employees respect and honesty they needed to perform at a higher level.

Edit: Good call by /u/slumdawg11b for pointing out that this applies to any leadership role, and /u/airforcefalco that it applies to parenting.

Edit 2: Lots of folks rightfully expressing that this is a catch-all method and knowing your employees' personally to effectively give praise and discipline is the best way to go.
		-- u/yardsandyards, 45998 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: As labor becomes scarce and inflation increases, you will never find yourself in a better position to increase your earning potential. Do not accept your first offer. Now is the time to negotiate HARD, because all of your future raises could be based on what you accept now.

		-- u/FastWalkingShortGuy, 43673 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: As soon as you check into a hotel, test out the shower before doing anything else. If there's a problem, it's better to change rooms immediately rather than finding out at an inconvenient time when you're tired, naked, and already unpacked.

		-- u/[deleted], 43597 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: As soon as you wake up, do a simple or small chore like making your bed or doing your dishes. Completing a simple task right when you wake up puts you in a more productive mood.

		-- u/_Zelko_, 40513 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: As we head into April 1st, please remember: A lie or deliberate misinformation is not an April fool's joke. Especially if it manipulates somebody's emotions.

Don't ask people on fake dates.

Don't tell them a family member died.

Don't make jokes about covid.

Don't pretend to fire somebody.

April fools jokes should be practical and, ideally, harmless or briefly shocking at worst.

Don't make somebody feel like shit so you can get a laugh.
		-- u/Xenton, 53333 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT: Ask yourself "what does it matter to me" the next time you find yourself judging someone for their clothing, interests or hobbies. The more you train yourself to not care about the personal preferences of other people, the more relaxed and nicer you become as a person.

		-- u/AshleyVille77, 95270 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Assume everyone in the comments is a 13 year old kid

This saves you a lot of anger. A lot of dumb comments or posts are just kids messing about. People take each comment so seriously and assume a full grown adult wrote them. So next time you are tempted to reply, you may be arguing with a 13 year old.
		-- u/DoctorImpressive5877, 40684 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: At 43 I accidentally discovered that if you add cold water to the bowl first, then the pancake mix, and let it sit a minute before whisking, you will get fluffier pancakes.

		-- u/spritepath, 51850 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: At a funeral or wake, don't say "I didn't know [deceased] had a [daughter/sister/other close relative]", say, "It's good to meet you" or "I'm sorry for your loss."

This happened to me many years ago but I was reminded of it by something else. At my father's funeral, a lot of people said they didn't know he had a daughter. Not terribly surprising; we were adults and he had moved to a different city, I was from his first marriage, and he wasn't terribly sociable so their social life revolved around his second wife, who didn't know me well. But it was still very invalidating and hurtful in that situation. The people saying it were innocent, but don't do this, folks - if you're the fifth person to say it, it sounds very much like "You weren't a very important person in their lives, they didn't even tell us about you."

*Edit:* Really surprised how controversial this has been. To me it seemed like a fit for LPT because (1) many people do say it at funerals (as shown by replies here), (2) many people do find it unintentionally hurtful (also shown by replies), (3) I assume most people do not go to funerals intending to be hurtful to family of the deceased, and (4) it's well known that people don't know what to say at a funeral so having a canned phrase at the ready as a substitute is useful, even if it isn't the best phrase ever, because that makes it less likely that you'll flounder and use the hurtful one. Plenty of commenters have given better options than "Sorry for your loss;" just choose something inoffensive and have it up your sleeve when you need it.
		-- u/deejay1974, 40234 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: At the end of the April fools joke the pranked person should be laughing too.

		-- u/AnimalChin-, 59754 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Be careful about how much you share at work. Don't tell your coworkers anything you're not comfortable with the whole workplace knowing. Expect that anything you say is going to be repeated. Also if your coworkers talk trash about other coworkers, that includes you as well.

		-- u/devilenka, 47294 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Be careful not to let your guard down in conversations with figures of authority when the conversation is informal, friendly, and non-accusatory.

Thank you for the gold and silver.
		-- u/argtri, 54206 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Be careful when badmouthing and gossiping about colleagues at work, because colleagues are not friends and walls have ears.

You might also need them in the future.
		-- u/Joshi9i, 73332 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Be careful who you vent to in work. Just because they listen, it doesn't mean that they're your friend or have your best interests at heart.

		-- u/SweepyDinosaur, 86832 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Be cautious of turning a hobby into a business. Being financially obligated to do anything for a living can really suck the joy out of it.

Hobbies are great in part because you can do them when you feel like it. What’s fun on occasion may not be fun for forty hours a week. Even worse, you may find yourself unable to enjoy the same hobby in your free time, robbing you of a source of entertainment.

That’s not to say it can’t work. Lots of people turn hobbies into jobs and still love it. But before you try it, ask yourself if you would want to cook for yourself after being a chef all day long and see how it sits with you (replace cooking with whatever you enjoy).
		-- u/Procrastin8rPro, 38043 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Be mindful of poorer friends when suggesting splitting the bill equally in a restaurant. Some people will choose cheaper options because they're on a budget

I don't earn a lot of money and get major anxiety if anyone in my friendship group suggests going to a restaurant. Last week, I drank tap water and ordered cheap food (I'm veggie so my meals are usually cheaper anyway, but I did fancy a few beers) because I knew I only had a certain amount of money in my bank, while my friends ordered whatever they wanted, including multiple alcoholic drinks, spending nearly double what I was spending. When the bill came, nobody noticed my discomfort (I tried dropping hints!) and I ended up having to split the bill equally. To them it was probably a few quid, no biggie, ("it all balances out eventually"), but it absolutely ruined my evening as my card was declined in front of everyone

EDIT: I should have said, my close friends know that I'm skint (I talk about it openly), just maybe didn't realise how dire the situation was at that moment. But when it's a large group with lots of friends and their partners who you don't know very well it can be humiliating to draw attention to it in front of a table of people. I know *technically* it solves the problem to announce to everyone that you'll only be paying for what you personally consumed and no more, but it's nicer for someone to notice: "XX didn't have drinks or a dessert, shall we all just pay for what we had?"
		-- u/grabb3r, 37962 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Be mindful of poorer friends when suggesting splitting the bill equally in a restaurant. Some people will choose cheaper options because they're on a budget.

		-- u/Hopeful_Cold3769, 68932 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Be skeptical of products that say "Clinically proven". That is a marketing term and only says they've done their own private study that is designed to show the result the company wants. It is not the same as a "Scientifically proven" study which is published and open for peer review.

		-- u/throwitaway0192837, 64212 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Before Proposing To A Girl, Go Find An Excuse For Her To Get Her Nails Done Beforehand

When she wants to send photos of the ring to friends and family or post it to social media, she'll be thankful that her nails look the best possible that they can before sharing such an up-close photo of her hand.
		-- u/nurturingtrapdoor, 38706 upvotes, 0.76 ratio.
%
LPT: Before ending a serious relationship, change 100% of all of your Passwords and remove your account info / auto login on ALL devices

I'm in the midst of hiring which is no small thing in this COVID world.  I had one applicant who stood head and shoulders above the rest, she was exactly what my org was looking for.  

Unfortunately, during the interview process she informed us via email she was no longer interested in the opportunity.  So, we moved on to our 2nd pick candidate.

Fast Forward 2 weeks.  I get a call from the applicant wondering if we had found someone and expressing interest in the job...  I told her that she said she wasn't interested and I showed her the email she sent us.  Apparently, she didn't send the email.  

She had recently broken up with her boyfriend during her applying for this job and he "hacked" into all her accounts and fucked her life up.  He deleted all of her social media and also sent us a false email saying she was no longer interested in the job.

Unfortunately, we hired someone so that opportunity is lost to her forever.

If you are in serious relationship then your partner has all of your passwords.  They do.  It is ridiculously easy to get someone's passwords if you have access to their phone or computer.  It is to your advantage to just assume someone you are serious with has all your passwords.  BEfore you break up with them you need to change all, yes ALL, of your passwords.  

It is amazing how evil and vindictive people can be when they are heartbroken.  Even so-called "nice" people can have a moment of temporary insanity after a break up and torch your whole life if they have the chance.  

Don't give them that chance.  Change your passwords
		-- u/harrysapien, 76253 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Before fingering a woman, check your nails by scraping them against the inside of your cheek. If you can feel the nail scratching, its not good enough.

		-- u/ChrisTaliaferro, 66723 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Before purchasing anything on Amazon, use fakespot.com to have their engine analyze fake or counterfeit reviews.

I was watching Pleasant Green's youtube video [Can You Really Get Paid to do Amazon Reviews?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3YjEdaU1xTc) and noticed he used Fakespot.com to check for fake or counterfeit reviews. In addition, the website gives the seller a grade (A-F) and their Fakespot Adjusted Rating (0-5 stars). Their overview includes how many reviews were altered, modified, removed by amazon. I thought it would be beneficial for everyone who buys from Amazon.
		-- u/dogdrinkincoffee, 66043 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Before telling your landlord you're moving, ask them to fix anything broken that you're worried you might get charged for. They often will, and then when you move out they won't be able to take it out of your security deposit.

		-- u/Complaingeleno, 51636 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Before traveling anywhere, always download an offline map of the area. It will save you a ton of nerves in case the wi-fi is weak or you can’t buy local SIM on the airport or upfront.

Also, buying an e-sim card upfront is always the best option.
		-- u/milosfon, 54393 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Before you all go and sign up for Apples new workout subscription service, the Nike Training Club (NTC) app made all of their workout programs completely free and they work flawlessly with Apple Watch

Edit: as far as I am aware, it’s will be free for the rest of its existence. It’s also available on android as well

Edit #2:Thank you all so much for all the awards. I honestly don’t know why the post is still getting them. Please, save your coins to make a smaller post feel special. Spread the love MrBeast style

Also for those who think this is, it is not a sponsored post. I’m just a guy who uses the app. I don’t even wear Nike shoes lol. 

Glad I could help some people save money and get started on their own fitness journeys. Have a great weekend :)
		-- u/[deleted], 45968 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Before you drop off your car for service, take a photo of the odometer.

I took my car to what I was told was a reputable service center.  I had taken a photo of the odometer as I dropped it off.
When I picked it up there were 300+ kms on it.
Turns out someone had taken it for quite a joy ride.
My husband told me to do this always.  Turns out it was good advice.

EDIT:  Wow thanks for the upvotes but mostly thanks for your amazing stories.  Crazy.
		-- u/TinktheChi, 49130 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Before you ever travel or go on vacation, pick an album you've never heard before and try to listen mostly to it during the duration of your trip. This way, whenever you listen to those songs again, you're instantly reminded of your vacation and it makes the memories so much more vivid.

Bonus: Try to match the album you listen to with the vacation you're taking. An album full of summer songs for your road trip to the beach, for example. A couple of years ago, I listened almost exclusively to *[ye](https://pyxis.nymag.com/v1/imgs/699/1e2/965287137d49b3f29e6ff9c4d0e5a3f07b-01-kanye-west-ye.rsquare.w1200.jpg)* by Kanye West when I took my trip to Yellowstone and the [Tetons](https://www.nps.gov/grte/planyourvisit/images/adams_1.jpg?maxwidth=1200maxheight=1200autorotate=false) and that album still reminds me of the memories I made there.
		-- u/JFKontheKnoll, 38439 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Before you get married, have in-depth, planning discussions around: kids, money, housing, vacations, current debt, retirement, day to day expectations, pets, in-laws, transportation, and careers...don't assume anything. Ask the questions, ensure you are on the same page.

Edit: My first gold and oh, so many awards...you are too kind. I am trying to read everything. 

Since many are mentioning it...this is not meant to be a written contract. Life changes people, couples need to change with it. Some couples are great with communication and do it organically. Others may not think to ask...and learn there are major differences when it is too late. This tip is simply to ensure communication starts early and hits on all topics (some you may not even realize are issues till you start talking about them), and to set a path for continued communication through the years. Take care of each other and yourself!

Edit 2: A number of people have mentioned it, and /dead_b4_quarantine called me out on it...Let's talk about SEX, baby.....Let's talk about you and me....Let's talk about all the good things....And the bad things that may be....
		-- u/tidblgr10, 80343 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Before you give your child a unique name, try it out first. Use it on food orders, reservations, appointments where applicable, etc. It’ll give you a glimpse of what they’ll deal with when they’re older and could prevent future issues.

		-- u/7evenSlots, 61460 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Behave at a work party as if you were at work. Don't let the word 'party' fool you.

		-- u/seanmashitoshi, 38597 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Beware - Peak hunting time for work bullies is when you are starting a new job. Naturally on day 1 you won't be as good as your colleagues or as you were in the last job and they will exploit this vulnerability to target your confidence. Remember to show confidence, ask qstn.  do not apologize

It's natural to take a few weeks to months to get accustomed to a new role or job. Work bullies might prey in these initial weeks. They will try to tarnish your image in the team and destroy your self-esteem to enable them in exploiting you. It is also more common for senior co-workers who exploit their positions of power to show such behavior.

How to tackle this:

1. Best way is to show confidence when you are sensing such a behavior. DO NOT APOLOGIZE unnecessarily. Instead try saying "Oh so this is how it's done, no one told me this. Thanks for highlighting it, is there anything I should keep in mind?
2. Ask questions from start, be vocal. Do not let the bully think they can talk over you and shut you down.
3. These are hard things to do, some bullies are too manipulative and will corner you down. Seek mentors/colleagues at work who believe in you and build you up.

If you are someone actively being bullied:-

1. I am so sorry you are going through this. It is really hard when someone exploits you at your weakest.
2. Seek out your friends and tell them what is happening and how you feel. Sharing helps.
3. You might have to work on building your confidence for long term, but the best immediate option is to start over or a new job. Such toxic work cultures are not worth your time. If you are still stuck there and cannot because of monetary or other reasons, remember to remind yourself of your achievements and how far you have come, do not let these bullies make a dent on your self-worth, because that's what they prey upon.

There are people out there who are proud of you seek them. But the proudest has to be you :)

**Edit1**. I see a lot of people commenting how this is a school thing and are surprised by the term work bully. I know bullying is a big topic in schools in USA, but anyone can turn into a bully. It's the sudden access to a position of power that makes them a bully and corrupts their basic decision making skills. **Example**: A Supreme leader of a country in asia, just cause he is a president he believes that whatever thought that comes to his mind is truth by the god, but anyone can be a president(at least a lot of people) it does not make you special, or messiah of god himself and you should not exploit this position of power. I hope these insights helps you in understand this issue better.

**Edit2**. I also want to highlight if you feel baffled on how this still happens, maybe you are part of privileged group where people respect you just cause you look a certain way or are from a certain gender(Hint: most of the industries are male dominated with gender biases). Not everyone is blessed with a safe upbringing where they build up a rock solid confidence and have an amazing support structure. I hope these insights helps you in understand this issue better.
		-- u/bongsfordingdongs, 37682 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Billionaires like to rewrite their origin story to amplify their achievements against a backdrop of adversity that didn't really exist. Take their life advice with a pinch of salt: it probably won't work for you.

'Mark Cuban says this one small change gave him the motivation to succeed'

Edit: permaban from r/wallstreetbets since this post went crazy lmao
		-- u/m77w, 79081 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Birds can give you a lot of useful information just by listening to them.

As I'm listening to the birds, I realize not a lot of people know this. You can tell a lot about weather and other animals just by listening to birds. I'm not sure how city birds such as pigeons work with this tip, so let me know! A few things you can tell are:

1. Birds go CRAZY when there is a snake nearby. I don't mean like mating season crazy, I mean constantly screaming and sometimes dive-bombing the actual snake. Use this to locate the snake and keep yourself or your family safe.

2. Birds 'go to sleep' when rain is coming and stay quiet in their nests. 

3. If it is raining and the birds are still loud outside, the rain is going to continue for a long time (8-10+ hours). They're basically panicking and trying to solve the problem of running out of food soon.
		-- u/[deleted], 89347 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Bring a 24-hour survival kit on even the shortest hike

**TL;DR: Short hikes are dangerous because people go into them without gear and preparation to fall back on if things go bad. Make a 24-hour survival kit out of an old water bottle and always throw it into your backpack on even the shortest day-hikes.**

Short hikes are the most dangerous, for one simple reason: people underestimate them and thus go into them without gear and preparation to rely on if things go bad.

The recent (happy) story of a woman who was rescued after 17 days lost in the Hawaii jungle is illustrative of countless similar stories of even experienced hikers going on short, "fun" day hikes, getting turned around/injured, and then getting thoroughly lost - without the water, food, gear, maps, and preparation they'd have on a longer trail.

She survived, but she easily could have died. *On a 3-mile trail that she'd hiked before.*

I myself am a veteran hiker and backpacker. The only time I've ever gotten lost was on a ridiculously short and easy day hike. I got turned around, night fell, etc. etc. It really can happen to just about anyone. I got myself out, but it wasn't a sure thing.

And now, with the popularity of parks exploding, I see more and more people going onto trails absolutely unprepared for anything other than balmy, kind, daylight conditions. Thin cotton clothes, maybe one water bottle, flimsy urban footwear, no map/compass/understanding of the topography. If anything happens, these people are absolutely hooped.

So: never go unprepared. Get a wide-mouth Nalgene bottle and stuff it with some/all of the following (in generally descending order of importance). Just toss it into your day pack alongside your water and you'll at least have some basic essentials if things go bad.

The things I have in mine include:

\- Survival heating blanket

\- Plastic sheet to use as shelter

\- Whistle

\- Flashlight/headlamp, with extra batteries

\- Lighters/matches (don't melt the sheet/blanket, though!)

\- Critical meds and bandages

\- Zip ties (these things have countless uses)

\- Flagging tape (bright color - use it to mark your course so you can backtrack if unsure, and/or to alert rescuers)

\- Compass (if you're able to use it)

\- Paracord

\- Knife

\- Duct tape (same as zip ties - countless uses; you can just wrap a bunch around the water bottle and pull off as necessary)

\- Hand warmers if you're in temperate/colder areas, even in the summer (I always put this right at the top of my kit, so it's the first thing I can grab - when you're really cold, your hands can stop working, so you need to get them working to do anything else to save yourself - I've experienced this first-hand).

\- Iodine tabs for water

\- Beef jerky

\- Energy gel

**Edit:** Because it may be of interest: I just weighed it at 754 g - and that's with some additional stuff that I don't mention in the list. For reference, a liter of water (without a bottle) is 1 kg.

**Edit 2:** I wrote this for people who regularly go on short hikes without *any* first aid/survival stuff. The kit I describe is absolutely bare-bones and does not replace knowledge, preparation, and/or better gear. 

The kit I mention shouldn't give you any additional confidence and certainly shouldn't encourage additional risk-taking - it's a last-resort fallback that is better than nothing at all.

For people wanting to see the kit I made, or skeptical it can be done - just google Nalgene survival kit. Lots of people put a lot more time and thought into this than I have, and have kits that are a lot prettier than mine. 

Definitely tailor your kit to your area, too.

Finally: as always, the most important things to have are proper clothing, footwear, water, knowledge of the area, knowledge of what risks your area poses (e.g., hypothermia at night, heat stroke, etc), ability to read the weather, and the knowledge and skills to help yourself and others if things go bad. *This kit will not make up for deficits in those areas.*
		-- u/[deleted], 40034 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Buy a small bottle of perfume you have never tried on before going for a vacation and use it for while you're there. At any point after your vacation, you get a sniff of it, it brings back those memories instantly.

Because scents are among the most powerful memory triggers. 
		-- u/[deleted], 42867 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Buy yourself a good pillow. You use it every night and the difference between a good pillow and a stack of cheap ones is almost immediately noticeable.

		-- u/Punslanger, 50616 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Buying a luxury car isn't the expensive part, maintaining it is.

I worked in the auto industry for several years and this is something I feel is important for people to know.  Everyone wants a luxury car and buying them used isn't usually too bad, but when they break and it comes time to fix it; what would normally cost $200 on a Honda is $1,200 on a BMW.

Be mindful of the repair costs on a car before you buy them.
		-- u/mmm-pistol-whip, 58208 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Buying good quality stuff pre-owned rather than bad quality stuff new makes a lot of sense if you’re on a budget.

This especially applies to durables like speakers, vehicles, housing, etc.
		-- u/observantwallflower, 69490 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Check on your friends who just had a baby. Ask if they need company, or anything, really. Keep calling them to social events, even if they are unable to attend for a good few months. Their routine has abruptly changed, hence most "friends" just vanish.

This is special if it is their first child and they are still learning how this whole new thing of how parenting works, if they live far from family and good safety net, etc.

Coming from a new dad who now feels left out...

Edit: whoa, this has really blown up! I didn't mean to start such a controversy. This isn't about the new kids, new lifestyle that will unfold. Most parents go through a storm and many important aspects of their lives are neglected, friendships bring one of them. My point is: reach out your OG friends, reassure, be near if they need, because they might suddenly be the weakest link for a little while.
		-- u/[deleted], 43115 upvotes, 0.76 ratio.
%
LPT: Children can understand a lot more than you realize. Discuss large and significant topics with them in everyday, simple language. They'll have many questions so always try to answer them as good as you can. Let them learn new things and expand their vocabulary - it will make them feel special.

		-- u/Ewaldd, 65465 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Children's Hospitals do not need donations of stuffed animals. Try hard plastic toys featuring popular characters, craft supplies, board games, and coloring books.

Source: I'm on playroom staff at the local children's hospital. 

Stuffed animals are an infection risk and often not allowed if they are not brand new. Even if they are brand new, they are not allowed in our playroom. Other staff seems to find some use for them, but ultimately there are many higher need toys and games. Teen items like adult coloring books, video games, and craft supplies are always appreciated. 
		-- u/laura_coop_hast, 38545 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Choose your words and temperament carefully toward your kids. When you get older and mellow out, the things you said to them back then will still affect your relationship for life.

Edit: Thank you all for the awards, upvotes and comments!
		-- u/RoseyPosey30, 46548 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: College isn't the only way to start a good career. Apprenticeships, Trade Schools, and Military Training can be great alternatives in today's world.

The price of four-year universities in the US, among other countries, is huge and growing. There are many situations where the degree is worth the cost, but not for everyone. Obviously if you wish to be a doctor or lawyer, a college degree is inevitable.

If, however, your desired path isn't so rigidly grounded in universities, or you just aren't sure what you'd like to do, take some time to think about alternatives before applying to colleges.

**To high school juniors and seniors:** 

Your parents/guardians might be pressuring you to go straight to college because that was practically a guarantee for a good life in their time, but things are different today. If you're going to broach this subject with them, get your sources ready ahead of time. [Here](https://www.thesimpledollar.com/why-you-should-consider-trade-school-instead-of-college/) is a good overview, but you should find other data, analyses, and opinions before fighting that battle.

**Why are skilled trades more relevant now?**

These jobs have been around for a long time, but baby boomers have been over-represented for decades. As that generation retires, demand for skilled trades will be a lot higher than it was twenty years ago. According to [this article](http://www.careerprofiles.info/skilled-trade-worker-shortage.html), 53% of skilled tradespeople are over the age of 45. Anecdotally, I work in an industrial setting with a lot of tradespeople, and almost all the hair here is grey. 

**Is there any money in it?**

There definitely can be. Unlike some college-bound fields, you won't likely be making six figures right out the gate, if ever. That doesn't necessarily mean you'll be worse off. Assuming you go the apprenticeship or military routes, you can be making money the day you start, and won't have any crippling debt to deal with. I'd recommend reading up on personal finance for more details on the matter, but if you start contributing to your retirement at 18, even with less income, you could certainly retire with more money than someone who had a higher income, but couldn't contribute until [_ years to complete degree + _ years to pay off debt] later. 

That's assuming the college grad can get a job right away. There are plenty of highly educated baristas and retail workers in this country who may never be able to retire thanks to student loan debt. Moreover, one can't get rid of student debt by filing bankruptcy. You're stuck with any loans you take for school.

**What are my options?**

There are a ton of ways to start a career, but I'll talk about a few.

**Apprenticeships** are a great way for experienced tradespeople to pass their hands-on knowledge to pupils that will some day replace them. Apprentices will generally be paid very little at first, but the cheap labor is in exchange for valuable training. Once an apprentice is proficient enough to work on their own, they will generally be making a nice, middle-class wage. 

A recent [report](https://www.npr.org/2018/01/04/575114570/robust-apprenticeship-program-key-to-germanys-manufacturing-might) from NPR took a look at how apprenticeships play a part in Germany's industrial success. The US government is also pretty aware of the potential, even if they face challenges in funding programs. The federal program is [here](https://www.dol.gov/apprenticeship/) and you can take advantage of some of their resources in person by finding the nearest [American Job Center](https://www.careeronestop.org/site/american-job-center.aspx)

The federal government is definitely the only organization pushing apprenticeships. In a lot of cases, labor unions organize and administer apprenticeships and training. One example would be the [IBEW](http://www.electricianapprenticehq.com/how-to-join-ibew-apprenticeship/) for electricians, but there are a too many unions that vary from place to place, so I won't bother trying to list a bunch. Searching for unions near your area may be a good place to start identifying other opportunities.

**Trade Schools** can be a good way to get the kind of classroom training you might expect from college, but much more focused and time/cost-efficient. Many community colleges offer trade programs that lead to certifications and associate's degrees. There are also standalone schools that might specialize in a single trade, like welding. [Job Corps](https://www.jobcorps.gov/train) is a national program that can be a good option if a person isn't in a good position to pay for training. It isn't for everyone as I understand it is very structured and somewhat militaristic, but I know a few people who have completed training there and gone on to nice careers. 

Training doesn't have to be years long though, especially in the arena of computer sciences, "boot camp" programs are becoming very popular. A computer programming boot camp might be a big expense for such a short program, but its much less expensive than a degree in computer science, and could give you enough tools to land a good job right away or even to work for yourself.

**Military** training can also be a great economic ladder. The pay and benefits are good from the start. Depending on the specialty, the training can be really valuable (and free). Plenty of employers offer some hiring preference to veterans. There are some huge risks associated with this route though, so I would reserve it as a last resort. 

Regarding benefits, the basic wage isn't a lot higher than minimum wage, which is often the subject of salty memes. That is not the only income, though. In most cases, living expenses are taken care of, so no need to budget for food, housing, or utilities. That's the bulk of what the working class is trying to stay on top of, so you could plausibly invest every dollar of pay you earn if you didn't have a cell phone or car. Even then, if you are sensible, it would be easy to live below your means. Another huge benefit is free medical for the whole family. On the outside, that would cost a lot.

Regarding training, if you win the "job lottery" you could receive extensive training in a really valuable field. Some people can walk away from four years of service making over $100,000/yr. You could also be a bus driver. You don't really get to choose, and that is the first big risk. I would say it is much better than a 50% chance that the job training you'd get in the military would be worth more than a high school diploma, but if you don't want to be a cop, and they make you a cop, that is a lot of wasted time.

Regarding lifestyle, it can be a great time. I really enjoyed most of the time I spent in the military. There were a lot of people around me who absolutely hated it and had to suffer through a six-year-long mistake. The good stuff is, you're part of a community, you might get travel a lot, you might have really exciting work to do. The bad stuff is, the culture can be very very toxic, you might have to be away from family for years, and being the military, there is an above average chance of being killed, injured, assaulted, or developing a mental illness.

I know that sounds dramatic, but a person shouldn't consider it lightly. In reality though, chances are high that you could walk away with a pretty good financial start and good opportunities to have a satisfying career.

**TL;DR**

If you want to get smart, go to college. If you want a good job, and don't want to become a slave to your own debt, consider a skilled trade.

**Edit:** Based on a lot of comments, it appears that some military branches handle job selection different than others, and these things evolve over time. As a general rule, even if some branch guarantees you a specific job, proceed with caution. Enlisting on an "open" contract is generally a terrible idea, but to clear up some confusion, the AF lets you pick some jobs you want, and requires you to select one of four open aptitudes. "No thanks" is not an open aptitude, but if orders come down for you to enlist "open general", that can be worth thinking long and hard about turning down.

Also about the military, I offered it up as a last resort, and I mean that. Plenty of commentators are saying "DON'T EVER THINK ABOUT JOINING THE MILITARY FOR TRAINING!" I don't know their stories, but there is probably something to it; so many people can't be wrong. You would literally be trading your autonomy up to your life in exchange for a chance for some economic mobility. If you aren't really interested in the military, it's not a great idea.

Regarding ROTC, it is better than nothing. I intentionally didn't mention it though. My philosophy is based on my wife and several other relatives doing ROTC vs my immediate family and I enlisting. If you do ROTC, you have 8 years from starting school to leaving the military. After 8 years, you walk away with at least a bachelors degree, the ability to check the veteran box, some work experience, and whatever money you saved up. If you enlist, in 4 years you can absolutely attain an associate's and bachelor's degree while you are in if you set your mind to it, especially in the AF, can't say how easy it is in the others. So you walk away with a degree, the ability to check the veteran box, some work experience, and whatever money you saved up. From a benefits standpoint, you can save yourself some time by back-loading the school. Additionally, I had a way better time than ANY officer I know, and I didn't even like the military. The lifestyles, politics, corruption, and cultures are way different between officers and enlisted. I wouldn't wish my understanding of the officer's life on anyone.

Still relevant to ROTC, but about school in general... A ton of people are very happy and successful thanks to their college education. I'm not out to say they are wrong, but "Go to college if you want a good life!" is neither a compelling nor useful LPT. You have surely gotten that line from someone else already.
		-- u/spudman238, 66442 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: College students: If you are a victim of a crime at school, call police FIRST, not the school.

Colleges and universities will try to  get you to use their "internal" reporting systems when something bad happens.  That system is there to help the school protect their image, not to protect you.   They will waste valuable time at best, and some may even try to talk you out of filing a police report, or they may even trick  you into reporting to a campus authority instead of to police.  If you want a  law enforcement response, get it yourself.  You can report to the  school later.  The college will have a harder time covering the crime  up if the police are already involved.

Source: I have worked for multiple colleges that pull this kind of crap.

BTW: This is just as true of lower level schools too.  If your kid is assaulted, threatened, or victimized in another criminal way, don't call the principal first, call police first.  Let the principal catch up later.
		-- u/[deleted], 56640 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Compliment others. People aren’t always bragging. Sometimes they’re just hoping you’ll be proud of them.

It might seem like they're bragging sometimes but usually they just wish that you acknowledge their accomplishments.
		-- u/__Dawn__Amber__, 55344 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Confirmation bias is real for everyone. Be aware of your own bias and seek your news from more neutral sources. Your daily stress and anxiety levels will drop a lot.

I used to criticize my in-laws for only getting their news from Fox News. Then I realized that although I read news from several sources, most were left leaning. I have since downloaded AP and Reuter’s apps and now use them for news (no more reddit news) and my anxiety and stress levels have dropped significantly.

Take a look at where you get your news and make sure it is a neutral source, not one that reinforces your existing biases.
		-- u/hoesindifareacodes, 55419 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Considering upgrading your living situation but not sure you can handle the increase of cost? Try “paying” the new amount, and put the difference in a savings account.

For instance, say you’re currently paying $1,000 a month for rent and considering moving to a bigger place that’s going to be $1,500. Pay your $1,000 rent and put the additional $500 into a savings account. *Do this for at least 3 months*. Sometimes your budget numbers will work on paper but once you start buying Dunkins and Taco Bell you’ll find you don’t have as much left over as you thought.
		-- u/BlueberryPuffy, 43937 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Cover all open cameras you have on laptops and phones, especially company property. Never assume they are off and always assume someone is watching.

I work from home for a large bank and one of the higher ups just slipped up and hinted that he was watching me through my work laptop camera that was turned off. He commented on something I did when there was no way he could have known as my camera was off. His comment was too specific and perfectly timed to be coincidence. It was confirmed by the extremely awkward silence every other higher up had when he made this mistake. He tried to laugh it off as a joke, but it wasn’t funny and just made it even more creepy. Assume if they have the access they are using it.
		-- u/[deleted], 49629 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT: Create a hotkey on your iphone to help reduce the time it takes to type out your email address.

Go to general &gt; keyboard &gt; text replacement and then assign a random hot key for example “@@“ to bring up your full email address. 

You won’t have to type out your email ever again.
		-- u/Joshy__Lee, 37765 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Create a separate "Future Me" identity, and go out of your way to do nice things for them. Easiest form of self-care I've found.

This motivates me like nothing else. When I am NOT in the mood for something (eg buying milk, stacking the dishwasher, bathing the dog) I just think "do it for future OP" and it works every time. It also gives you a little "Ima be my own hero!" feeling.

Then later on, when you benefit from that chore (eg drink that morning coffee, have clean dishes, snuffle your dog's clean lil head) PLEASE PRACTICE GRATITUDE. Just a "thanks, Past Me!" goes such a long way to make you feel loved and like it was totally worth it.

You will be stuck with yourself for the entirety of your existance. Be your best mate. Xx

Edit: Aw shucks, my first award! Thank you, I hope something magical happens to you today!

Edit 2: y'all are amazing. For those procrastinators saying they are the opposite and leave all the worst things for "future you" - sometimes present me needs a break man! Future You might have to show some compassion and understanding. Delegate with love, sometimes go halves in the chore, maybe get Future You a snack for when it's done. Be there for each other 😊
		-- u/ContributionNarrow88, 52808 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: DON'T be on your best behaviour on a first date. DO be your normal, everyday, relaxed hanging-with-friends behaviour. You want the person to like you for who you actually are, not who you are pretending to be. You will save yourself a lot of wasted time dating people who only like the fake you.

		-- u/TeleportingBackRolls, 70973 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Defensive driving can be summarised in two principles. Be predictable and assume others will be unpredictable.

		-- u/heykody, 40853 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Delete Facebook and Instagram. Your family and real friends will still keep in touch, and all the people you dont like too much or secretly compare yourself to suddenly go away. You dont need it.

		-- u/[deleted], 70700 upvotes, 0.75 ratio.
%
LPT: Disable the center channel audio line on a 5.1 surround sound system to mute the Olympic commentary

I know this has been posted before, but I thought it deserved a bump for the Olympics.  

Commentary can be nice, but when the sportscasters feel obligated to fill dead air, it can be cringe inducing to listen to them vamp.

Edit: A word.
		-- u/rekk14, 37491 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Do Not Buy Black Bath Towels If You Live In A Place With Black Spiders.

		-- u/timecat22, 37487 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Do chores when you feel angry. Keep to yourself and wash dishes, gardening, sweeping the floor, etc. Use all that adrenaline towards something that will benefit you instead of doing impulsive stuff.

		-- u/Weaponized_Goose, 67614 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Do not fall for jobs asking for 'Rockstars' that’s code for underpaid, overworked and unappreciated.

		-- u/__Dawn__Amber__, 42616 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Do not react to anything overwhelmingly the same day it happens. Give yourself a nights sleep and attack it the next day. It chemically allows your brain to process it properly without the flood of emotions and confusion.

Im sorry for assuming people read descriptions and not just titles. Thats literally my fault. The title seems "too sciency" and thats far from what i intended. I was just posting my life pro tip on the very sub. Not a claim to /r/science. 

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

As hard as it may seem at the moment.

Tough day at work. Managers being mean for no reason.

Someone bullies you. Calls you names.

Family or friend arguement.

Find a weird lump on you that sets you to panic mode instantly.

Virtually anything in your life that sets you to a state of mental discomfort.. **(not literally dying guys if you are dying go get help immediately).. Im talking about controllable moments.. Not physical pain or mental problems. Like the "karen yelled at me at work" problems.** Do not prey on the thoughts immediately. Do not lash out or panic. As much as you wanna run to your mom and cry, Accept that it has happened. Put your emotions away. And as hard as it is at the moment, move on from it, sleep the night. Tomorrow come back at it with a clear mind and approach the problem. However youd like. But now your mind is in tune properly.

[[This is nothing related to death or physical pain or serious life problems .. just your day to day encounters awkward moments arguments the little stuff]].. THIS IS NOT 100% SCIENTIFIC FACT. THIS IS NOT FOR SITUATIONS UNCONTROLLABLE LIKE PHYSICAL PAIN AND MENTAL DIAGNOSIS. This is help for Karen type moments day of stuff. You will not feel better the next day. You will be able to react better the next day is all i'm simply saying. Controllable moments. If you have chest pains or have been mentally diagnosed or are unbearing of what youre going through seek help immediately this is my own personal experience we are all wired differently** - i made the mistake thinking everyone understood what i meant without details
		-- u/ImPretendingToCare, 42919 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Do not try to be the man your father would want you to be. Be the man you would like your son to be be. It more clearly defines your own convictions, desires, goals, and motivates you to be your best.

		-- u/TanneriteAlright, 117381 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Dogs have a lot of nerves in their ears so when you rub them behind their ears it releases endorphins and makes them very relaxed on a natural high.

		-- u/Pegi111, 80379 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't "Hi" your coworkers on Slack or Teams in an attempt to rope them into a synchronous conversation they may not have time for. If you have a work-related question, simply ask it up front. If you need to schedule a chat, provide context so they can prioritize their time.

		-- u/RockleyBob, 52028 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't announce your milestone at someone else's.

Title speaks for itself. Don't propose at a wedding, or do a gender reveal at a funeral.
		-- u/InvisibleScorpion7, 42290 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't answer those social media posts like, "Your first car, first street you lived on and first dog is your rock star name" Countless people are sharing these and answering them without realizing it is security questions 101 for all of your online banking and many other security measures.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 73655 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't argue with people on online platforms. People tend to be more defensive of their opinions and more aggressive with their words. It will only ruin your day and waste your time.

		-- u/BenRegulus, 65068 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't ask a married couple when they are going to have kids. They might not be able to and you'll ruin their day bringing up sad thoughts.

		-- u/Robinothoodie, 52748 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't ask a veteran if they ever killed someone. It is both the first and worst thing a veteran gets asked about

THANK YOU FOR YOUR SERVICE.

TL/DR:  Don’t Ask
		-- u/RightMeow0129, 50706 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't assume that someone laughs at their own jokes because they think they're funny; some people are socially anxious, and worry what you'll think of them if you don't realize that they're joking, so they laugh to make it obvious it was a joke.

		-- u/Left4DayZ1, 57529 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't be fooled by the "working for a dream company" ideology. You'll be much better off with an amazing boss at an average company who champions your work, allows you to develop mastery in your field, and gives you autonomy.

		-- u/WrongKielbasa, 131418 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't be so quick to convince your company that your job can be performed completely from home indefinitely, because that means it can be performed from another country.

		-- u/ihavethebestmarriage, 41145 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't brake check people. Ever. It doesn't matter if you're on the highway or a surface street. It doesn't matter how "justified" you feel driving a certain speed, either. Just move over. You might save a life (possibly your own).

		-- u/MustangSallyD, 44495 upvotes, 0.76 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't buy oven mitts, get welders gloves from a hardware store! They can protect from higher heat, are built sturdier, and sometimes have flame decals on them so you can run faster.

		-- u/FullyLeadedSarcasm, 72663 upvotes, 0.7 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't compare your current life/financial/career situations to others. Compare it to your past self, and evaluate how the personal decisions you've made have impacted your circumstances.

		-- u/HSrandom420, 58104 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't die of politeness - if you find yourself choking, don't get embarrassed, GET ATTENTION! A lot of choking victims die in restaurant bathrooms because they tried to clear their airways by themselves in private. Don't let this be you - make a fuss if you need help!

This happened to me way back in 2003 - on a date with a rather nice guy. I was so nervous I swallowed funny and my food caught in my throat! I remember clearly my thought processes: "can't swallow, can't cough, can't breathe, can't talk - I have 4 and a half minutes until brain death unless someone in this restaurant knows the Heimlich. There are about 40 people here, I bet the odds are pretty good...and you know, my date's a handy guy, bet he might be one of them!" I stood up and started waving my hands around, forgot the "international sign for choking" (hands around the throat) but mimed the Heimlich and pointed at my mouth. My date figured it out, thankfully, did the Heimlich on me in front of 40 shocked onlookers, and saved my life! I found out 2 weeks later though that an acquaintance of mine had DIED in exactly the same circumstances because she had gone to the bathroom alone to try to clear her airway in private, and that this is a very common thing to happen. She literally died of embarrassment, of being too polite to make a fuss. Don't let this be you! **If you're choking, get attention!**

Oh and FWIW that rather nice guy and I have been married 16 years now :)

EDIT: IF YOU ARE ALONE AND CHOKING you can do the Heimlich maneuver on yourself! [HERE is a very useful demo!](https://youtu.be/ljL9JcK6RnM) Thank you to u/RanierMT for the link! 
		-- u/earth_worx, 66852 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't get too attached to "dream" schools or "dream" jobs before you really get some first-hand experience. Most of these places/careers are considered "good" because of abstract prestige, not based on having healthy environments that promote growth and personal happiness.

It's easy to end up at a school, job, or career just based on a burning ambition to say that is where you go or what you do, but that's not enough. 

**You may think if you get into XYZ school you are set for life** having it on your resume, but there might be a school out there that is less prestigious (but certainly *prestigious enough*) AND you would learn more there and better, develop more professionally and intellectually, and make better and more useful connections - which is what school is really for. **Keep your options open for the best school** ***for you***.

**There are a lot of prestigious jobs that are way more stressful than people think from the outside** and are also not a good fit for most personality types, yet so many people want them. Also, prestigious institutions rarely are highly ranked based on how well they treat their employees and having a non-toxic work environment - in fact, it's often the opposite. 

**Prestigious institutions are often less focused on employee retention** because they know people want to work there just for the name and that, if you leave, there are so many others lining up for your job they can spare you easily.  It doesn't matter if you are a brain surgeon at Johns Hopkins, an Astronaut at NASA, junior faculty at Harvard, or an endangered species veterinarian working for the World Wildlife Fund - you are expendable and you will likely be working with a bunch of people driven by pure ambition. 

Sometimes you have to get there to really know how bad it is for you, and that is the other part of the LPT. ***Don't get stuck in sunk-costs thinking and caught with the golden handcuffs of feeling you have to stay in a bad situation because you worked so hard to get there and/or you'll never get a better opportunity.***

*Source: I have gotten into all my "dream" schools and all my "dream" jobs at very prestigious institutions (and been at less "dream-y" schools and institutions). This LPT is based on my own first-hand experience and largely on what I saw around me with my peers and colleagues. I'm still there and I still see it happening. I see so much misery and unhappiness that just doesn't have to be there.*
		-- u/zazzlekdazzle, 46664 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't have blind loyalty to a corporation you work for. There is nothing wrong with loving your job or the work you do, but understand that corporations don't reward loyalty.

You are a number in an equation.  If they need to balance the equation they will remove your number.   
I am posting this based on the number of people I see who buy into "corporate spirit/culture".  You should always keep your options open for a better opportunity and don't NOT take it because of misplaced loyalty.
		-- u/[deleted], 55941 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't judge your "market value" as a romantic partner during your teenage years/ early twenties. A lot of decisions during that time are hormone-driven.

Adolescence lasts much longer than most people think, until around 25. Before that, the human brain is not yet fully mature, meaning that psychological and behavioural patterns still undergo changes. Thus, our "true personality" only manifests itself during the late twenties.

Before that happens, people are often "in lust" rather than in love, but without realizing it. Our bodies are wired to produce as much offspring as possible as soon as possible, because early humans used to die young. This can lead to our relationship decisions in high school and sometimes college being based on biological urges rather than compatibility of personalities.

So don't worry if you can't find a partner in high school or even college - the good times are still ahead of you!

EDIT: to clarify, I'm not saying not to date until you're older, just to not let yourself be discouraged by setbacks in your love life.
		-- u/lapaleja, 37297 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't just let kids win at games. You can slow it down, you can teach them strategy, but keep it real. Someday, they will beat you fair and square, and it will be a moment they always remember with pride.

		-- u/zazzlekdazzle, 43414 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't let people guilt you for not visiting them. They're not visiting you either.

I always feel guilty when people say, "I miss you, you should really come visit me in [city that's a several hour drive away]." It always eases my mind when I remind myself that this person is equally capable of visiting me and isn't doing it either.
		-- u/rook218, 71269 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't put your life on hold waiting for closure on something you're struggling with. Many of life's most difficult situations don't have reasonable explanations.

		-- u/attilayavuzer, 45110 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't say "sorry IF I hurt you", say "sorry THAT I hurt you" when apologizing. Even if you didn't mean to hurt anyone, saying "if" diminishes their feelings.

		-- u/captainsquidsharkk, 38171 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't think of accountants and lawyers as people you only need for taxes and trials. No: they're pretty much the only people who know the ACTUAL rules for how the world works. Think of them instead as people you can talk to before any big life decision.

		-- u/ScissorNightRam, 40750 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't try to save useful life pro tips. You probably have hundreds and will never find the one you need. When you're doing something new ( moving, fishing, etc) just type in fishing and search the subreddit for a quick summary of useful tips. You can do this for anything. Break ups, studies.

		-- u/DanielJiha, 50131 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Don't use door dash, grubhub, etc. to order food if picking up. Call or place your order in person. The price on those services can be substantially higher than what they charge on the phone or in person.

		-- u/magicone2571, 68102 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Dont connect to your works wifi with your personal device.

Their IT department can get more info than you'd be comfortable with. Especially your active traffic. 

Stick to data.

Edit: it's been fun but it's time to turn off notifications for this. Here's some answers to frequent responses:

&gt;I am IT. We don't have time for that.

Computers are capable of automating tasks you don't have time for. HR cares. This industry is booming. If your company isn't using one of these services today, they're getting emails about starting to use it every sungle day until they do. Logs get backed up indefinitely. You don't have permission to delete these logs if your company is worth it's weight in salt. Just Google "employee surveillance" and check out your low cost solutions at your fingertips!

&gt;What about (other network)

Same.

&gt;What about home network on work device?

Same. Set up guest network and connect to that with work devices instead. 

&gt;You're wrong

lol ok good luck.

&gt;something about me getting fired for incompetence or browsing porn

No, someone died in my small office. They were my immediate supervisor, so me and 1 other guy were laid off. Y'all need to chill.

&gt;Something about being in IT and thinking they're above this issue

Please, I invite you to attend defcon. Try to leave without getting your entire identity stolen.

Anyways that's all! It's been fun. Stay safe!
		-- u/foggy-sunrise, 36993 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t be afraid to lose people. Be afraid of losing yourself by trying to please everyone around you

This LPT is based on personal experiences and I think it’s kind of self explaining. 

I a nutshell many people (including me for a long time) are trying to avoid confrontations with supposed friends and other “related” people, although they are really uncomfortable with the friendships they have. 

Not a long time ago I had a friend which had a very negative impact on me in a psychological way and I always believed I had to be there for her but the truth was, she just wanted to feel better by pulling me down. But i wanted to adapt all the time and became more and more losing myself.  

You don't always have to adapt! 
When you feel to lose yourself around certain people be yourself! 
Name your point of view and don’t be afraid to lose toxic people around you after confronting them.

EDIT: It’s my first post here and I am so overwhelmed by this positive response! Wish you all the best and stay strong!

EDIT2: First I want to thank you for all the awards, it’s really insane!  
Second I want to reach out to all the people in this thread who can relate to my experience and going through a hard time right now. 
I think it shows that we are not alone with this emotions what motived me personally a lot! 
Feel all hugged :)

EDIT3: Some people say in this thread it’s not a real LPT and I can understand what you mean by that. But I think on the other hand an advise can be a LPT and more or less obvious at the same time. 
If someone told me me this advise a few years ago I would be very greatful. 
I read a lot of comments of people who where grateful too and considered this post as helpful. Personally that is what count for to be a LPT at the end.
		-- u/Lentjiom, 59360 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t bother giving more than a two week notice.

Had a coworker put in his notice until the end of the year. Told them he’s going back to school starting the first, but wanted to give enough notice to hire and help train someone to take over for him so we wouldn’t be down a person. 

They decided that two weeks is enough, so now he won’t be getting paid, except for potential unemployment which is significantly less than what he makes now, for the next two months. If he would’ve just kept his mouth shut and not tried to help them, he would’ve continued to get paid and then could’ve given a two week notice. 

Don’t try to help the company. They have no interest in helping you, just helping themselves.
		-- u/sarnold95, 95667 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t burden yourself with trying to change people’s viewpoints online. It’s rarely successful and likely frustrates you more than it’s worth. Remind yourself it’s not your job.

Good natured discussion is always healthy, but if you find yourself getting upset – remind yourself its not your job to change that person’s mind, and you likely won’t succeed. 

Not your monkey, not your circus.
		-- u/tnick771, 40772 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t delete old playlists if you can prevent it; years later you can listen and not only rediscover music you were into but also experience whatever emotion you had associated with your tunes at the time.

		-- u/lucasb16, 49419 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t donate platinum awards, donate koala bears as they give $2.50 cents for Australian fire relief.

Edit: If you have money, donate directly to the fire relief organizations, don’t spend money on Reddit coins to give koala awards.

They are koalas not koala bears, I am very sorry for the mistake.
		-- u/GDDNEW, 44598 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t drive yourself mad trying to “live life to the fullest.” There is nothing wrong with a life filled with ordinary and comfortable days, with the occasional adventure mixed in. If you can, try and find joy in the small moments, it will quickly remind you what a full life you already have.

		-- u/alwaysonthego-7, 37218 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t go the extra mile at your job

Most jobs today, particularly if you’re not in management or some really high level gig - will *not* reward your hard work.

Most likely situation is that if you push yourself to your limit to be the best employee in the world and make the company you work for rich, you’ll see very little, if any direct benefit to yourself. Most of what you produce you don’t see (surplus labor value) and the good job you do; It’s not uncommon to see that just taken credit for by people above you - so don’t be exploited. Your reward for hard work will very often be more hard work unless you negotiate or are willing to walk. 

You only have one life, and you don’t want to kill yourself trying to climb a ladder that, statistically, you won’t ever climb. The United States consistently ranks pretty low on most economic  upward mobility metrics - that’s just a statistical reality. Granted it’s better than most 3rd world countries but…hey, perception is everything I guess. 

Regardless, an employee who will run themselves ragged for as little money as possible is every companies dream - but it’s an equal exchange of labor for payment - what you get in that exchange matters too. 

Do the minimum to not get fired, or at least, a well enough job -  and enjoy your life. Put your friendships and family first, don’t define your life by working. 

You will be a lot happier that way.

EDIT: I’m seeing a lot of “well, you get experience!” in the comments, and while that’s true and totally fair - experience doesn’t pay bills. It don’t keep the lights on or put food on the table, and it doesn’t replace watching your kids grow up and take their first steps.
		-- u/NoahTheLevel, 37752 upvotes, 0.67 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t pay for turbo tax

If you’re filing your taxes with turbo tax and it says you have to pay to file, don’t do it. Just compete the full process and on the VERY LAST PAGE, there’s a link to click to review all the documents just before you submit.

That shows you each form, completely filled out with all of the correct information. Now with that open, you want to go to the IRS website and use one of their linked sites. Find each form that is on the turbo tax review page you have open, and match all of the fields. Then submit with the other site and exit turbo tax.

You’ve now filed your taxes for free!

Edit: Woah wasn’t expecting this to blow up like this lol thanks for my first gold!
		-- u/jrnova9, 62079 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t say anything bad about your boss to your coworkers; even if they agree with you. You never know if someone would backstab you and let your boss know.

		-- u/Drew_Ferran, 47519 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t say anything negative about someone’s appearance that they cannot change/fix in 20 seconds.

I read this somewhere online years ago and it has stuck with me. I love this tip because it is a simple way to make sure you can be helpful without being socially awkward! 

For example, if someone has a hair sticking sideways or food in their teeth (and in some circumstances, their clothes are on inside out, if there is a room they can change in nearby) if you tell them, generally no matter where they are, they can fix it easily and quickly. 

On the other hand, if you say “oh that (insert clothing item here) is too short or not flattering” or “you’ve got a huge pimple”, you are not being helpful. That is not easily fixed or changed and could cause the person to be insecure about their looks that day or they may overthink it. Also, if you think about some of the possibilities here, you might find it’s just your personal opinion on what you would wear, how you would do your hair/makeup etc. and you are being unkind rather than being helpful.

Hope this helps someone! :)

EDIT: wow, didn’t expect this to take off so fast! So, just for clarity - 20 seconds is a rough guide to indicate a relatively quick and easy fix. Take it with a grain of salt, it could be a minute, just use common sense as to what the situation is, if you know the person etc.

Also, if someone has shit/wet/bled somewhere, or something of that nature, discreetly tell them and offer help to get somewhere to fix themselves up.

Basically, be a decent human being. If you’re close to the person, then you should be able to judge what to say and when based on how you know they will react and process it.
		-- u/[deleted], 43418 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t share “this person is missing” posts unless the contact number is to the police!

I often see this - a person writes a post about how their family member is missing and they want it shared so that they can find them and get in contact with them, and the only number on the post is their own number. 

This is sometimes used to locate people who have escaped abuse, someone who left an abusive partner and took the kids with them to a safe house, or maybe someone escaping honor related violence. 

Always call the police if you know something about someone who might be missing.
		-- u/tempstud, 44452 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t stay awake for things you wouldn’t get up earlier for.

Someone posted a similar LPT a while ago, but I thought I’d share it again, since it actually helped me get to bed earlier having this phrase in mind
		-- u/MonoMental, 40897 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t throw away a blanket that’s just a bit worn out or stained. Instead, donate it to your local animal shelter. For many homeless pets, a soft place to sleep is their greatest solace.

		-- u/-LordOfTheSighs-, 47611 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t wait around for others. Make your own plans and stick to them. Don’t be the person who never gets out just because nobody else can go with you.

This was a hard lesson I recently came to terms with in life. I am fairly young (26) so don’t really have any hard feelings about it. I always felt I needed others to enjoy the same hobbies as me to actually enjoy doing them. This made me miss a lot of opportunities to just enjoy life. 

If you want to do something (anything, be it physical, mental) just do it. By all means, extend an invite to others, but if nobody makes plans, just go do it yourself. 

Instead of asking “hey, we should go out and do ______ some time”, say “hey, I’m going to go _________, did you want to come?”

This way you already have plans to do whatever it is you’re doing, and you’re just extending an invite. Not actually basing whether you will do thing on someone else. 

Hope this helps someone!

Edit: A lot of comments are pointing this out. Obviously with Covid you need to be responsible about these “activities”. In my case, fishing alone outdoors really doesn’t have any covid complications.
		-- u/burgoyne17, 81837 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Don’t wait until you have “free time” to start a fitness program. Because then when you get busy again, you’ll stop. The best time to start is actually when you’re busy. Learning how to fit it in when time’s are tough means you’ll stick with it over the long haul.

		-- u/AdSnoo9734, 41579 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Dreading something? Avoidance makes it 100x harder because it completely disempowers you. When the only way out is through, turn and face the discomfort, take a deep breath and walk towards it. This is neuroscience-backed, see full post.

The following is from a Harvard Business School neuroscience based behavioural course I did.

Your brain is your hype man, and tries very hard to prove you right using emotions as feedback. Once you decide on your goal, emotions are the hints your brain uses to help you decide whether a certain situation HELPS or HINDERS your progression towards that goal. In turn, this influences your behaviour. Thoughts - Feelings - Behaviour. Nothing is inherently good or bad, it is all relative to what you are trying to achieve. Read that sentence again.

If your goal is avoidance, then any progression or confrontation is going to feel very uncomfortable because your brain will be going "nope, this is bad. This is not what you wanted. Sending bad feedback." You can just as easily shift your goal (this is what mindset is, and it IS up to you) and in turn, change your brain's response to the stimulus around you (emotions). Even if it is an uncomfortable situation, your brain will recognise that it's helping you achieve your goal, so the feedback it gives you (emotions) will be much more positive. It all starts with what you want to achieve and if you don't know, then spend some time figuring that out. Goal clarity is like giving your brain a quest marker.

You are hardwired for struggle, go forth in courage my comrades!
		-- u/ContributionNarrow88, 68417 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: During a job interview, if offered a glass of water, accept it. That way when you get asked a difficult question you can take a sip for some extra seconds before answering.

		-- u/elzndr, 65067 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: During a job interview, if they offer a glass of water, do accept it. So when you get asked a difficult question you can take a sip for a few extra seconds before answering the question.

		-- u/__Dawn__Amber__, 42660 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: During this shopping season don't forget that Reddit is hands down the best review website on the internet. Type the product your thinking about buying directly into the Reddit search bar to find real reviews and plenty of quality conversation around whatever you're thinking about buying.

		-- u/Tartwhore, 37931 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Each person's brain has a set number of hours of sleep that is required for proper functioning. Don't listen to your parents, co workers or boss telling you that a human only needs 4-6 hours of sleep. Less sleep over long period can lead to poor memory, mental health issues and even Alzheimer's

For example, I require 7 hours of sleep. On days where I sleep less. I'm annoyed, my memory and concentration ability is affected. I feel mentally sick through the day. Once I went a few days like this and then one day I had a good sleep. I realised how important sleep was. Your brain functions so much better. Everything is more clear.
Just pay attention to how you perform on less sleep to understand this.

There are many studies showing association of poor sleep with dementia and Alzheimer's.

There are studies that showing association of poor sleep with high blood pressure and cardiovascular diseases.

Edit 1: Many had asked about source for my claims

https://www.nih.gov/news-events/nih-research-matters/sleep-deprivation-increases-alzheimers-protein

https://www.nih.gov/news-events/nih-research-matters/lack-sleep-middle-age-may-increase-dementia-risk

https://www.npr.org/2020/11/16/935475284/scientists-discover-a-link-between-lack-of-deep-sleep-and-alzheimers-disease

https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC6286721/

https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC4651462/#:~:text=More%20specifically%2C%20when%20one%20sleeps,help%20maintain%20its%20normal%20functioning.

"Until recently, the latest research developments have concluded that sleeping has much more impact in the brain than previously thought. More specifically, when one sleeps, the brain resets itself, removes toxic waste byproducts which may have accumulated throughout the day [2]. This new scientific evidence is important because it demonstrates that sleeping can clear “cobwebs” in the brain and help maintain its normal functioning. More importantly speaking, this paper illustrates the different principles of sleep; starting from the non-rapid eye movement (NREM) to the behavioral as well as mental patterns with chronic sleep loss as well as the importance of sleeping acting as a garbage disposal in the body."

Edit 2: Yes I agree. Not just Quantity of sleep but Quality of sleep matters as well

https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC5449130/

Edit 3: Amount of sleep required varies from individual to individual

http://healthysleep.med.harvard.edu/healthy/science/variations/individual-variation-genetics

Edit 4: For people saying nobody says that. 
My mom did. I followed the 6 hour thing for very long till I realised, that wasn't true and I needed 7 hours. I used to wake up at 4.30 AM to push more hours of studies ( after 6 hour sleep) man let me tell you. I was extremely sleepy and tired in class. I stopped doing that later. Couldn't keep doing that.

When I was a teenager, they never let me sleep over 8AM, even during summer holidays.

About Boss and Coworkers....In 5 months I'll become a doctor. Healthcare, depending on your speciality and job is one sector where sleep and mental health is actually ignored. I see my interns/ house surgeons staying awake   36 hours. Sometimes the job requires it. Night duties are a part of the job. Even during our undergraduate it's considered very normal to lose sleep over studying for tests and exams. Most of them sleep hardly 3 -  5 hours before  University exams. It has kinda become the norm. And yes I've heard my own friends bragging about how less they slept the previous day. It's pathetic.

In our student life these kinda extreme situations happen before exams and our exams go over a month.

When we don't have exams, I keep my sleep the highest priority more than my studies and try to eat well and exercise. I'll take the stress when I have to, just before the exams.

During internship, half the interns I see are sleep deprived and stressed.

Brings me to another point. It's not possible to have a good sound sleep all the time, but we can have good sleep atleast most of the time.
		-- u/Freedom9814, 53733 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Either they like you or they don't. Never try to convince somebody of your worth. If a person doesn't appreciate you, they don't deserve you. Respect yourself and be with people who truly value "you"

		-- u/ritzz2_0, 60676 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Employers put "entry level" in job titles to trick applicants into accepting less pay. If the "entry level" job requires you to have significant experience, demand more than starting pay.

		-- u/MuffMagician, 67776 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Employers put "entry level" in job titles to trick applicants into accepting less pay. If the "entry level" job requires you to have significant experience, demand more than starting pay.

Edit: I appreciate the reward :)
		-- u/BerkDemir23, 47113 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Ever need another email address but don't want to register an whole new account? If you add a "+1", "+2", etc. before the @ in your email address, websites will register it as a new email, but still send mail to your normal address. Makes organizing accounts or endless free trials much easier!

Example: Primary email: Bob@gmail*.*com

Modified emails (all go to the primary):

Bob+1@gmail*.*com

Bob+2@gmail*.*com

Bob+3@gmail*.*com

This can be used to endlessly register for free trials like Netflix.

No need to even sign into the new address because all the confirmation emails go straight to your normal account that you are already logged into.

Edit: Apparently you can add anything you want after the plus sign, so you can do Bob+netflix or bob+netflix1, or whatever! Thanks for the additional tip u/PM_ME_A_PLANE_TICKET
		-- u/WilsonTheVolleyBawl, 69136 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Every 2-3 years, look at your house as if you were going to sell it, and do the quick projects and deep cleaning that will spruce it up. It will help keep your house in good shape, and make it cheaper on the repairs/upgrade costs when you do sell.

		-- u/mindthegap92, 55287 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Every gun is always loaded at all times and can discharge for no reason at all.

This should always be your mindset. Mindfully, never point a firearm at anything you do not intent to kill. Never put your finger in the trigger guard unless you are ready to shoot. A firearm should only ever be considered "not loaded" once it has been dissembled. Do not tolerate bad firearm etiquette from those around you.

There are no gun accidents, only stupid people.
		-- u/Lebenkunstler, 75214 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Find a pair of socks you REALLY like and only buy the same pair so you always get a matching pair of socks from the basket after washing them.

		-- u/iglig, 38441 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Finding a Public Restroom in a City

Have a hard time finding a restroom while in a city? 

Walk into a hotel lobby like you know where you’re going and go to the restroom. 

If you can’t find it quickly, find an employee and say “ I need to use the restroom really quick, but don’t want to go all the way to my room. Can you point me to the lobby restroom?” 

As long as they have one and you don’t look homeless, it will work nearly every time. 

I’ve used this all over the US and Canada in many, major large cities.

Edit 1: As many have pointed out, the first option is to just walk in and go straight to the restroom like you own the place. Being confident and acting like you belong somewhere will get you into a lot of places you otherwise wouldn’t. The example I gave has variations to it and there have been some solid ones mentioned in the comments. You can typically read the hotel employee pretty quick and get a sense if you can just ask or if you’re going to have to get a bit more creative to get access.

Edit 2: Thanks for all of the awards kind strangers! Of all things, it blows my mind that this is the post that gets me on the front page for the first time. 

Edit 3: Some have pointed out that this likely works well for me because I’m white and that is a very valid point. I’m definitely aware of my white male privilege and it sucks that that is still a thing in 2022. We still have a lot of work to do. 

Edit 4: It’s cool to hear that some countries like India have made access to public restrooms and clear drinking water a basic right afforded to everyone. We’re behind on some of this stuff here in the US.
		-- u/jwc8985, 45709 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Finish your degree even if you ultimately wont go into your studied field. Future employers may simply pay you more for having a degree.

Obviously there are limitations to this, but dropping out with only a few accredited hours remaining could be more financially burdening than just finishing given the potential loss of future revenue.  I know for a fact my company weighs in this criteria when creating an offer for positions that dont require a college education.
		-- u/Gruder47, 65677 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: First rule of family gatherings, always bring your own vehicle so you can leave when you want.

And park where they can't block you in.

**Edit:  reuploading for the records**[accidentally deleted the post while trying to delete a comment after 11 hours of submission ](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/fqkkke/lpt_first_rule_of_family_gatherings_always_bring/?utm_medium=android_apputm_source=share)
		-- u/ritzz2_0, 45417 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Fix Google Maps before selling your house

I live outside London in a commuter town, so living close to the train station is *the* main thing people look for when buying.

When we bought our house, Google (and so all of the major property portals) said it was 0.6 miles to the station. I noticed that a bunch of footpaths and shortcuts in my neighbourhood were missing from Google maps, so submitted changes which showed up about a week later.

We're now selling our house, and the distance to the station has more than halved - the house is now listed as being 0.27 miles to the station! The agent thinks this has boosted the price of the house by a few %, and has resulted in strong interest from Londoners moving out to our town 

Tl;dr: Fix Google maps to be closer to transport hubs

Edit: we hit the front page! Lots of people saying that Google doesn't accept changes for most users, so it's probably worth pointing out that I am a level 6 local guide (did it years ago because I thought that maybe it could eventually be useful). You can become a high level local guide by searching for every ATM/cash machine in your area, and setting its opening hours to 24 hours, and/or reviewing it.
		-- u/kiwialec, 48039 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: For an Aspirin to save your life during a heart attack, it's important you chew it rather than swallow.

Chewing delivers the effects fastest through blood vessels in your mouth, rather than the digestive process which is slow. But don't use an enteric-coated tab, which will work slowly even if chewed. 

https://www.health.harvard.edu/heart-health/aspirin-for-heart-attack-chew-or-swallow#:~:text=Aspirin%20can%20help%20prevent%20heart,it%20as%20quickly%20as%20possible
		-- u/KissAndControlx, 38678 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: For people starting a new job. If a task typically takes someone ~3.5 hours and you can get it done in 1 hour, don't turn your task in right away - wait about an hour. If your manager(s) discover how productive you really are, they will quickly overwork you without proper compensation.

		-- u/[deleted], 102543 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: For those in flooded areas, use extreme caution when walking on streets and sidewalks. Manhole covers are often forced off by the flood and can be extremely dangerous as people can fall in, get trapped, and drown.

I’m from New Orleans where flooding is common. Rising water in sewers offen moves manhole covers(openings to the sewer) creating a very dangerous situation especially when water is being pumped through the sewers (as in during a flood). It creates underground rivers and people fall in and drown. 

Use a boat whenever possible while crossing flooded urban areas and use extreme caution when walking.

Another thing to consider are keeping food, water and an axe with you if forced to move to a higher level of your home. Many people got stuck and even drowned in their attics during katrina but the people who brought axes could cut through to their roofs.
		-- u/daynanfighter, 45066 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: For those living in cold areas, take a coat and have blankets in your car on each trip. You never know when your car may break down and it can quickly become life threatening.

		-- u/enano2054, 40314 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Freeze a block of cheese for 30 minutes before shredding it. It will shred quicker, smoother, and won't chunk up on the shredder.

		-- u/improbablydrunknlw, 62056 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Friends and family will hold on to grudges long after you’ve forgiven your SO. It’s easy to get into the habit of venting to them about your relationship, but unless it’s toxic or abusive, remember they don’t get to see the good along with the bad.

		-- u/RockleyBob, 53030 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: From here on out, make "What was your company's COVID response?" a standard interview question.

I work in software. My whole company has been working from home for the past two months, and performing at 100%. Now management is forcing us all to come back into the office on June 1st, for no discernible reason.

I don't want to work for a company that cares so little about the health of employees and their families, ever again. I'll be looking for something new as soon as it's practical, and I will definitely be asking prospective employers this.

EDIT: Unsubscribing from replies now because I can't keep up with them. Thanks, all, a lot of good responses here! And a few weirdos who are somehow personally offended by the very *idea* of asking an interviewer about working conditions. Reddit is a strange place.
		-- u/PhasmaFelis, 83845 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Get a blank book and have each family member over 50 write down the life advice they'd want their descendants in 500 years to know. Keep adding to it and passing it down. You now have a family heirloom that won't be pawned off for drug money, and will only get more useful as time goes on.

Something I started for my own family around last year, which I think more people should do.  Call it a heirloom book or something.

Asking for advice that'll be useful so far into the future ensures that it'll be timeless, and gives people a chance to pass on their wisdom and be remembered long after they would otherwise be forgotten.  You can fill it with all sorts of stuff, from stories to family recipes to general LPTs.  Make extra copies whenever you have to pass it down to multiple children, too.
		-- u/BlueberryPhi, 45316 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Get a copy of everything you sign. Everything. You'd be surprised the number of businesses that don't plan to give you a copy or don't want to.

Example is one time I signed a contract with a home builder that acknowledged all of the design options and specifications of my home were correct. I asked for a copy. The project manager said he didn't know if they were allowed to provide it since, if they made a mistake, it would be recorded. I told them that I get a copy of anything I sign. Why would one party only have the contract? I went to the agent and eventually got a copy. It's something they owed me. It's not a courtesy.

Edit: As many people have noted, part of this LPT should also be to READ what you sign before signing it.

Edit: Some people have commented and said things like I should have walked away at this point. Building a new home, however, involves multiple contracts, the first of which involves getting things started by reserving land, choosing a model (if not using a custom builder), etc., and all of that requires a large, non-refundable deposit. By the time we got to the specifications and design contract, we were already 10s of thousands into it. There is no walking away at that point without a substantial financial loss.
		-- u/biorod, 38097 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Get to know your professors early on. In your later years, good relationships with professors can lead to recommendations and research and job opportunities.

		-- u/elparay, 49963 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Give your man some physical love and attention.

I realised this with my first boyfriend. Men are often starved of physical attention. It seems totally normal and socially accepted for girls to hug, caress, and kiss each other openly to show their friendship and love but men often cannot express their feelings in the same way.

Ladies and gents, give your guy the physical love he probably gives you. Touch his hair, hug him often, let him lay his head in your lap and just caress him. He deserves it and it's time to normalise men craving physical attention besides sex as well!

Edit because you people are absolutely right: bros, give your bros hugs, show and tell them you love them! Men are not machines and want to feel loved by their friends, family and SO.

Another Edit, because again, the comment section has offered great advice: obviously, not everyone is into physical love, platonic or otherwise. As always in life and love, consent is super important. Nobody can know what kind of history a person has and what kind of affection they enjoy!

Also: it's perfectly fine for men to be the little spoon or to be held affectionately. As someone in the comments stated: it doesn't make anyone less of a man to want to be held. It also doesn't make a woman less of a woman if she's the big spoon, as long as everyone is happy, everything is fine!
		-- u/onelass, 41848 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Giving employees four, ten hour days and three days off improves mental stability

		-- u/jayduhaus, 39036 upvotes, 0.74 ratio.
%
LPT: Go ahead and take that raise into a higher tax bracket! You'll still be bringing home more money than before

Only the money above the old tax bracket will be taxed at the higher rate. If you were making $99,999 per year and you got a raise to $100,001, i.e. a $2 per year raise, only the $2 would get taxed at the higher rate. 

So don't worry, and may you get a raise in 2023!

EDIT--believe it or not, progressive taxation is not common knowledge. That's why I posted it. I tried to be clear and concise.
		-- u/nevertoolate2, 40545 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Go buy a decent shower head (like $30-50 decent). You use it every day (at least once), and the newer heads have better pressure, more options, and typically use less water. Better experience for you, while saving money and our planet.

		-- u/legisleducator, 38592 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Go for a walk every day. While this sounds ineffective, it actually proves helpful to making yourself more productive and happy - and is very effective at doing so.

[Source before someone asks](https://redbooth.com/blog/walking-productivity-scientific-links)

u/Miguel30Locs I hope you live up to that promise and walk [3,000 miles in 2019! We've all got your back man! :)](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/9upp4q/comment/e96evff?st=JO656RFIsh=d58e90d3) *keep the gold train going if you can ;D*

edit: wow 30k karma and gold! I didn't expect this to blow up at all, hope this helps you guys out! :) 

edit 2: 40k karma?! wow this was a crazy post
		-- u/[deleted], 45384 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Go outside in the morning to get natural light. It sets your circadian rhythm for the day. You can combine this practice with a short jog, bike ride, or walk. Lateral eye movement caused by self-propelled motion is shown to reduce stress.

I learned this from Andrew Huberman, Ph.D., a professor at Stanford who studies how vision and our brains are interconnected.
		-- u/askoshbetter, 53219 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Go to your Reddit inbox, click the three dots on top and select "Mark all as read" to remove that annoying number at the bottom.

Edit: u/iwantmyteslanow had posted this in AskReddit too (which I saw after posting here)
		-- u/johnjax90, 82468 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Googling "best places to hide a house key" and checking the top results will give you a list of places you should definitely not hide a house key

		-- u/lalder95, 44133 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Gossiping about coworkers is one of the most effective ways to make yourself feel paranoid at work. Cut it out altogether and marvel as your anxiety levels plummet.

		-- u/m77w, 44710 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Got a friend or family in the hospital? Consider giving them cozy blankets, soft socks, open toe slippers, book/eReader reader, long phone charger, and condiments for food instead of flowers.

Note: *This is a repost to my previous submission that was removed for an undescriptive title.*

I was recently hospitalized for the first time in my adult life. This made me realize what I would have loved to have based on my six-night stay.

**Warm, comfortable blanket (microfleece)**- Hospital HVACS systems may not offer local room temperature control but instead make coarse adjustments remotely. I was told they could only bump it up or down here at my VA hospital. Also, this was the first time I received an IV treatment and let me tell you they are cold... Had an IV in my forearm and it felt like a cooling coil and I am pretty convinced I could put a fan on it to air condition the room.

**Warm, comfortable socks**- Reasons are similar to the blanket explanation. Maybe socks with gripping pads wouldn't be bad in case they walked on the tile without shoes.  *Credit*: /u/Getitgirl007 mentioned that their family/friends had received socks from the hospital, so I followed up and asked my nurse about this.  Turns out, the VA hospital does have socks available and my new RN was shocked that no one had offered them to me ¯\_(ツ)_/¯

**Condiments** - I believe hospital food is designed to be lightly seasoned or bland as it may upset a patient's stomach. This problem might be compounded by medication. May have to be on the safe side and confer with the patient for what the could stomach safely. **EDIT** I recommended conferring with the patient assuming they would be informed of their dietary restrictions and abide by it.  Generally, it would be wiser to consult with the RN or charge nurse regarding what they can have for consumption.

**Open toe slippers**- Luckily I had flip flops on when I was unexpectedly admitted for my infection. Making short walks to the bathroom would have been a pain if I only had tennis shoes. Probably would of went barefoot in that case.

**Long, braided phone charger** - My wife brought my 10 ft braided lightning cord and it was great. I can easily circumvent their expensive equipment and tuck it somewhere that wouldn't get in the nurse's way. I recommend braided because they tend to be more durable in my experience. Also, I am using a 5ft USB hub for my charger, the extra length is nice to have.

**Entertainment**: A book, eReader, word games, or anything to help pass the time.   The TV service may offer on-demand movies but the selection is slim and the hospital may charge for it as well depending on their administration. Another option might be to get your patient a google/apple card so they cam purchase some movies. If they might have trouble holding the phone for long durations then get a gooseneck cell phone holder that has a clamp connection so you can mount it to the bed. The gooseneck will offer a flexible but rigid structure so the patient can adjust it to their preference. *EDIT* /u/stjernDale recommended audiobooks.  Great way to pass the time and not strain your eyes!

**Gift Cards**: *Credit: /u/1900grs, /u/HalftimeHeaters.*  Gift cards for local restaurants (especially with delivery service) and gas stations are terrific.

*Bonus LPT*:  /u/1900grs and myself would recommend avoiding flowers, balloons, and stuffed animal gifts for hospital patients.  They take up quite a bit of valuable real-estate, make it difficult for hospital staff to work, and are a burden when you have to pack up for your discharge.  This bonus LPT is intended for *adult patients.*

Edit 1

**Power Bank**- /u/nintynineninjas recommended a power bank to charge your phone when you are unable to move.  This was especially helpful for when they were locked down from holding their newborn.

Edit 2

**Eye Mask  Ear plugs** - /u/Ruaidiri, /u/perpetuallywet, /u/SuedeVeil recommended these items due to minimizing the constant distractions or getting some much-needed rest.  Especially useful for patients who are sharing rooms in the maternity ward.

**Moisturizers  Chapstick** - /u/jessicasanj, /u/FatJennie, /u/bluephoto recommended these items.  I will have to admit that my hands were getting pretty dry from constant washing.
		-- u/genechem, 45491 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Greyhound racing is now illegal in Florida after the midterm, which will leave a lot of good dogs in need of homes. If you're considering adopting a dog, please research Greyhounds and see if they'd be right for your family.

Since this has gained a lot of popularity, I want to add in that anyone with questions should visit the good people of r/Greyhounds.

They can help you decide if you're ready for a retired racer, prepare you for the difficulties that come with adopting one, and clear up any questions you may have about the breed. They can also give you some insight into how retired race dog rescue works. Dogs are a big responsibility that you shouldn't take lightly, but if you prepare yourself and do your research you can face the challenges with confidence.

As many here have said: ALWAYS DO YOUR RESEARCH BEFORE ADOPTING ANY ANIMAL. ALWAYS, ALWAYS, ALWAYS! 
		-- u/[deleted], 75831 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Guys if you're in in the drug store buy a 10 pack ($2) of those black hair rubber bands and keep them in your glove box. I've been the hero to countless women this way.

I had an ex-girlfriend who was always losing those black scrunchy rubber band hair ties, so I bought her a 10 pack on the condition that I keep them in my truck. She went through a few,  but many times I'm with other girls and I see them fret about their hair when it's hot or windy,  or worse: "Can you take me to the store,  I need hair bands".   Oh hell no.  

"Uhh, actually I have some new ones in my truck". 

100 Points for this guy.
		-- u/Imaneight, 45592 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Guys-Get your colonoscopies

 

I'm 48 years old. A little over ten years ago I was in the car pickup line at my daughter's school. She was in second grade. It was a warm spring day so we were all standing around outside our cars. This chubby guy was standing outside an orange Mini Cooper. I nodded and made the random nice car comment. He said its name was Oliver. Oh, like Hammond's car in Top Gear? His eyes lit up. Friendliest guy in the world, he came over and we started chatting. Found out we had nearly everything in common, and were best friends from that moment forward.

It's so rare to make any friends in your 30s with a family, much less a best bud. Our daughters were the same age and were immediate best friends too. Same with our wives. It was weird, we were all so much alike and got on so well. I helped them move, Joe helped me with some projects at home. We went to see Deadpool about a dozen times.

Last summer Joe, in his early 40s, had been having some stomach issues for a few weeks, then passed out at work. They did tests. Found a sizeable tumor in his colon. Chemo. Surgery. Complications. Another surgery. Another. More chemo when the last surgery found that the cancer had "spread significantly."

Joe was brought home from the hospital a couple days ago to be put in hospice. My wife and I are going over to see him later this afternoon.

To say goodbye.

I'm loading up a couple episodes of Top Gear on my tablet and am going to just sit with my buddy one more time.

Guys... Get checked. Get your colonoscopies. If something doesn't feel right, go to the doctor immediately and get it checked.

-----------
Editing to add because it looks like a common question. I'm no doc but I saw a GI doc comment that the current recommendation is for all adults over 45 to get a colonoscopy, potentially earlier if you have family history. 

And thank you everyone for the kind words. Wife and I are about to head over to Joe's. Gotta hold it together for him. I can cry in the car afterward.

------------
Evening edit. Got to sit with my buddy for awhile. He mostly slept. Woke up a couple times and held my hand. It was good to see him and remember all the laughs. Made it home before I bawled my eyes out.
		-- u/John_Wik, 54906 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Gym closed and won't respond to your emails asking to suspended your gym membership? Call the bank and order a 1 year stop payment to them, most banks are currently waiving the fee for this. Also, fuck Anytime Fitness.

		-- u/co1one1huntergathers, 106956 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: HR can't be on your side unless you make them

Hey, everyone. HR worker here, and I hope everyone can benefit from this.

By definition, Human Resources is there to protect the company from lawsuits, not to help the employees. 

As much as we HR people want to help you and protect the worker, it'll cost us our jobs if we put you over the company. So the best tip I can give you is this:

Don't ask HR for help. Make them.

Get evidence. Document interactions. Get things in writing. The more you have as proof of whatever your complaint is, the more HR will have to help you. If you show them you have proof that will support a lawsuit, they will do everything they can to make sure it doesn't need to happen, and the easier it is for us to justify it to our bosses. 

Help us help you.

Edit: Please stop calling me a heartless, soulless monster who will fire people to keep my job. I *lost* my last job because I stood up for my colleagues. All I'm trying to say is that, in this economy, your HR rep can't always afford to stake their job for you, and you shouldn't go into an HR meeting expecting them to.
		-- u/Kari-kateora, 49666 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Have your kids lead you back to your car or home anytime you are out and about, to develop navigation and memory skills.

Super effective way to build kids independence, confidence and navigation skills. I do this anytime I take them hiking, fishing, shopping, etc. Can you find where we parked? Can you get us from this spot on the hiking trail back to our home?
		-- u/yourmamasgravy, 38922 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: High schoolers, dont think you have to go to college to be successful. Not great at school?, look at learning a trade. You can make a good, sustainable income as an electrician, plumber, welder, etc. You can enroll in a technical college, or better yet find a apprenticeship at a larger company

Wow didnt think this would blow up over night, thanks for all the advice anyone.

I personally graduated an electrical apprenticeship at a shipyard after failing out of college twice.  I wish I found the apprenticeship straight out of high school, but my school, and I'm sure many others, really pushed you to get a degree.

I now work for a military contractor making a pretty good wage.  I encourage anyone looking to get into an apprenticeship to reach out to their local trade union. Not only will they provide quality OJT, but most places will provide a free college degree like mine did.
		-- u/xjxhsyzg, 64418 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: How hungry you are is a measure of how soon you should eat, not how much you should eat.

		-- u/snow__boy_, 44348 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: How to quickly unstuff your nose.

I have seasonal allergies and it seems that no matter how many times I blow my nose, it’s still stuffed. My doctor taught me a trick:

**0) Wash your hands**

1) Inhale lightly

2) Exhale completely then hold your breath

3) Pinch your nose shut then nod your head like you’re agreeing with someone until you get the urge to breathe

4) Inhale and repeat 3-5 times

Works every time for me
		-- u/OofDotWav, 44989 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: I'm 43. By your late 20's/early 30's, make sure physical fitness becomes an absolute top priority.

I started a dedicated fitness regimen when I was 28 to improve my odds with a girl. Didn't work on the girl. What did work was that the routine stuck. Now pushing my mid-forties, I can't believe where I am physically compared to many others my age. Also scary is how they regard physical deterioration as an inevitability. It isn't. Get started now. It will be one of the greatest gifts you'll ever give yourself.
		-- u/Jdubs101111, 114113 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: I've used the Occupational Outlook Handbook for decades to determine what it would take to get a job in a field and how much my work is worth. I am shocked how few people know it exists.

It gives the median income by region for many jobs. How much education you need (college, training, certs). How many jobs in the US there are, as well as projected growth. I've used it to negotiate for raises. It is seriously an amazing tool. https://www.bls.gov/ooh/
		-- u/PieceMaker42, 50649 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If I (cashier) gives you a discount while shopping at our store don't demand the same discount with another member of staff next time, we were feeling kind, don't get us in trouble.

Edit: Reddit detectives have found my steam (not well hidden)
		-- u/Fisher9000, 69479 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: If Word crashes or shuts down and your document didn't save, search ".asd" in the file Explorer under "This/My PC". It should be there.

		-- u/JUSTplayIN25, 51291 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If a 'news' medium uses inflammatory language, like 'crazy', 'owned', 'delusional', etc., it's not real news, but a propaganda outlet.

		-- u/[deleted], 43469 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If a company has a chat feature, chat with a representative instead of calling. Then save your chat transcript. That way you have written proof in the even a company tries to screw you over about a service.

Had to use this against Mediacom to stop them from applying “Tech-Fees” and “One-Time-Charges” to my bill. 
		-- u/btrocke, 44170 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If a company offers you a temporary position with the potential for a full-time position at the end of your agreed-upon time of temporary work, then ask them for the details of the full-time position. At that point you can tell whether or not there really is a full-time position available.

So I just spent the last two and a half months working for a company as seasonal labor. Customer service during the busy time of the year. Over the past couple months all 13 people who were hired as seasonal have been told that 3 full-time positions would be given out to those with the best performance.

Now that the the date for our temporary position is two days away they have sent emails to people informing them of whether or not they received a position. the email stated that there was only a limited number of full-time positions and unfortunately you were not the one chosen.. As if they thought we would not talk amongst ourselves we found out that all 13 people were told the same thing.

In other words there were no full-time positions.

One person in our group was the smart one. When they got hired on they asked to see details of pay, benefits and the likely schedule of the potential full-time position. The job recruiter could not provide this at all. She said that they dodged this question multiple times and she knew right then and there that there would be no full-time positions given to anyone. Because the position did not exist.

So from now on when I get hired on a temporary basis with an expectation that it can lead to a full-time position I will be asking for the details of that potential job and you should too.
		-- u/missingmytowel, 62331 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If a company reaches out to you about a position and they attempt to give you a lower salary than you expected. Always ask if there are any other positions that will meet your salary requirements.

I was in a phone interview and was given a salary way below my range. I was speaking to the regional manager about why my desired salary was what it was and I expressed I would be willing to negotiate a higher position to meet my desired salary. He happily let me know he would discuss with his team about a solution to this problem not even an hour later they went ahead and offered me a higher position with 30% more pay.

Edit: To clarify I ended up with my desired salary plus 30%. Well it looks like I made it to the front page boyos thanks for the fake internet points I will cherish them forever!

Edit 2: oh wow my very first award I thank you greatly kind stranger! You are way too kind and I hope that award finds its way back to you some way!
		-- u/onehashbrown, 37870 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If a credit card of finance offer excludes residents of Iowa, you probably shouldn’t apply.

If you pay close enough attention, you might notice that a fair amount of finance offers exclude Iowa residents. This is because Iowa has some of the most robust consumer credit laws around that - among other things - put limits on interest rates and late payment penalties, AKA, helping prevent predatory loan practices. This isn’t to say that *all* companies who don’t do business with Iowa residents are predatory, but I don’t think I’d want to take out a loan with a company that won’t do business with consumers who have laws that protect them from being abused by creditors.

https://www.doctorofcredit.com/why-are-some-credit-card-offers-not-available-to-residents-of-iowa/

https://www.legis.iowa.gov/docs/ACO/IC/LINC/Chapter.537.pdf
		-- u/killgoresalmonman, 57895 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If a friend ever asks you how you’re doing, always ask them back. They may actually want to talk about how they’re doing but are unsure about how to start that conversation.

Edit: Should’ve clarified, I’ve got social anxiety and find it difficult to have long conversations especially about myself. My friends know this and recognise it as an attempt to let out how I’m feeling.
		-- u/goodbyemrmoonman, 53861 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If a loved one passes away, make them proud instead of throwing your life away.

Hi!

So when i was 10 years old (13 now) my dad passed away of a stroke.

It was a rough 3 weeks and school was a total mess. I finished my year (year 6) and we decided to move to another city. So during year 7 I was still pretty messed up. My grades went from pretty good to really bad. I finished the year with 18 pts (pretty bad-ish for Switzerland) the next school year is a big year academically. You need to get 20 pts to get into VP (Voie Prégymnasiale) basically sends you automatically to college/HS (idk lol) once you finish 11th grade. 

Anyways I realized that nothing that I ever did or say would bring my father back. So after grieving for what seemed like and eternity I decided to make him proud instead of failing.

Here’s how I did it.

After my worst year in school ever I went back in and started to put in some effort. I paid attention, I studied hard at home. When exams where approaching I studied like never before. (4+ hours every day) I got very good results from this. Finished the year with 21 /24 pts and got into VP.

I also had to deal with a new school and I had to try and make new friends which was not easy.

In summary:

In the beginning it will hurt. A lot. But overtime you will learn that it’s more important to shoot for the sky’s rather than fall to the ground. I kept my motivation and dignity to help myself and make my father proud.

In the end it paid off.

Edit: Wow! I did NOT expect that to do so well. Words could not express how grateful I am to see the response in general let alone the awards. I’ll try my best to respond to all of you but no promises. Thank you so much.

Edit 2: so apparently my message didn’t really come across the full way. Yes a dead person can not feel pride, my point is:

Make yourself proud and do what you think is best for you and do what you *think* would make a deceased loved one proud. This (in my case) worked for me but every person has their different way of grieving and their different way of going about things going forward. Also try your best to pull yourself up no matter how hard life throws you down. I know some people just can’t because of their own guilt or sorrow but at least try.

If you fail I wish you can one day succeed in all of your endeavors and dreams.

Oh and to all of you people that live to downvote comments that make me feel *actually* better

Seriously, fuck you.
		-- u/[deleted], 42255 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If a motorcyclist pats his or her head with an open palm, it means cops or danger ahead.

		-- u/ramboStallone965, 51378 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If a server or cashier at a restaurant gives you extra of something for no charge, and you are later asked by a manager if that employee was doing their job well, don't mention that they gave you extra food. It could potentially get them in trouble.

Edit: I posted at lunch and just got home from school to find this. This is the most polarized comment section I have ever seen. I'm so sorry
		-- u/TRON17, 50914 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If a service dog without a person approaches you, it means that the person is in need of help.

[Explained here- I found this and thought it was really useful for people to know](http://lumpatronics.tumblr.com/post/174840086944/service-dog-psa)
		-- u/_Ryanite_, 70801 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If a service dog without a person approaches you, it means the person is down and in need of help.

Well a post that I cropped from r/ULPT is my highest upvoted thing so cool...
		-- u/Quantanamo-Bae, 40536 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If a supervisor ever asks you to do something that you know violates policy or is morally questionable/shady, ask them to send you the request in an e-mail/text message as a reminder.

Many times they will not be willing to write out their request and you can get out of doing it. If they do write it out, you now have evidence of their request directly tied to their e-mail account. If they send an e-mail but try to leave parts out, you can just ask for clarification in your reply (I.e "Thanks for reminding me, did you want me to remove all the safety signs or just the ones in the main hallway?")
		-- u/knowledgekills12, 48605 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: If an advertisement for an American flag says not available in Minnesota, it normally means the flag was not made in the USA. MN has a law requiring American made American flags.

		-- u/mdsram, 69558 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: If an aggressive person comes in to complain about something you have no control over, take out a piece of paper and write it down

I work at an office and we have very angry people come in every now and then, I write down every noun and repeat it back to them every couple lines with “uh huh, okay” and they calm down because they feel like they’re being listened to and validated. It's something I started because this old guy came in and demanded I write what he was saying down and I just haven’t stopped since. As long as they see you’re writing they’re more inclined to be nicer to you because you’re making an effort to take care of their concern

Of course, I throw the paper out after they leave because it isn’t my job

Edit: It appears no one is reading my responses in the comments and is writing very elaborate fanfiction about my work ethic and commitments to my job in the comments, I try my best to help out where I can, the papers that I throw out are a compilation of all their racist and or homophobic rambling 

Yes, I can make sure someone comes to check out your internet.

No I cannot deport your neighbors, but I can ask them to quiet down a bit. 
(Deportation part gets scrapped - I draft an email or make a phonecall about the noise)
		-- u/retrospection_, 53388 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If an employer says you have to treat an entry level job as more than just a job to be successful, that's key for you'll be overworked and underpaid.

		-- u/Hitlers2ndNut, 52896 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If an entry level job lists "Sales" as one of the responsibilities you can safely ignore anything else listed, that will be your job.

There are a plague of "companies" (fronts) out there that prey on college grads (particularly grads that don't have an immediately applicable non STEM degree) desperate for a job or retail workers that desperately want out of the big box retail store scene. They will list these jobs as being "Event Coordinators" or "Marketing Associates". It's a lie, you can find these people at stores like Costco trying to sell some useless appliance that no one wants or going door to door trying to sell other appliances that no one wants.

And the recruiters that craft these resumes are VERY good at just bending the truth enough that  what is on the job description isn't technically a lie, but any reasonable person's interpretation of the description is nothing like the reality of the position. That's why the title is what it is: if they list sales, that is what you will be doing and nothing else.

An easy way to avoid this is to google the name of the company you are applying to. Either nothing will come up or they will be associated with other companies that are accused of doing the same thing.

TLDR: Be careful which companies you invest time into when you are applying and interviewing for a job.

Edit: Something that I should have clarified is that I don't have a problem with sales jobs or people that work them. The point is that if the company feels the need to hide what the job is or lie about it on the description, something isn't right.

Edit 2: Thank you for all the awards kind strangers. I think this is the first real post I've put up on Reddit and the fact that it blew up so much is really encouraging.

Edit 3: I've been told that the majority of these types of jobs can be found under the umbrella of two companies named Cydcor and Smart Circle. 
		-- u/[deleted], 60636 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If caring for someone who is bedridden mount a bird feeder outside their window. It can provide calming entertainment. Take it to the next level and get them a bird book for that particular region.

Please check local regulations and DNR requests about bird feeders in your area. TIL there is some concern about a mystery bird disease in the mid-Atlanti region of the US.
		-- u/Crazywhatwhat, 41006 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If clothes or towels have a mildew smell, add some plain white vinegar to the washing machine, along with detergent, for the freshest smelling laundry ever. Note: Clothes will NOT smell like vinegar. It is highly diluted as well as going through the rinse cycle. Tried and true. Thanks Grandma!

To freshen a load of laundry, try 2 cups of distilled white vinegar. For mildew odors you can double and triple this amount. Hot or warm water works best. I have a top loading machine — I let the drum fill with water and put the vinegar in once it fills, right on top of the clothes. I’ve had my washing machine over 10 years and vinegar hasn’t shortened the life of my machine or my laundry for that matter. I have used an entire gallon on kids clothes that came back from summer camp filthy and damp with the worst mildew smell. It also works as a fabric softener. It’s the best. 
		-- u/[deleted], 57126 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If ever you need a program you want for free (for example a video/photo editor) don't search for "free", search for "open source" to avoid limited trial versions, adverts and malware

The reasoning being if you type "free", generally you will be advertised to or get the LITE version which will only have some of the functionality and then will be up-sold to.

Open source does what it says on the tin - the code is open for anyone to examine and even adapt and is usually available in-full for free, occasionally accepting donations if you are so inclined. 

This has the added bonus of ensuring there are no nasties like crapware or reporting your user history back to their servers etc. because open-source equates to peer-reviewed and open to be examined by anyone.

EDIT: just because it was mentioned, being open source doesn't MEAN that a program is virus-free, but it is a substantially lower risk than closed-source software. Either way, you would be better off with open-source in general.

I am assuming you will be excising a modest amount of caution with what you download by checking it against trusted reviewers/communities.

Edit 2:

As this thread has gained a lot of traction let's address some points: Yes, we know you can torrent a paid-for application. Hilarious as it is for you to keep posting it, you don't need to tell us. Open source is still valid for those of us who believe in privacy, transparency and actually supporting a developer. We are aware of pirating websites, I promise.

Point 2: "Free speech, free beer!"

&gt;usually available in-full for free

&gt;usually

&gt;*usually*

&gt;**usually**

Programs:

&gt;Photoshop = GIMP

&gt;Lightroom = Darktable

&gt;Adobe Illustrator = Inkscape

&gt;Video Editor/3D modeler = Blender

&gt;Video Editor = Kdenlive

&gt;Media Player = VLC (find a video format it can't play, I dare you!)

&gt;Streaming/recording software = OBS

&gt;Windows = Linux - Ubuntu with Cinamon or MATE desktop environment is the most Windows-like, ~~else-wise, there's actually an Open Source Windows called Windows 10 IoT Core (not really for desktop use though)~~ sorry not open source.

&gt;Microsoft Office = LibreOffice

&gt;Food = ha.ha. But it actually exists [in a manner of speaking](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yYB559Is9Y0)

&gt;Minecraft = [actually a thing](https://minecraft.net/en-us/edition/pi/)

&gt;Unzipping program = 7Zip

&gt;Java = OpenJDK (though Oracle Java might be open source anyway)

&gt;Virtualization = there are a few choices, but for non-commercial use, VirtualBox would be the way to go.

&gt;Browser = Chromium (not chrome) or Firefox.

My favourite iTunes alternative is Foobar2000, but I don't believe it's open source. I've heard good things about Audacious, which is, though.

Please remember to support open source software you like with donations if you can swing it - the developers deserve a kickback!
		-- u/TheGentGaming, 60859 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If friends or family ask to borrow money, just consider it given away. If you absolutely need repayment, you can't afford to lend it. Having serious expectations of repayment may likely damage your relationship. If they repay you, great. If not, you just gave them a gift

		-- u/[deleted], 63894 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If making a PBJ sandwich for later consumption, put PB on both sides of the bread and the jelly in the middle. This will keep your bread from soaking up the jelly and getting soggy.

This also works with other sandwiches that use dressing. Place the meat on the bun and the dressing in the middle.

Edit: I worded that poorly. I meant butter both internal sides of the sandwich. Or both slices. It’s not that big of a deal though, we have all made sandwiches before, so we know what’s being said here. 

Also, thanks for the awards and upvotes.
		-- u/Obiwan_ca_blowme, 45193 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone asks you a question that can be easily googled, please consider the fact that this person might just want to talk with you.

		-- u/[deleted], 57876 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone close to you has passed away, wait a week or so before sending food or a phone call to their family members. After watching my grandmother get exhausted from phone calls and receiving baskets of cookies, I saw how much she'd appreciate this when everything quiets down.

My grandfather passed away yesterday. Everyone calling in wanted to express their condolences and share their own grief. She received two giant baskets of cookies, a giant gift box of deli meat and salads, and with no room in the fridge, she had to either throw a lot of food away or find someone else to give it to. I could see her grow more and more tired of the calls as the day went on, leaving her to ignore calls.

Especially with it being harder for people to visit her, I know she'd appreciate a call of kindness or some extra treats later on, when she has more time to receive calls and get through all the food in her fridge.
		-- u/Jcrap, 43962 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone comes to you upset about something, don't try to solve their problem right away. Most people just want to feel heard and validated.

Your priority should be to help them process how they're feeling, then you can tackle the problem later. So instead of immediately offering solutions, try acknowledging the person's feelings and the legitimacy of the problem they're facing.

For example, instead of...

* "Why don't you try to do..."
* "What have you done to fix it?"
* "How can I make it better?"

Try using...

* "Wow, that does sound really tough."
* "I can't imagine how hard that must be for you."
* "I would absolutely feel sad/angry/frustrated too..."

If you're not sure what someone needs, asking can be as simple as "That sounds really tough. Is there anything I can do to help or do you just want to talk about it?"

Edit: Post is blowing up yadda yadda yadda - be good to each other and [enjoy these pics of my dog](https://www.instagram.com/chancethepupper_412/)!
		-- u/_To_Shreds_You_Say, 36835 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone doesn't appreciate something you do for them, it probably means that it isn't that important to them. Rather than stew about it or demand recognition, just add it to the list of things you don't need to do anymore.

Or, if it just needs to get done, suck it up, buttercup. We don't get gold stars for effort in real life.

An example of what I'm talking about here is that I used to make my husband a cup of coffee and bring it to him every morning. Often he would barely even acknowledge me putting down the coffee much less thank me for it.  At first, this bothered me, how could he not appreciate this nice, loving gesture and getting fresh coffee served to you in the morning?  The answer is that he really doesn't mind making his own coffee and doesn't notice much whether I do it or not. Now I don't bother and it's one less thing on my mind in the morning.

I also noticed that I was organizing a lot of light social events at work - birthday lunches, holiday parties, happy hours, etc. People would come but nobody ever really made a point to say  that they appreciated I was doing it. I stopped bothering most of the time and nobody really noticed and it frees up a lot of my time. Now I only do it if I feel like having drinks out or giving a friend a lunch party.

These are all things *I* would appreciate if someone did *for me* but that doesn't mean everyone else feels the same way.
		-- u/zazzlekdazzle, 58832 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone doesn't understand something you're explaining to them, treat it as your fault for failing to explain effectively, not their fault for not understanding.

I've recently realized this is the root of most of the communication issues with my friends and family. I would try to explain something, for example: how to run the new dishwasher. If they failed to understand the process, I would get angry (not at them, just in general) and they would see it as a critique of their intelligence. The discussion would quickly turn into an argument and in the end everyone would just hate the new dishwasher. 

So I started acting like it was my failure to explain the situation...even if it wasn't. It totally changed the tone of my voice and made the person I was talking to more receptive to my instructions. Instead of turning into an argument or debate, it turns into a constructive teaching opportunity.

		-- u/wewantthefolk, 44602 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone flashes their lights at you, there is something bad ahead. Usually animals crossing or police.

Born and raised in GA. Just had a friend driving that didn't know what it meant. We saw a cop with his lights off shortly after. If my friend didn't know, someone else doesn't know. Stay safe!

Edit: It might also mean your head lights are off, or your brights are on.
		-- u/xbleuguyx, 37111 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone gifts you something great, take a photo of yourself using/enjoying it and send it to them. Sometimes that speaks louder than simply saying thanks

		-- u/livebythem, 44398 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone grabs your iPhone and you have FaceID enabled, you can prevent them from unlocking it (by pointing it at your face) by saying, “Hey Siri, whose phone is this?” That phrase will cause Siri to disable FaceID, and the only way to unlock your phone will be via the passcode.

		-- u/Kombatnt, 44531 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone has poor mental health, whether it’s depression/anxiety, bi-polar disorder or OCD, and is treating you badly, you are 100% allowed to defend yourself and call them out. If they refuse to seek help, it is not your job to convince them, walk away and save yourself the headache.

I am sick and tired of the horror stories I hear of men and women trapped in crappy relationships and friendships, too afraid to speak out and defend themselves because the other person is severely depressed and “too fragile” for criticism. But then that same person will be treating the people around them like absolute shit on a daily basis, then playing the victim when confronted.

People who do this and outright refuse help, do not deserve your time and effort because they have chosen to be a martyr. All they will do is drag you down like an energy vampire and you do not need that kind of negativity in your life.
		-- u/tittychittybangbang, 50997 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone has problems, don't ask "have you tried (this or that)?", but ask "what have you tried?". That way you don't imply that they are too stupid to try out the most logical solutions.

		-- u/[deleted], 39391 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone in your family is the “designated picture taker” make sure you snap some candid shots of them. Often they are missing from most photo albums and later in life it can make all the difference having them included.

		-- u/[deleted], 43201 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone introduces themselves to you, and their name makes you think of a funny joke, they've already heard it. A thousand times.

No, your joke isn't creative.  Yes, they know the reference.  They've heard it many times before. And a good chance that even if they say "haha, that's a new one" it probably isn't and they just want to spare your feelings.  In fact, not acknowledging the low hanging fruit and simply responding with your own name will probably be more appreciated by them and they will think of you as more mature and likable.
		-- u/cwutididthar, 54222 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone is getting worked up and overexcited and frustrated about a topic, they're probably just venting and not asking for advice. Be there to listen, not to lecture.

		-- u/KneeDeep185, 37483 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone is going through a hard time/crisis (death in the family, etc.) don't call and ask, "How can I help?" Instead, suggest some things you are wiling to do: "Can I pick up up some groceries for you/walk your dog for a few days/send over a casserole/babysit your kids?" &lt;more below&gt;

I'll add that if you are a family member, or very close friend you can obviously just ASK. But if you're not, it can be hard for the grieving person to know what, exactly, you're willing to do, so let them know the sorts of things you can do.

This lets the suffering person understand the ways you're willing to help, and gives them some prompts on what they need.
		-- u/97Edgewood, 49148 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone is mad at you, give them enough time to calm down before trying to talk with them. People often don’t think logically when they are upset so trying to solve a situation while they are still mad can make matters worse quickly.

		-- u/Racing_in_the_street, 39801 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone slights/insults you publicly during a meeting, pretend like you didn't hear them the first time and politely ask them to repeat themself. They'll either double-down  repeat the insult again, making them look rude  unprofessional. Or they'll realize their mistake  apologize to you.

		-- u/brandonmcgritle, 106803 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone tells you about an event in their life coming up, add it to your calendar. So you can follow up with them after no matter how big or small it is. Makes you a better friend.

		-- u/[deleted], 45829 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If someone you love is living with dementia or Alzheimer's, don't correct their mistaken memories — say "yes, and" and treat it like an improv game

Just lost my pop to a long fight with Alzheimer's. It sucked watching the kind, warm, and generous man I knew become a shell of his former self.

During his decline, he showed all the hallmarks of the disease: forgetting family faces and names, telling stories about false memories, and, in the end, a bit of belligerence (the kind you might typically see in a toddler).

Throughout his decline, I saw my family approach it in one of two ways: some would try to correct his mistakes over and over (to no avail), and some would just roll with the punches.

Playing along with things in the moment always seemed to keep him more centered and grounded. Not only did it help calm him down, it made those painful visits a little less so by knowing he felt comforted by my validating his reality, and not trying to yank him out of whatever timeline/alternate universe he was visiting.

A simple example would be if he asked where his (long dead) mother was, I would just say "she's visiting with your sister and will be back soon." What good would correcting him do? Then he'd have to re-live that trauma of losing his mom all over again, possibly many times a day.

Or when he would say something outlandish like, "I used to be a senator, you know" I would just say, "oh that's right, I forgot all about that, tell me more!"

I have to give credit to a [TEDMED talk](https://www.tedmed.com/talks/show?id=526821) that I saw describing this whole approach, many years ago. I'm so glad I saw it because it absolutely changed the way I spent time with my dad, and made it easier, richer, and more gratifying in spite of the misery of the disease. Hope it helps you, too.

And fuck you, Alzheimer's.

Edit: I can’t keep up with all the replies and awards, but I am so grateful to everyone for your kind words. I’m glad you’re able to find this useful; it totally changed how I talked with my dad    

Best wishes to all of you.

Edit 2: This is not a magic wand that wipes dementia away. It’s an approach to managing some of the challenges of its effects. I am definitely not a doctor, do not take this as medical advice. YMMV depending on each individual.

Edit 3: For the love of god, the (attempted) political jokes are just not landing, please stop. You’re embarrassing yourself.
		-- u/el_chacal, 57061 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If the IRS calls you, it is a scam. The IRS will always start contact you through the US Postal Service.

		-- u/CommanderNightHawk, 58953 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If the IRS calls you, it is a scam. The IRS will always start contact you through the US Postal Service.

		-- u/unhombremejor, 53258 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If there is anyone at your job you don’t like, always take special care not to take vacation at the same time as them. Having toxic/stressful people gone from the office is like a mini vacation by itself that you would miss out on if you are gone.

		-- u/AweHellYo, 72810 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If you accidentally press the spacebar and scroll down the page, you can press Shift+Space and go back to where you were

		-- u/Myst1kSkorpioN, 49876 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you answer a call on speakerphone, literally the first words out of your mouth should be "Hey, you're on speakerphone"

Edit: Yes, your regular earpiece can be louder than you think, and at full volume it can be loud enough for other people to hear even if you think you're having a private conversation. Please keep that in mind

Even if you think you're alone, you might have left a window open, and your walls and doors are probably thinner than you think. It's just a good habit to make.

Edit: Yes, you should probably also mention who is on speakerphone with you, especially at work.

Edit: Also, if you answer someone on speakerphone without telling them and you KNOW there are people around you, you're a colossal tactless fuck and I hope they talk about your most embarrassing secret because you deserve it, since they could just as easily start talking about their own most embarrassing secret.

Edit: It's not just about talking shit on other people in the room! I refer you to the above edit. Someone might call you to tell you their child has cancer, or they might be getting a divorce, and it's not THEIR responsibility to make sure they're NOT on speakerphone to not reveal their personal information that they don't want random people knowing. BE A GOOD FRIEND

Edit: the real LPT is not to use speakerphone unless you're on a conference call and the person calling already knows that. If you need to be hands-free, use bluetooth headphones

Edit: No, I don't have a (recent) story here. I was inspired to make this post after reading a story on AITA: https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/comments/hjk9qa/aita_boyfriend_is_mad_i_told_him_he_has_covid19/
		-- u/ohdeargodnotthisguy, 46740 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are a student and are moving into a new leased house, take a picture of every wall, closet, cupboard and furniture.

This way, if the house owner/landlord is trying to take your deposit or claiming damage at the end of your lease, you can show him the pictures. Take a picture, even of the **FLOOR**. Make sure the date and time are stamped on the pictures as well. This can be best done by emailing the videos/photos to yourself.

Edit : **This applies to ANYONE leasing/renting, not just students.**

A video walkthrough is also a good method.

I'll be adding tips from others in the comments as well.

Edit 2: Thank you kind redditors for the awards. I hope this tip saves you and other you know some money. :)
		-- u/FlaminGummy, 58355 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are always worrying if you did something after leaving home, like locking the door or turning off the stove, get in the habit of speaking out the actions as you do it. Saying "I'm turning the stove off." while you do it creates a more concrete memory and will put your mind at ease.

		-- u/[deleted], 41492 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are arrested remain silent. Anything you say can and will be used against you while nothing you say can and will be used for you. Zero benefit to speaking.

Once you start blabbing the cops will write down things you say. Even one slip up or misspoken word can now be used as testimony against you. Innocent people go to jail all the time because of misspoken statements. Prosecutors can and will ignore all the stuff you say that doesn’t help them prosecute you. They can and will use anything that helps them prosecute you even if it is cherry picked from the many things you say. There is zero benefit to you talking since your statements to police can’t be used in your defense.
Sometimes cops can’t remember everything you say in the moment so they write it down later. Now not only do you have the problem of you misspeaking, but you have the possibility that the cop misheard or misinterprets what you said. Since cops are expert witnesses, their testimony is given extra weight in the court room. Go in peace and remain silent.

This is a generally good guideline but of course every situation calls for observation and assessment to determine the best course of action. Also don’t get arrested and this won’t be a problem.
		-- u/mikroscosmo, 51537 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are at work and someone who does not work there asks you for one of your co-workers or when that co-worker's shifts are, do not answer that question. You do not know who that person is or their intentions.

		-- u/starman123, 50496 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are buying anything for your wedding, do not tell the vendors it’s for a wedding. Just say a party. Most companies charge 3-4x for weddings even if it’s the same stuff.

This includes cakes. You can just say it’s for a party before the wedding. Same cake. Hundreds of dollars cheaper.

Edit: I guess I need to clarify a bit. If a vendor is attending the wedding, don’t try to bamboozle them. This is for stuff that you pick up (Tents, chairs, cake, lights, etc.)

Any vendors coming to the wedding should be prepared that it’s a wedding (band, photographer, caterer etc).
		-- u/Cylant, 40110 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are composing an important message, do not enter the recipient until you have finished composing it so that you do not accidentally send an incomplete message.

		-- u/Triblado, 37673 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are doing a secret Santa with a $20 spending limit, instead of buying cheap trinkets, spend the money on a high quality version of a useful item that would typically cost far less (i.e., a $20 pen, bag of coffee, kitchen utensil, etc.)

		-- u/ianisrlycool, 66006 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are doing a task and you're asking yourself if you should be wearing eye or ear protection, then the answer is always yes.

		-- u/EchoStrike_, 71445 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are doing something and a young child asks to help, don't say "no" or "you're too little." Find a way to have them help, even if it's a distraction unrelated to your task, and thank them for helping. This develops positive self-esteem, mindfulness, collaboration, and gratitude.

		-- u/TerminusBest, 61929 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are ever digging in your garden or yard and you suddenly hit sand, there is a high chance that there is a cable buried underneath.

Sand is like a universal «Be careful, there is something underneath.» warning message, so if you suddenly stumble upon sand while digging in your garden/yard, you should proceed with extreme caution.

Edit:  
It seems like people are misunderstanding what I am saying. I am not saying that if there is a cable under the ground it will be covered in sand. I am saying that if you hit sand whilst digging (and it's out of place) then there is likely something underneath it.

You should **always** check for cables *before* digging.
		-- u/[deleted], 45016 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are examining nursing homes to place a loved one, look at the fingernails of the residents living there at the moment. Long fingernails (especially on men) would likely indicate that the home is either understaffed or does not care enough to do such a small task.

		-- u/angryasiancrustacean, 41392 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are flying with someone make sure to divide your clothes

50 percent of your clothes in your parthner's luggage and the other half in yours, if one bag gets lost you'll still have somethnig to dress when you arrive to the destination.

excuse me for poor english, not native speaker.
		-- u/[deleted], 39366 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are going out partying in the evening, clean your apartment/room before so it’s presentable if you bring someone back with you. And when you inevitably go home alone, at least now your place is clean!

		-- u/SvartvikeN, 44138 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in a bad mood, try to calm down before you interact with others. It’s not fair to yell at others because YOU are the one that’s stressed and overwhelmed.

My mother has been really mean to my sister and I lately and is always yelling and on edge. It shouldn’t be my job to walk on eggshells just because she is stressed due to her work.
		-- u/izzypy71c, 64156 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in a management position, your duties go beyond holding team meetings and getting status updates from your subordinates. Your primary responsibility is to enable your subordinates to be successful in their own duties.

Also: If a subordinate comes to you with an issue, they probably aren't just trying to keep you informed but are expecting you to exercise your authority to help them resolve it. It should be a bi-directional working relationship, not just a  passive report of status updates up the management chain.
		-- u/ComCypher, 41500 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in line when the polls close, they are legally required to let you vote.

		-- u/[deleted], 65585 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in your 20s, study Personal Finance like your life depended on it (Investing, 401 (k), Roth IRA (RRSP and TFSA in Canada), credit score, credit and debit cards, debts, loans, bankruptcy, etc.) It's a travesty that it's not mandatory learning in school.

		-- u/CircleBox2, 62434 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in your 20’s-30’s keep older people that you enjoy (co-workers, etc) in your social circle. They can vastly enrich your world view and help you have a more complete view on life.

		-- u/lockday, 39101 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are in your mid to late 20’s make a habit of strengthening your back, hips, and legs.

These muscles and joints are your foundation. Everyone likes to focus on their glamour muscles like shoulders, arms, and abs. While strengthening your abs and core is important, your future self will thank you for strengthening your foundation. 

I’m about to be graduate from medical school and I can’t even begin to describe how important it is to have a stable spine, hips, and knees. People in their 30’s, 40’s, 50’s, and up all complain of having constant back pain. Most of this isn’t caused by things are degenerative disorders (while that can most certainly be the case) but mostly due to a sedentary lifestyles leading weak muscles which further causes joint instability and increased disc and cartilage stress in those joints. 

I’ve seen so many elderly people come in with backs that look like question marks and people in wheelchairs due to severe osteoarthritis in their knees and hips. The best way to prevent this down the road is to strengthen the muscles around joints to give them stability and strengthen the bones themselves through weight lifting.  

The key is to just stay active and try to incorporate exercises or stretches that strengthen your back, hip, and knees. You don’t have to go out and try to deadlift or squat 350lbs. Rome wasn’t built in a day and neither will your muscles and joints. Sedentary? Start with a walk and gradually build from there. Kind of active? Hit the gym and train these muscles. Start slow and light and get used to the movement. Then slowly increase weights. FOCUS ON FORM NOT AMOUNT OF WEIGHT.  Don’t have a workout partner to check your form? Ask one of those jacked dudes at the gym. They have been some of the nicest people I’ve met and are always helpful. (I’m scrawny as hell so it was intimidating the first time not going to lie) Just get moving.

If you’re not sure what exercises to do, try to find physical therapist run websites that recommend exercises for certain muscle groups. The goal goal isn’t to  like Hercules. It’s to invest in your future quality of life. 

TLDR: Exercise, stretch, and strengthen your back, knees, and hips. Start slow and don’t be afraid to ask for help. Your future self will thank you for it. Remember the goal isn’t to look like Arnold in his prime. The goal is to be healthy and active and live a quality life.
		-- u/AnitaDildeaux, 49561 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are invited to someone's home, don't come too early. They might not be ready and you ruin their planning.

		-- u/RobertThorn2022, 59525 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are like me and often have memories of your own past behavior that make you cringe, remind yourself that the fact you are looking back on those moments through that lens shows that you have a growth mindset

		-- u/SymmetricalSolipsist, 36807 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are looking for someone to handle your money, always ask if they are a "fiduciary." A fiduciary is someome required legally and ethically to put their clients interests first over their own. Anyone else is probably just a salesman pretending to be a financial expert.

		-- u/PUZZLESANDCUMPIRES, 38586 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are nervous walking into a new place with a group of people, make sure you are the first to the building. You can hold the door for everyone else making yourself look kind, yet you will be the last one in and can follow everyone elses lead.

		-- u/L8erG8er8, 37270 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are signing a new rental agreement or lease, copy plain text from the old one and the new one into different Word documents. Then use the Review-&gt;Compare feature to see every detail of what your landlord changed.

I just did this with a new lease they emailed out, and found all the little charges they increased or doubled, such as the "after hours non-emergency calls fee" and the "no admittance maintenance fee." They also added a term stating if I fail to notify them of emergency situations that cause damage, they will charge me to repair the damages.
		-- u/9oreos, 52403 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are starting college this year and dealing with COVID closing schools, stay home and do online courses through a local community college to get your Gen Education requirements

College is expensive (suppose this mostly applies to US schools). By getting those easy GenEd classes done online and for cheap, you’ll get the most annoying part of a college degree out of the way for a fraction of the price. Since the state of in-person classes and colleges is up in the air right now, now is the best time to take advantage of a local community college for course credits.

EDIT: Definitely check to see what credits are available for transfer. Gen Ed courses are typically easy to transfer without issue. Certain courses such as a chemistry class for a student wanting to major in Chemistry may be difficult as schools want you to take courses with them instead. Check websites such as assist.org (for California schools) to see if credits are transferable.
		-- u/yanks4life37, 43730 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are using Google Mail, you are provided two unique mail addresses by using either '@googlemail.com' or '@gmail.com' which allows you to create two different accounts for a service with just one address.

I use this i.e. for gaming. Usually I would use an alternative mail account but then I randomly found this out and felt like sharing. Is this commonly known?
		-- u/unsalle, 44511 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you are young and worried about your future, become an electrician/join the trades.

It's a better life and better wage than most. You won't deal with assholes who think their latte is worth yelling at anyone over. You'll get good pay, especially as there is shortage of people in the trades. There isn't a shortage of service workers and that's part of why those jobs tend to suck. 

You'll be in a Union, which means a living wage that gives you more than just getting by, excellent health care, and the ability to plan a future.

Don't want to work the trades all your life? No worries. A good job in the trades can help you pay for community College and avoid crippling debt, or at least allow you to pay for rent/food/books as you do.

Are you POC/LGBTQ+ and worried about racists and homophobia? They're out there, but most good companies don't care, and most people in the trades are solid folks who just want you to not get them injured and show up on time. The nost grizzled fucking guy is ever met was superintendent on multi-story buildings who would break anyone in half, took no shit, gave respect, and spoke openly about his husband. God help anyone who gave him any homophobic crap because they probably can't talk.

The trades represent a different kind of economic power, and a lot of respect. Not kidding. 

My good friend D, a lesbian, wanted to become an electrician but was worried about being accepted. It took her about two days to realize she was more than welcome and could live that dream. 

She bought her first house two years later. Sadly, she died of breast cancer this past February but she went out having lived her dreams with her love by her side. That's what economic power and stability can do for you. 

All my love, and be well.

EDIT: my primary purpose was to encourage youth, but I'm in my 40s and what I wrote applies to anyone: you can make that shift if it's something you want to do. I'm a single parent and I can maintain a 2br home for myself and my kid. In this world I consider that a fucking miracle and I want that for anyone out there experiencing instability and fear of the future. 

In fact, the older you are the more you'll be liked because you are older and "get" shit. Age translated into an aware presence is fucking gold.
		-- u/LaPyramideBastille, 36794 upvotes, 0.75 ratio.
%
LPT: If you bought a game on Steam just before the sale hit, you can refund it and repurchase at the sale price. It's even listed as one of the reasons for refund.

		-- u/picardiamexicana, 49830 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you buy pre-packaged greens like spring mix or spinach, adding a paper towel to the container prolongs the life by at least a week and prevents soggy and wilted leaves.

		-- u/dimicd, 47408 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: If you can smell your own perfume/cologne througout the day, you have used it too much. It will annoy people.

		-- u/termonikov, 39862 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you can smell yourself a little bit, others can smell you a lot.

You grow so accustomed to your own body odour that you eventually don't realise that you have one. When you can start to smell a little bit of your odour then its gotten to the point where you need to seriously take a deep clean. Had to learn this the hard way.
		-- u/Oleflitzer, 75038 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you can't afford the vet, you can't afford the pet.

When considering pet ownership, be aware that at some point in the animal's life, there's a good chance the animal will have an unexpected medical emergency that will cost you several hundred to several thousand dollars, in addition to the cost of annual checkups, grooming, and vaccinations. If you aren't able to budget for that eventuality, don't get the pet.

Edit: This does not mean you can't be a good pet owner unless you are rich. Pets can cost a lot of money, often in unexpected ways. Account for that in your decision to get one. It is a terrible feeling to be in the position of choosing between paying the bills or letting a beloved member of your family die of a treatable issue.

And if you can't afford basic vet care, you shouldn't have a pet. It is 100% dependent on you for it's medical needs, and as it's owner you have an obligation to take care of the animal's health, just as you have an obligation to feed it and give it a loving environment.
		-- u/justhereforthegames, 47797 upvotes, 0.67 ratio.
%
LPT: If you can't clearly see your house number from the street in the middle of the night, neither can your friendly neighborhood firefighters and EMTs.

I'm a city firefighter and if I can't find you, I can't help you.  Lots of times seconds matter.  Before anyone comes at me with "Hurr durr just look for the one that's on fire" remember, we respond to all sorts of emergencies, not just house fires.  And if it is actually a fire, maybe we can get there while it's still small and put it out and save the house *before* it's blowing out of the windows.
  

  
Related: strategically planting bushes to hide that unsightly eyesore of a fire hydrant in your front yard defeats the purpose of putting it out in the open and painting it a bright color.
  

  
**Edit:**  For everyone **still** telling me to just look for the one on fire, that's a great tip.  But even better is finding it, getting everybody out, extinguishing the fire and saving the building *before* the fire is even visible from the street.  If the fire gets so big that it's blowing out of the roof, every living thing inside has likely already died a painful death.
  
And for everyone informing me that GPS is a thing, yes it is helpful but we still need to have visual conformation of the address before we go smashing someone's front door with an axe in the middle of the night.  Also it takes longer to use GPS when seconds matter.  And do you really want me taking my eyes off the road to look at a screen when I'm weaving through city traffic in a 50,000 LB truck?
		-- u/mtd074, 45338 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you constantly vent your problems to someone, make sure to also call them when things are going well. Good listeners can sometimes get overwhelmed, and it's nice to hear positive news.

		-- u/anthson, 54386 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you decide to volunteer to give up your seat on an overbooked flight, don't just take the offer. Tell the gate agent "toss in another $200 (or more/less depending on your best judgment), and I'll go for it." They'll almost always say OK, because a willing volunteer is worth it.

Also, if they offer to give you a meal voucher, ask for a day pass to their first class club.  There will be food there anyway, and they'll have nice seating and other amenities.
		-- u/grantchart, 40070 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: If you do charity work, invite those you know to join you. Many people would happily participate in charity work but don't for fear of not knowing anyone in the group.

		-- u/definitelyged, 41192 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you don't drink but still go to bars for social events, ask the bartender to give you a soda but make it look like a cocktail. All bartenders will do this if asked. Enjoy being spared the tons of "why aren't you drinking?' questions.

I don't drink simply because I don't enjoy alcohol. However, I still enjoy going to bars to socialize with friends. If I am clearly just drinking water, I am always inundated with questions about why I'm not drinking. People get very nervous drinking around a sober person. 
I learned this trick from a friend who is a recovering alcoholic and it has made my social life much more enjoyable! I typically ask for a seltzer with a shot of grenadine.
A lot of times the bartender won't even charge you, which is another nice benefit. But remember to tip them regardless!

Edit: but don't go to bars or social events during pandemic

Edit 2: I have gotten the comment many times that you shouldn't be friends with people who judge you for not drinking or pressure you to drink. I 100% AGREE. **However, this is really a problem in large social circles with acquaintances, at family events such as weddings, and especially at work functions. This tip is just a way to avoid being harassed about why you're not drinking in those situations.** It's particularly bad for women, who will get asked so many times if they're pregnant. Sometimes it's more worth it to just fake it than to be confrontational, especially if you want to just relax and enjoy yourself!
		-- u/weezerluva369, 61326 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you don’t have or start a regular workout routine around the house, don’t spend your money on the newest, greatest work out machine out there. The machine will not give you the ambition to workout. Start a routine first and add the machine when are dedicated to working out.

		-- u/ImtheMe, 63032 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you enjoy a movie/show/game/album that you believe was criminally underrated, find a critic that scored it highly and then check out their other reviews since you likely have similar tastes as them.

		-- u/dontcommentonmyname, 43735 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever become homeless, KFC and Dunkin Donuts dumpsters will feed you quite well. I survived 3 years of homelessness because of it.

		-- u/Ice_Hungry, 52066 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever feel lonely just watch streamers with 10 viewers on twitch lol

They will always listen to you, appreciate just you being there. Win-Win for both uwu
		-- u/HentaiSavage, 63443 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever find yourself in an uncomfortable situation, ask a stranger to help you.

Edit: So glad that this can be useful to some of you. Westfield is a chain of shopping centres in the UK, AU,  US. In the moment of panic, I went to the bathroom, I realise too it probably wasn’t the best space to go.

I was at Westfield pretty late writing my thesis paper \~23:00, and after I got up to leave, I noticed the only other guy in the area leave as well. Typically I'm the only left because I stay back past dinner and had thought he would naturally just leave when all the restaurants closed (Westfield closed at midnight, and all shops were closed.) I got some creepy vibes from him so I walked some loops from L3 to L1 and he was still following me. I went to the bathroom to calm myself, spent about 20mins there and called an uber (normally I walk home because it's pretty safe at night, but I felt if I left the centre where there were no cameras it would be safer to catch a ride). When I came out, I thought I must've spent long enough in there, and he had left but he was sitting on a bench obscured by the elevators ahead. I walked past him as discreetly as possible, towards the parking lot but he got up and followed me too. So I went back round to the supermarket, the only place I knew would still be open and walked around aimlessly until I saw a couple walk in for some late-night grocery shopping. I was afraid to inconvenience them but ended up asking if they could accompany me whilst I waited. I explained I'd been followed and didn't feel safe, and if they could walk with me to the car park where my uber would arrive. They agreed, and once it came, I thanked them and yeeted out of there.

If I had walked home alone maybe something bad could have happened to me, maybe not. All I know is that I didn't feel safe. I don't know who needs to hear this but don't let politeness or fear of inconveniencing someone - it could be stranger, adult, or friend, to stop you from seeking help.

Edit 2: Thank you for your awards, advice and sharing your stories, I’m really overwhelmed how many of you have found this useful. Of course, equally amazed and grateful to know how many of you wouldn’t hesitate to help someone out.

Addressing some comments: Some have mentioned they've encountered similar situations and received no help from the person they asked, I understand the embarrassment that may be felt, but it's alright to ask another person. You know you are more likely to be in danger than you are a danger to others.

Not American, so I wouldn't have protective equipment as it's not legal for the general public to carry them; I didn’t confront them because I didn’t know how they would react and could possibly incite them to harm me; no crime happened so I didn’t think of calling the police, but now I know if the police are willing to escort, it’s valid to be escorted. Sincerely, thank you for all your suggestions.
		-- u/solyana116, 48646 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever find yourself stranded in the middle of nowhere, stay with your vehicle. You are much more likely to be found by searchers and will have shelter if needed.

As a local search for a missing 74 year old hunter enters the fifth day, I'm reminded of what a Search and Rescue worker once told me, "Stay with your car, because we always find the car".  This has proven true in the case of this hunter.  His truck was found stuck in a ditch one day after he was reported missing, but unfortunately he has yet to be found.
		-- u/MorsOmnibusCommunis, 42289 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever get into a car accident and you or someone in your car is injured, especially if there’s blood, take photos before it gets cleaned up.

As a disclaimer, obviously it’s a very hectic situation and definitely only do it if you can without unnecessarily endangering anyone.

But my wife and I got in a car accident last year. I split my head open and got a concussion and got staples in my head. Head injuries bleed a lot, and my wife was smart enough to pull out her phone and snap a couple of gruesome pictures of me with blood sheeting down my face.

Fast forward to now, and my wife mentioned sort of off-hand to our lawyer that we had pictures from the scene. He immediately took them and sent them to the adjuster and today we got their new offer which had almost doubled the money we’d take home.

It’s a bright spot in an otherwise shitty, shitty year, so if you find yourself in an unfortunate situation like that, take those pics and make the most of it.

Edit: As a couple of users pointed out, this is geared more toward Americans. I’m not an expert in the law of any country, but it seems in the EU this may be either illegal or at least unnecessary.

Edit 2: Lot of confusion, so to be clear, I’m not talking about blood on the vehicle (although you should also take pics of that), I’m referring to blood on your person.
		-- u/PieIsFairlyDelicious, 46374 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever need a program you want for free (for example a video/photo editor) don’t search for “free,” search for “open source” to avoid limited trial versions, adverts and malware

		-- u/xhuljanomuca, 67462 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you ever want to cancel a subscription and they allow you to select a reason why, always pick the "it's too expensive" or "I can't afford it right now" option. Odds are they will give you a discount incentive to stay or later on send you an opportunity to try them out again for free.

		-- u/[deleted], 44632 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you feel like you're going to vomit in the near future but not immediately, take an antacid. It will neutralise your stomach acid so when you do vomit it won't burn your throat on the way out. If it's peppermint flavoured it will also make the experience taste less revolving.

		-- u/Snappysnapsnapper, 41693 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you find a faster way to do something at your work, keep it a secret from your manager.

Your work likely values *high performers*, not *process improvers*.

❌ If you tell your boss about a faster way to do something, they will have you do it that way from now on, and you will likely be rewarded with nothing.

✅ If you keep it a secret, you can use your added efficiency to "magically" perform better, and you will likely be rewarded with promotions, praise, and more free time.
		-- u/soccer--girl, 60340 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you find yourself in a conversation, and you can tell the other person doesn’t know your name, drop your name in a third-person anecdote for them.

Work your name into a conversation seamlessly. For example, you can say: My wife is always yelling at me - “Joe, bring out the garbage.” This will help them remember your name in future too.
		-- u/SenorMachoMcBrosef, 39628 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you find yourself in an abusive relationship that is hard to extricate yourself from, get a storage unit.

It doesn’t have to be large. You can pay in cash so as not to leave a trail. You can slowly transfer things of value to that space, because when your SO gets mad, the things you find precious will be the things they destroy first. You can also begin stashing things you need if you pull the “fuck this shit” rip cord, like clothes, toiletries, cash etc. because sometimes when you have to get out, you have to get out fast and leave everything. If times get real bad and you have to bail, you can go there. They are gated and video monitored and your SO will be looking for you at places that you would likely go, like friends or family. If the weather is harsh, you can duck out there for a few hours out of the elements “organizing” your unit.

Edit: I have seen such an outpouring of hope and great advice and experiences. We all learn from each others experience. I hope to continue that feeling of inclusion, that we are all in this together, until we can all find happiness.
		-- u/beefhambone, 65926 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you find yourself in the ER (US) you can negotiate your bill. Never pay the full bill.

I’m on a trip with three doctors right now and they’re ranting about US ER procedures and prices. Apparently, ERs rarely receive payment. This means that you can call the hospital when you receive the bill and negotiate it down to a much lower price. For instance, my gf negotiated her ex’s bill from the ER from $10,000 to $4,000 by guaranteeing payment immediately.

Other tips i’ve picked up from my gf’s parents:

-never order tylenol, advil, anything a family member can bring you.

-if you’re insured **do not sign the form that says you agree to pay what your insurance does not. the er can not turn you away.**

**UPDATE** Let me be *very* clear: I’m not suggesting taking the medications without medical recommendation and clearance. I’m suggesting that you do not take the medication from the ER because the prices are inflated. Instead, have a family member bring you the medication.
		-- u/pineapples4lyfe, 61284 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you fly more than once a year and are not a terrorist, get TSA PreCheck

Or more specifically, get Global Entry. It's $100 and it's good for five years. For $20 a year you get to keep your shoes on, laptops in bags, and absolutely fly through the line. It is absolutely worth every penny. LPT#2: some credit cards will pay for the $100 fee (catch: those credit cards have an annual fee)
		-- u/somehobo606, 37347 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you get a Telemarketer calls you by your name, just say "Sorry, Wrong Number". They are more likely to take you off their calling list since they think they have wrong information profile.

It might be slightly unethical but so are Telemarketers.
		-- u/nooneisanonymous, 42405 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If you get a gut instinct or someone makes you feel uncomfortable, follow it. Even if that person is super popular or “liked”.

		-- u/kouignie, 47757 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If you get a kitten, DO use your hands for play so you can teach restraint when they are too rough. Restraint is naturally learned in play with hands and littermates because the fun stops when a bite or scratch is too much. Adult cats who didn't play this way are more likely to scratch or bite.

Obviously this only works if you shout loudly ("OWW!") and stop playing if a bite or scratch is too hard.

I've only been scratched or bitten by cats that weren't properly socialized in this way. Cats that have been socialized this way have always shown amazing skill at not scratching or biting. For example, I have a cat who goes nuts over a hair tie and I can hold it in my hand as the bats at it without fear because she perfectly and expertly keeps her claws in to avoid scratching my hand, even in the fervor of the chase. But once the hair tie is away from my hand, all claws are out.

Similarly, there was I time I had to quickly grab my cat in a way that hurt her, and she had a natural reaction to crane around and bite my hand in her pain, but it was just a gentile mouth touch, even in her distress. This goes for vet visits, holding cats down to take medicine, cleaning wounds, etc. Properly trained cats will have better restraint around bites or scratches, but cats that never learned restraint are more likely to.
		-- u/brentonstrine, 57068 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a bad experience at a hotel, calmly and politely explaining the situation to a manager will get you a lot more of a discount than throwing a fit or threatening a negative review.

Also, threatening to call the brands corporate line will get you absolutely nowhere. Majority of hotels are franchises and the brand will just call the hotel and ask what they want to do. They can't do anything without the hotels permission.
		-- u/WantedDadorAlive, 66116 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a big problem at work and you need to break the bad news to your boss, try to come up with a couple of ideas for how to fix the issue before you talk to them. It will come off better and help everyone focus on the next steps. Problems happen, always try to be part of the solution.

		-- u/OfficialAndySamberg, 40247 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a dash cam and need to note down a license plate of another driver, simply say it out loud in case the camera can’t pick it up.

		-- u/sarge-m, 43060 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a friend to whom you confess to, during the hard times in your life, ensure that you speak to them about the good things happening too.It sucks when someone only looks to a friend when things are not going so well and makes them feel used, no matter how good a friend they are.

Also ask them how their life is going once in a while. Don’t make it one way traffic.
		-- u/[deleted], 42699 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a good manager you probably don’t realize how often they go to bat for you. If you get a raise or promotion that isn’t as good as you wanted show appreciation anyway. He/she probably tried to get you more and they had to fight just to get you what what they presented to you.

		-- u/Cory55102, 67864 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a guest bedroom in your home, spend a night in it yourself to be sure there are no annoyances and that it is comfortable

		-- u/Swoley_Moley, 55112 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a kid who wakes up everyone way too early on Christmas, wrap a small lego set for them in their room. They can wake up and start their Christmas early with building a toy while everyone else can get some extra time to sleep

Edit: thanks for the awards kind strangers! I was absolutely a day/week late with this but while I don’t have kids I wanted to share something my dad did for me growing up that made the day really special- the Lego set was something I always looked forward to and thought others might like to try as well- happy holidays!
		-- u/bigice75, 60691 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have a senior to check on ask them to "borrow" something small so they think they're helping you.

My mom (72) recently downsized and moved close enough to me that checking on her in person regularly is not really out of my way, but when I was obvious about it she wouldn't let me "stop-by" because she was, "fine". 

Well, one day I actually needed some aluminum foil so I called and asked if I could borrow enough to cover a baking tin because I didn't want to run to the store. She said sure, but when I got to her house she needed furniture moved, a wasp nest removed, and her coffee pot fixed. After I got the foil I mentioned each thing cautiously and she let me take care of them for her. So next weekend I'll need a cup of rice and check on her again.
		-- u/joker_nerd_athlete, 42293 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have aging parents, go through their bills with them and make sure they're paying fair market price for things like cable and energy. My parents were paying over $750 a month for electricity and over $400 for cable.

The plans they had signed up for years ago had expired and their bill just kept going up and up. I was furious by the time I caught it. I can now sign on their accounts and I gave reminders set for when their different contracts expire. I got both bills down to a little less that $200.
		-- u/Boardathome, 42369 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have an Android phone, go to the developer options and set Animation Time to x0.5! Your phone will feel like it's gotten a huge processor update.

Unlock Developer Options:

Settings &gt; About Phone &gt; 7x tap on Build Number

Decrease animation time:

Settings &gt; System &gt; Developer Options &gt; Set all Options with Animation Scale to x0.5 or less

Enjoy your fast phone

Edit: Wow, my first gold, thanks a lot! Glad you guys like the LPT :)

Edit Edit: As others have pointed out, Build Number in Samsung phones is apparently in About Phone &gt; Software info. Also this works on Android devices other than phones.

Edit Edit Edit: The exact options to tweak in Developer options are called Window animation scale, Transition animation scale and Animator duration scale. Alternatively you can also turn the animations off via System &gt; Accessibility &gt; Remove animations!
		-- u/H2Oaq, 56341 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have an alternative reddit account for porn set it to light mode if your main account is on dark mode or vice versa. This way you will immediatly know what account your on when opening the app even before any pictures or videos have loaded. This will prevent you from public embarrassment

		-- u/kartoffelninja, 54656 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have an especially good experience with a customer service person, (in addition to a nice tip, if applicable) be an "anti-Karen" and ask to speak to their manager about what a great job they're doing. It makes the employee's day and can help them get promotions.

I once had a manager who didn't like me that much, but the customers loved me and kept saying so, and now I have that manager's old job. Positive feedback is so rare in customer service. It's 99% complaints about stuff that isn't your fault. But those few kind words from customers helped me get through some hellish shifts and advance in my career.

Edit: Obvs this will vary from workplace to workplace and it can be inconvenient for the employee and manager in question if they're super busy at that moment. Comment consensus tips are: keep praise vague (they may have skirted policy to take care of you), mention the employee by name, fill out any survey on the receipt or at the end of the phone call with max scores and the employee's name so there's a record, tell the employee why you're asking for the manager so they don't get scared, leave a great name-drop review in online spaces, if sliding into the dms of a corporate account be sure to include the store location along with the employees name.

Edit 2: Some of y'all work for shitty managers. That sucks very much and I'm sorry. It's a bad situation that isn't your fault and you deserve better. I hope you'll be able to get out of that job soon and get into something better where you can shine.

Edit 3: "Wow, this blew up" time. Thank you for all the kind messages that came with the awards. They mean more than the awards themselves. It feels like you're telling my manager (reddit) that I'm doing a good job.
		-- u/modestmolerat, 52880 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have an ingrown nail, using dental floss will help.

Doctor showed me this the other day. You slide dental floss under the nail as far as possible and leave a piece on both sides hanging. This will alleviate the pressure and a lot of the pain and after a few days (taking care to change it daily) your nail will start to grow upwards and out of your skin.

Edit: [visual](https://i.redd.it/39j841pg0oc41.png) Courtesy of u/errorcache

Edit 2: Some people only go under the corner that the ingrown is on, it’s a preference thing. Also you just need to put it under the white part of the nail, as well as you can.
		-- u/Rexanne, 59962 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have any questions for the USPS, the fastest way to get an answer is right here on Reddit: r/USPS has actual, knowledgeable employees hanging around being incredibly helpful.

Be sure to be kind to them!  They have had a very hard peak season and even if you don’t have a question for them, it would be nice to tell them how much their hard work means to you and your family this Christmas season!

Edit:  The people at r/USPS don’t know where your package is. They don’t have any better way to track it than you do.
		-- u/[deleted], 37793 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have been eyeing something on Etsy, make sure to favorite that item. The seller will get notified and often directly send you a promo/discount code. It’s a good way to get 10-15% off.

		-- u/miss_micropipette, 38635 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have dashcam footage of someone (especially a pedestrian) trying to commit insurance fraud, get their information before telling them you caught them on tape—then report it to their insurance company.

		-- u/tragoidia, 43363 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have deaf neighbors, get their contact information. They can't hear tornado sirens and you could potentially be the on that saves their lives.

		-- u/nen_del, 39171 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have illegal drugs in your system and find yourself in the hospital PLEASE be honest and disclose exactly what you've taken or what you believe you've taken. Care providers are not the police; the quality of your outcome might depend on such information.

		-- u/BitterPons, 83317 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have parents/grandparents that aren't good with technology, take a picture of their remotes. That way, if you need to talk them through something over the phone, you can guide them to the correct button to press.

		-- u/DetectiveOfTime, 48090 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have to cancel plans with someone, immediately ask them when they are free again in the future and make replacement plans. It makes people feel like you do really care about seeing them and you appear less flaky.

		-- u/DevotedlyHopeless, 38864 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have to give or take names, addresses, serial codes, etc. on your job, take time to learn the NATO phonic alphabet. It will make the communication go much smoother. Plus you'll gain the appreciation if the other person is a pilot.

Alfa, Bravo, Charlie, Delta, Echo, Foxtrot, Golf, Hotel, India, Juliett, Kilo, Lima, Mike, November, Oscar, Papa, Quebec, Romeo, Sierra, Tango, Uniform, Victor, Whiskey, X-ray, Yankee, Zulu.
		-- u/perkisar, 36790 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have to leave your puppy/kitten/ baby animal alone during the day, get them a soft stuffed animal about twice their size. It will help sooth separation anxiety and provide comfort.

		-- u/balfrey, 37813 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you have too much free time and not enough happiness right now, Yale have released their course 'The Science of Well-Being' online for free.

https://www.coursera.org/learn/the-science-of-well-being?ranMID=40328ranEAID=EHFxW6yx8UoranSiteID=EHFxW6yx8Uo-Uci2hsujbjhLhsPVPPWGCgsiteID=EHFxW6yx8Uo-Uci2hsujbjhLhsPVPPWGCgutm_content=10utm_medium=partnersutm_source=linkshareutm_campaign=EHFxW6yx8Uo

Edit: the response to this has been wonderful. I don't mean in karma and awards (give your money to a food bank please!), but in the sincere thanks people have been sending. I will try and respond to everyone who has messaged. We're all in this together friends.
		-- u/dorgoth12, 62153 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you know anyone that has passed from COVID, FEMA has had a program for almost a year now that reimburses up to $9k for funeral expenses. Only 25% have claimed it.

[https://www.fema.gov/disaster/coronavirus/economic/funeral-assistance](https://www.fema.gov/disaster/coronavirus/economic/funeral-assistance)
		-- u/brucekeller, 41725 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you like a lot of Parmesan cheese on your pasta, put it on the pasta and mix it around before you cover it in the sauce. Every noodle will be coated in cheese and covered in sauce. It will change your life.

		-- u/PolyunsaturatedBit, 37618 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If you like buying lottery tickets, start buying cheap stocks instead. It still has the thrill of gambling, the game lasts a lot longer, and the odds of making a million are much much much much much more in your favor mathematically speaking.

Wow!  Thank you for all the awards!  Let me take a moment to address some of the more prevalent comments:

1. Yes, I typed 'stocks' , not socks.

2. I did NOT type 'penny stocks'.

3. I am not giving financial advice, my only goal with this LPT is to alert people to the idea that gambling money can be spent on an appreciating asset, and it still feels fun.

4. The math.  Simply put, if you invest $35, make a 35% gain, 35 times reinvested, you are a millionaire.  Not every stock will win, but selecting 35 winners beats the 300,000,000 : 1 odds of the lottery by leaps and bounds.
		-- u/hyteck9, 43590 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If you like one song by an artist, but don't dig the rest of their stuff. find out who the producer is and see what other work they've done. The producer can play a big role in how the final song turns out.

Edit 1:Woo, front page! All from a stoner moment while listening to black keys - weight of love. 
Love you all!

Edit 2: Obviously this isn't meant to be a blanket statement or a diss towards black keys. Just a way to maybe find some new music. 
Also look into the song writers, or anybody else that was involved with that specific track. 
		-- u/jade_monkey07, 109195 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you like ramen noodles, try shopping at an Asian grocery. They carry better brands than your standard American supermarket.

It may cost up to 4x the cost... so, a dollar, but they usually have 2-4 different flavor packages, and are generally a superior product.

EDIT: thank you everyone for the flair and awards. And for the haters, please understand that people don’t know about things they have never experienced, and growing up black in rural Georgia,  I never went to an Asian supermarket, I didn’t even know such markets existed until I was a young man. As an adult, it never occurred to me to go to one in the first place. Maybe don’t shame people for not knowing things about cross cultural experiences. Go try something new!
		-- u/moby__dick, 50013 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you like to give to the homeless, but are often unprepared when the need arises,buy the $2.50 fleece blankets from Walmart,a case of water bottles  a case of granola bars.Stuff a bottle  granola bar into each blanket; it’s a ready comfort kit for about $4 each,  easy to store in your car

		-- u/[deleted], 56838 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If you liked a song by an artist but did not find the other tracks by the artist to your liking, look up the producer and see his other works. Producers have a lot of say in how the final product turns out.

		-- u/[deleted], 87691 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you live by the Mexican border, photograph your most valuable items as federal agents can now legally search your house without a warrant

The Supreme Court handed down a decision in Egbert v. Boule on Wednesday which effectively gives Border Patrol agents who violate the Constitution total immunity from lawsuits seeking to hold them accountable.
		-- u/SkepticDrinker, 37613 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you live in California, manufacturers of most household electronic goods that sell for more than $100 have to provide spare parts for up to seven years, regardless of warranty status. If they can't make the parts available to you, they have to buy the product back from you.

**Edit - A correction to the title: it’s a** ***wholesale*** **price of $100 or more and they have to either replace it with a like or better product OR buy it back from you.**

**Edit 2** \- wow this blew up. Edited my point about this being ethical as others have correctly commented that just because something is legal does not mean it's ethical. Also, If you are a lawyer or similar and find a factual error with any of this, please let me know and I'll update the post with your advice. Particularly curious as to how best to enforce and how much they'd have to refund if they no longer make parts in the case of something like a cell phone or other electronics.

Descriptive article here: [https://www.latimes.com/business/la-fi-lazarus-20151211-column.html](https://www.latimes.com/business/la-fi-lazarus-20151211-column.html)

Section of the law itself:

&gt;(b) Every manufacturer making an express warranty with respect to an electronic or appliance product described in subdivision (h), (i), (j), or (k) of Section 9801 of the Business and Professions Code, with a wholesale price to the retailer of one hundred dollars ($100) or more, shall make available to service and repair facilities sufficient service literature and functional parts to effect the repair of a product for at least seven years after the date a product model or type was manufactured, regardless of whether the seven-year period exceeds the warranty period for the product [https://leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/faces/codes\_displayText.xhtml?lawCode=CIVdivision=3.title=1.7.part=4.chapter=1.article=3](https://leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/faces/codes_displayText.xhtml?lawCode=CIVdivision=3.title=1.7.part=4.chapter=1.article=3).

For example, it's highly unlikely that cell phone manufacturers will make original batteries available for purchase 7 years after the last phone of that model was manufactured. Given all their talk about how "NoN OrIgInAl BaTtErIeS WiLl SeT yOuR hOuSe On FiRe AnD kIlL bAbY sEaLs", let's turn the tables on 'em. Many high-end smartphones cost several hundred dollars or more: you could get a nice return for a couple of hours of work. (**Edit 3**: [not sure if this applies to cell phones](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/p9nz0l/lpt_if_you_live_in_california_manufacturers_of/h9zy0j5?utm_source=shareutm_medium=web2xcontext=3), thanks u/PM_Me_Your_Deviance for pointing this out) This could apply to all sorts of things, including robot vacuums, laptops, TVs, etc.

This is both legal (it's literally the law) and ethical (we should be repairing products if they are otherwise still useful, not tossing them due to the manufacturer's planned obsolescence).

I'm posted this because the battery in my Samsung vacuum is failing. They used to sell the user-replaceable part separately for \~$90, now the only way to get it is to send it in for a $199 service + shipping. Fuck Samsung.
		-- u/chrisgagne, 49468 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you looking into buying a new game and want to ask questions, head over to Twitch, search for the game, and sort by the least amount of views. The users there are usually more than happy to interact with and answer any question for you.

Tried this with Flight Simulator 2020, had a few questions so I went into the top channel and was drowned out by the chat. Decided to sort by the lowest number of views and clicked into a few channels, was able to get streamers to answer all questions and even show me some of the stuff I was just curious to see.  Smaller streamers love to interact with the chat more than the larger ones.
		-- u/ridge9, 40553 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you love box mac and cheese, you can buy a big jar of the cheese powder online and turn any pasta into the delicious trash gourmet mac of your dreams.

I honestly can barely believe it.  High me was doing some shopping on the zon and was like, damn I wish I had some mac and cheese.  After a weird succession of searching I found the motherload.  A bucket of the cheese powder.  I thought you had to buy THE box mix forever.  It’s so much cheaper and you can make as little or as disgustingly much as you want.  Good tip for parents but also grown up trash humans who wanna crush a bunch of deliciousness.   The kind I got is called “big daddy” but I’m sure they’re all in the same boat of neon orange goodness.

Edit: Ok so I figured everyone would find their own since there are a million, but this is what I bought and have been loving:

Hoosier Hill Farm Big Daddy Mac Mix, 1 Pound 
https://a.co/d/7kdinuM
(A bunch of folks recommended nuts.com so we don’t give bezos another trip to space)

I followed the “recipe” on the jar and my first batch had wayyyy too much flavor - thought I’d made a big mistake.  Cut it in like half and tweaked it from there and am loving it now.   And it’s gonna last me way longer now too.
		-- u/slayalldayyyy, 48172 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you make a mistake, admit to the mistake, apologize, and explain what steps you'll take to prevent it from happening again in the future. It's very hard for people to yell at you if you've done that.

Both professionally and in my personal life, I know a bunch of people that refuse to admit to having made a mistake. When I mess up (and we all do at some point,) I just own up to it right away. By accepting responsibility, apologizing, and saying what I'll do to keep it from happening again, I not only avoid getting a lecture about whatever I did wrong, I also get thanked by my boss/friend/whoever.
		-- u/CyberneticPanda, 57654 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you make less than $73,000 a year, don't do your taxes with TurboTax or HR Block. Just go to irs.gov and do it for free and get more in your returns

I went through the whole TurboTax process to find out that they would charge me more than half of the $200 they offered me AFTER i did all the work. I instead went to irs.gov and got $400 (using all of the same information!) And wasn't charged anything.
		-- u/ElaborateRuse420, 51522 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you manage a store, put a sign out front listing the current "hot" items that are out of stock. This will prevent unnecessary traffic in your store and reduce potential exposure for your employees and customers. Miscellaneous

		-- u/allthedifference, 57224 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you need a suit and don't have much budget then $20 at Goodwill with $50 of alterations will look a hundred times better than a $70 suit.

Cheap suits are cheap because the store can sell them to the maximum number of people with the fewest variations. That means making them boxy, and adding baggy trousers. 

If you can get a suit that fits in the shoulders (the one place it can't be cost effectively altered), then it can be made to fit you by shortening the sleeves, slimming the waist and adjusting the trousers. 

Celebrities look good in their suits not because the material used is especially good, but because the suit has been altered to fit them right.

If you take your Goodwill suit to an alterations tailor (your local dry cleaner will recommend one) then the bulk of your budget is being spent on making it right *for you* rather than on the initial acquisition.
		-- u/blackhood0, 72879 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you need to go to Emergency, take your phone  a power cord. With Covid, they won't let anyone in the ER with you. You will be alone, and your phone is the only way you can let worried family and friends know how you're doing.

I ended up in ER 3 weeks ago with AFib -- for 6 hours. I had my phone, but no power cord. My husband was in our car in the parking lot. The ER had no power cords. Not only was I alone in a very scary situation, but I watched with despair as my battery drained towards zero. Luckily, the battery lasted until they admitted me, then the floor nurses helped me by charging it at the nurse’s station.
UPDATE: Wow!!! THANK YOU EVERYONE! I did not expect this to blow up. I’m glad I can help others avoid a situation that makes a scary situation worse.
CLARIFICATION: I did not know I was going to be in ER. I went to Urgent Care to get a short treatment/antibiotic. I was shocked, and unprepared, when they told me I had heart failure and they me immediately to the ER. Upon getting out of the car at the ER, I grabbed the USB power cord we keep in the center console. There was no waiting room (due to Covid?) - just a glassed in reception area. They took one look at the EKG from Urgent Care, and took me to an ER treatment room and started working on me. At that point I was tethered to the bed with IVs, so even a short 110v power cord would have been a problem. I asked the nurses, repeatedly, for help charging my phone. They told me they had no power cords, and no USB outlets.
GOOD NEWS: I'm fine now. During the 3 days in the hospital, they were able to normalize my heart rhythms, and put me on the appropriate meds.
		-- u/JoyfulDay, 49928 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you need to leave immediately and have no time to pack clothes due to a natural disaster, abusive SO, or whatever reason just grab your dirty laundry hamper.

Years ago my siblings and I were taken from my parents due to child abuse/neglect, and my grandparents were the ones getting us with Child Protective Services. My grandmother went and saw that our laundry baskets were full so she just grabbed that as she wanted to get us out of there ASAP. Her logic, all the dirty clothes are things we chose to wore, and cleaning them would take a few hours, but in this moment it takes a minute to just grab them. If we were to try and pack our clothes, it would just extend the amount of time we would be in that toxic situation of crying, yelling, and screaming. Luckily my brother was a stickler for laundry and had gotten each of us our own basket. Older siblings, and grandparents are the best.

I've remembered that ever since, and every time I've needed to leave in an immediate hurry and didn't have time to pack for whatever reason but would have time to clean the clothes later, laundry basket. I've told this story for 18 years to people, and I can count on both hands off the top of my head the amount of times someone told me this actually came in handy. I've been told of abusive relationships, emergency evacuation situations, and several other random situations that required the gathering of clothes immediately.

I happened to remember this due to having a dream about that incident, and don't recall anyone sharing this tip. It surprisingly saves a lot of time, hassle and effort if you don't mind working a little later. Worst case scenario most people wear a piece of clothing once and stick it in the dirty clothes basket, technically you can get away with wearing something again in an emergency. Whatever works.

**EDIT!!!: I thank you all for the awards, the gesture is appreciated, however you should donate to a non profit that helps during abuse situations, or natural disaster reliefs or something of that nature.** [**Here's a list of child abuse/neglect non profits.**](https://www.childwelfare.gov/organizations/?CWIGFunctionsaction=rols:main.dspListrolType=CustomRS_ID=75rList=ROL) **There's also a nice list** [**here for non profits that help out in natural disaster relief as well.**](https://www.galaxydigital.com/blog/disaster-relief-organizations/)

**Please consider donating to these non profits rather than giving me an award, I thank you for the consideration, but your money can be better spent towards these organizations of your choosing. Thank you!**
		-- u/sicurri, 72623 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you need to pay a company in order to work for them, then it's a scam.

		-- u/Southparkthecoon, 37650 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you need to wait until your boss is in a good mood to ask for something as simple as time off, you're in a toxic work environment and you need to take steps to exit sooner than later.

		-- u/pascal_prv, 63242 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you offer someone an alcoholic drink and they say no, immediately tell them what non-alcoholic drinks you have. With no judgment. They don't owe you any explanation of recovery, medical contraindications, or whether or not they just don't feel like it that day.

Recovering alcoholics struggle because a lot of people don't understand that 'just one' can't be done. Also, nobody should owe you their medical history just because you think not drinking with you is 'uncool'. 

If the person was just objecting to the TYPE of alcohol you offered, believe me, they'll ask what else you have on hand. Or you can just say, 'We have other drinks, and these are the non-alcoholic drinks I have: blah blah blah."
		-- u/lemjne, 78280 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you own a Samsung smart TV that has ads, you can block them by adding ads.samsung.com to your block list on your internet router

Have a Samsung smart TVs with ads that were annoying as hell. Found out they can be blocked and tried it. It worked!
		-- u/KingTimKap, 82084 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: If you pack a peanut butter and jelly sandwich for yourself or someone else to eat, put peanut butter on both slices before adding jelly. It prevents the other slice from absorbing the kelly and getting mushy.

Jelly instead of kelly. Unless you're into women named kelly covered in peanut butter. I wont judge.

*kelly has joined the chat*
		-- u/trollmobile, 46202 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you pay for Netflix, reset your password every year or two. That way anyone who's been using it will reach out to you when they can't log in, allowing you to keep tabs on your freeloaders and decide whether or not to continue letting them use it for free.

		-- u/jraychris, 40084 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you quit watching the 24-hour news-cycle, life is happier.

The news is designed to alarm and outrage you. There's not much you can do about it anyhow. The news-cyclers produce a false picture of life by accentuating the negative events.

An informed electorate is essential, but a short weekly perusing of the major headlines, with any additional web search for points of interest or depth is plenty enough to keep informed. Balance it out by seeking the positive acts of human beings. You'll be a lot happier, and see that humans are wonderful creatures.
		-- u/HONlAHAKA, 59970 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you raise your children to enjoy helping you bake and cook in the kitchen, they are less likely to be picky eaters. They will be more inclined to try a wider range of foods if they help prepare them.

		-- u/hostetlm, 68022 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you realize your fridge is getting empty, take 30 minutes to clean the inside before you go grocery shopping again

		-- u/Wthermans, 40359 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you really want to connect with someone, take them for a long, scenic walk. Not being face to face takes some of the pressure off, and the scenery puts you in the right mood to open up.

		-- u/jellybeanpie, 69473 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you receive a PS4 for Christmas Day this year – for sanity's sake – don't click "update" on either the software update or any game updates. Depending on your internet speeds, you will spend Christmas Day waiting for it to download and install. Do it later... like in 2019.

Merry Christmas ya filthy animals.

EDIT: Holy smokes! This... blew... UP! Thanks for the gilds!

**Redditor azninvasion2000** has a great tip below how to **pre-download and update via USB.**

[THE REAL LPT](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/a5t7jk/lpt_if_you_receive_a_ps4_for_christmas_day_this/ebp8zuj)

		-- u/ZeroBcool, 42452 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: If you receive a bunch of scam calls, pick up the phone and mute your mic. You’ll be considered a “ghost number” and steadily the calls will decrease.

		-- u/EAG100, 49786 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you regularly shop on Amazon, make sure to use the link smile.amazon.com as then a portion of your purchases will go to a charity of your choice

		-- u/sbose123, 47566 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you rent a tool from Home Depot after 6pm (mine closes at 9pm) you can rent it for the 4 hour price versus the 24hr price as long as you get it back to them by 9am the next day.

		-- u/sompter, 39566 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you roommate ever cooks a meal and lets you eat it with them, do all of the dishes unprompted. It's polite, shows respect for the work your roommate put into it, saves them the hassle, and makes them far more likely to do so again in the future. Cooking for them later would be a good idea.

Edit: I was the cleaner in this case, I’m not a passive-aggressive poster. It’s more of a “Hey there! Found yourself in the great position of having a roommate occasionally cooking for you? Don’t F it up by forgetting to clean!”
		-- u/rigelhelium, 85660 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you see a shockwave, turn away, cover your ears, and open your mouth

"I have tinnitus and it is high pitched synthesiser and it's all the time. The rest of my life. I am a former 0311 marine (infantry). Open your mouth if you see a shockwave and cover your ears. Also turn away" — u/toolfan73

Comment about the explosion that happened on Beirut, Lebanon. Stay safe everyone!

**More LPTs from the comments:**

"And step away from the window asap. Stop filming and hide!" — u/angeAnonyme

"They tought me in the army to be on my elbows and knees, facing away from the explosion, abdomen not touching the ground, put your thumbs in your ears, your fingers over your eyes, and open your mouth.

It is to prevent intestinal, ear, and lung damage caused by explosives, oh and to prevent your eyes from leaving the sockets." — u/xyrt123
		-- u/C_L_O_D, 52738 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you should ever worry about the approval of strangers, try to remember just how dumb the average person is and be yourself first and foremost. About half the world is dumber than that person. Might as well be genuine.

		-- u/Glass_Force, 42673 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you signed up for 3 months of free Spotify Premium during their New Year’s deal, tonight’s the night to cancel before you get charged!

I got smart this time and set a reminder :)
		-- u/jogglepoggle, 41317 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you smell a fish odor in an unusual place in your home, check your outlets or plugged-in electronics, it could be indicative of an overheating circuit.

When a circuit overheats the plastics/chemicals in outlets and wire insulation can emit a fishy odor.  An overheated circuit or melted wire insulation can create an electrical fire. 

This knowledge just saved my apartment. My fiance complained of a bad smell in his office, we checked the trashcan, looked in the closet but we haven't made fish in weeks so we were confused. Then, I remembered what my Grandpa, a career electrician, used to tell me, strange fishy odor = potential electrical fire. So we unplugged everything in that room and the odor stopped. 

The electrician we hired found the issue in the outlet and saw two wires with melted insulation that were touching, basically fire kindling.
		-- u/violetisnotblue, 40156 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: If you spot a cockroach larger than 1 inch inside of your house, it's an outside cockroach that found its way in. If you find a cockroach under 1 inch long, it's a cockroach that lives in your home and likely has plenty of buddies.

Edit: This applies mostly to North American homes, our house-dwelling cockroaches aren’t very large
		-- u/Cicularus, 37653 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you spy an elderly person alone at McDonalds, the gas station or wherever, casually interact with them: commiserate over a long line, crack a joke, ask a question - it reassures them they're still just people, not "old people." Many have outlived their friends and are lonely as hell.

		-- u/oscar_slend, 58211 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you started college at a 2 year school, then transfer to a 4 year school and dropped out without a degree, contact the 2 year school about Reverse Transfer Programs, you may have already earned an Associates Degree that you are not getting credit for.

For more information, check out ReverseTransfer.org(https://reversetransfer.org/)
		-- u/thisadviceisworthles, 49828 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you tell someone you need to talk to them, for the love of God give some indication of what you need to talk about, or at least that it's not bad news

Does this really need an explanation? Is this really a pro tip? This seems like basic fucking decency. I guarantee you that nobody has ever heard the sentence "we need to talk" and immediately assumed that there was a change in the household's popsicle policies. Just say, fuckin', "We need to talk about our popsicle policies later," not "I have something I need to discuss with you." How goddamn important is each and every second of your life that you can't spare a couple extra words to make sure your conversation partner doesn't spend the next few hours freaking out that you're divorcing them or have to put the dog down or whatever.
		-- u/MrAcurite, 45595 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you think of a good idea, write it down. Your brain will try to trick you into thinking you will remember it later, but it's a liar! Therefore: Write it down!

		-- u/onesnowcrow, 43169 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you think you've seen a ghost, always open a window

Not sure if this belongs in this sub, but someone gave me this tip and it blew my mind. 

Now first of all, I'm not a paranormal skeptic so don't come at me for giving this tip, just something that might safe a life.

Apparently a common side effect of carbon monoxide poisoning is hallucinations. So, it could be that, if you don't have a CO alarm, you might be experiencing carbon monoxide poisoning. That's why you should always open a window after a suspected paranormal sighting

Edit: yes, I know you should always buy a CO alarm, but most people don't think to run to the shops when they experience something paranormal and the alarm could be broken. It's just a quick tip😁
		-- u/PortugueseChick-_-, 38721 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you two paychecks away from homelessness, you should re-think getting a dog/cat.

I don't know what it is with my friends who are _always_ broke making minimum wage living in the worst part of town because that's all they can afford, and they adopt the free dog/cat and then can't feed it or themselves. I get that poverty is hard, and having a special friend makes it easier, but anything that costs money when you are living paycheck to paycheck should be avoided at all costs. Imagine if you have one minor problem and can't pay your rent? Now you have this animal that is going to be put up for adoption, or worse, abandoned. I have seen it too many times that owners get tossed out and abandon their pets. It's heartbreaking. So, if you are two checks from being homeless, please do not get a pet.
		-- u/tommygunz007, 37421 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want a PS4/Xbox One on the cheap, check Craigslist/eBay around the time that semester report cards come out.

Sometimes parents who are disgruntled with their children's grades will sell their console as a punishment. A friend of mine was able to get a PS4+games for $100 this way.
		-- u/LoserOtakuNerd, 47086 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want a cat to like you, when it makes eye contact with you, give it a slow "blink" in both your eyes, it makes them know you are not a threat and want to be friends.

Started volunteering at a cat shelter, and someone told me this, it's SHOCKING how well it works, hissing cat will be hissing at you, you do a slow blink back at them, and they just stop, and a bunch will let you pet them that have not let you do it before that were afraid of you. 

I started noticing my cats at home do it 100% of the time and now I do it back to them and they come right over for snuggles when I give them the slow blink.
		-- u/rsplatpc, 43981 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want a smarter kid, teach your child to read as early as possible and instill in them a love for books. Because as soon as they can read, they can teach themselves. And that will be a life-long advantage over their peers who don't have that same ability.

		-- u/Moonripple616, 148506 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to "vacuum seal" food, put it in a ziplock bag and submerge it in a bowl of water with the bag open above the water. The water will push the air out of the bag, and you can close it without any left inside.

		-- u/[deleted], 49438 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to become one of the “regulars” at a restaurant, introduce yourself to the staff.

I work in a restaurant and our regulars always introduce themselves to the new staff and they’re on a first name basis with all of us.
		-- u/Jords4803, 47723 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to giveaway some stuff for free don't list them under "Free", instead put some good price on them. When a descent person shows up, offer the products for free. You'll get lots of thanks. You'll also get rid of "choosing beggars" and those who swap free stuff for money.

		-- u/UserameChecksOut, 37124 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to learn a new language, figure out the 100 most frequently used words and start with them. Those words make up about 50% of everyday speech, and should be a very solid basis.

		-- u/Myst1kSkorpioN, 50973 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to learn a new language, figure out the 100 most frequently used words and start with them. Those words make up about 50% of everyday speech, and should be a very solid basis.

		-- u/[deleted], 80796 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to learn another language, watch children’s shows in that language to pick up on it quicker.

		-- u/-slickset-, 37893 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to offer a deep and memorable compliment, ask someone how they did something. It gives them the opportunity to tell their story, and shows your genuine interest.

		-- u/AlphaWhiskeyHotel, 44624 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to see if someone you care about is awake, gently say "I love you" instead of "Are you still awake?"

My son has always hated falling asleep. I would sit with him and like every frustrated parent, when I would get up from my chair, he would reach out and say "Where are you going mom? Stay here." So instead of saying "Are you awake?" before getting up (which invariably always wakes someone up it seems); I started saying "I love you." In doing that I noticed a few things. (a) If my son was awake, he was comforted and usually went to sleep within minutes of me saying this (b) The response back was always, "I love you too mom" which would leave us both in a great mood for going to bed and (c) if there was no response, I knew I was safe to get up. I do this with my husband too and the affect seems to be the same.
		-- u/Onyxpurr, 56619 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you want to stop overeating and improve your relationship with food, only eat in your dining area with your devices away. Having a content-free designated eating spot will make you much more sensitive to your satiety cues and make you more mindful about your diet and eating habits.

The rule is that you can eat however much you want, but you can't be watching videos / scrolling reddit / playing games / working / other big distractions. If you slip and realize you're eating away from your DES, no big deal, just take your food to the kitchen and eat it there, don't beat yourself up. I promise you that you will eat until you have had a satisfying amount, get bored, and then go back to doing whatever fun or occupying thing you were doing before. I find that reading is okay because I don't mindlessly eat while I'm doing it but that might be a personal thing. Also, I felt like eating habits were one place where I didn't have control of my life and starting doing this really made me feel like I do have the power to do little things to improve my health and mental state. Be well everyone
		-- u/DJ_EJ, 44886 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're at a hotel and have to call 911, call from the hotel phone. The front desk is immediately alerted of your emergency call and will also check in on you to make sure things are ok. Source: I used to work in hotels.

		-- u/IngaGunter, 38479 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're at a hotel and have to call 911, call from the hotel phone. The front desk is immediately alerted of your emergency call and will also check in on you to make sure things are ok. Source: I used to work in hotels.

		-- u/omnipotent818, 42045 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're born poor it's not your fault, but if you stay poor its still not your fault. Be kind to yourself.

We have so called privilege- a special right, an advantage to get to the top, an opportunity to be on higher levels, to become wealthy, but most of us doesn't have it.

.
.
.
.
.
.

Edit: Disclaim/Disclaimer/keypoints:
First of all Im not writing this for the lazy ones, a lot of comments telling to work hard and get out of the poverty line, obviously this LPT is for the hard workers, minimum wage workers you name it.

Second, I'm not discrediting the struggles, hard work and achievements of people who escaped poverty or wealthy/comfortable persons. You did well I congratulate you.

Third, there are parents and hard workers out there who probably died poor, but they have children that is very successful, can you blame them?.Vincent Van Gogh died in poverty but he is one of the greatest painter do you think its his fault?. Just because you are stay/died poor it doesn't mean you are a failure remember that. You may have a lot of hidden achievements in that poverty line.

Last.
Bill Gates once said if you're born poor it's not your fault, but if you die poor it's your fault. 

Well this sounds motivational, but poverty is not a choice due to many factors(privilege, education, health, opportunity, proper guidance ) especially if you're in poverty line since birth. 

The poor are most likely the most hardworking people around. (3rd World Countries)..Think of our garbage collectors, factory workers, janitors, tricycle drivers, ice cream vendors etc. If they even attempted a day with these folks, the bourgeois would simply melt in the sun.  

They are simply fighting for the right to lead better lives – with a roof over the head for starters. That’s an indication that nobody wants to be poor. We who are privileged need to be considerate.  It is irresponsible to blame the vulnerable for their mishaps in life. 

That is because nobody wants to stay/die poor.
		-- u/Educational-Tie5732, 42514 upvotes, 0.72 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're buying a home printer for occasional use, get a laser printer; they're more expensive up front but way more economical in the long run.

Edit: WOW! Front page! I'm on cloud 9 right now. 

To answer the most common question, inkjet ink is exceptionally expensive and priced that way because the company's got you where they want you by selling you a cheap printer. Laser printers use toner which is more expensive to replace, but lasts longer. Inkjet ink dries out when it's not used and is wasted. Kinda like running the engine on a car when it's not being driven. 

As for photos, many people have pointed this out and it's a valid concern. Many laser printers do an excellent job on photos and they're getting better, but ink is still king. You still have options. 

I mostly despise how the companies are gouging consumers. 
		-- u/OberonGypsy, 40718 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're cancelling your internet/cable and wish to avoid the elongated attempts to keep you, just tell them you're changing jobs and that your new employer will be paying for all services. They should skip right along to the cancellation!

Verizon, Comcast, etc all require their representatives to make multiple attempts to save the account. Having done my research and knowing that Verizon is unable to offer the internet speeds I prefer in the area I'm moving to, I was able to get my service cancelled quickly and easily. 10 minute phone call, with \~5 minutes of it spent navigating the automated system.

I'm not on contract, so no cancellation fee avoidance - this is purely a way to cut the call down from 30min to 10min.
		-- u/dartanianbartholomew, 41270 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're directing paramedics to a patient in your house, please don't hold the door. It blocks our path.

This honestly is the single thing that bystanders do to make my job hardest. Blocking the door can really hamper my access to the patient, when you actually just want to help me.

Context: For every job in my metropolitan ambulance service, I'm carrying at least a cardiac monitor weighing about 10kg, a drug kit in the other hand, and usually also a smaller bag containing other observation gear. For a lot of cases, I'll add more bags: an oxygen kit, a resuscitation kit, an airway bag, sometimes specialised lifting equipment. We carry a lot of stuff, and generally the more I carry, the more concerned I am about the person I'm about to assess.

It's a very natural reflex to welcome someone to your house by holding the door open. The actual effect is to stand in the door frame while I try to squeeze past you with hands full. Then, once I've moved past you, I don't know where to go.

**Instead, it's much more helpful simply to open the door and let me keep it open myself, then simply lead the way.** I don't need free hands to hold the door for myself, and it clears my path to walk in more easily.

Thanks. I love the bystanders who help me every day at work, and I usually make it a habit to shake every individual's hand on a scene and thank them as a leave, when time allows. This change would make it much easier to do my job. I can't speak for other professionals, this might help others too - I imagine actual plumbers carry just as much stuff as people-plumbers.
		-- u/derverdwerb, 53106 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're filling out the FAFSA for financial aid for college, make sure to do it on FAFSA.ed.gov, which is free, and NOT on FAFSA.com, which charges $80 for the same service.

 Discovered this little bit of trickery today. FAFSA.com is an independent site that masquerades as the US Department of Education's FAFSA site (the layout and formatting are very similar) and makes no mention of the government's free alternative. Technically, they offer "free consultation by a FAFSA expert" for your $80 payment, so it's not *entirely* a huge rip-off. Just mostly.
		-- u/ikagamekob, 48189 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're going through a break up, cut off all communication with your ex and inform any mutual friends that you don't want to hear anything about her/him. This will create a stale redundancy in your mind and will help facilitate the process of moving on eventually.

Edit: Christ, this blew up. To clarify a few things - I in no way intend this advice to be applicable to everyone. If you're having trouble moving on though, maybe it's best to go no contact that being the case. 
Also, as far as an explanation for "stale redundancy" goes - I would define it as a state in which no new data is coming in, so your mind just recycles what it already knows to a point of redundancy until it loses interest. I would liken it to playing a video game over and over again after completing everything there is to do in it. Eventually you'll get bored and will want to do something else. New information about your ex (such as if she's dating again) would be akin to the developers releasing new DLC for the game. It's going to give you a reason to play/think about things.
		-- u/EJRose83, 43905 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're in a social situation and you want to leave but it isn't socially acceptable, leave anyway. Don't wait for a convenient opportunity, don't wait until nobody is watching, just leave in front of everyone. It's liberating.

		-- u/Synyster328, 44169 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're looking for a nice wallpaper for your device, you can go onto the MET museum's website which has high quality digital copies of art that you can download.

Their digital collection is awesome. They have a really nice search function that you can use if you're looking for something specific too. Some works aren't available for download but a lot of them are public domain. There's no ads or popups when you download, and it's completely free!

Edit: sorry I didn't include the link lol here's the website 
https://www.metmuseum.org/art/collection
		-- u/chryxanthemums, 46717 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're losing your hair and feel unsure about how it will look bald shave it now. Nobody is going to see you for the next 3 months anyway and you'll have time to grow it back if you don't like it

		-- u/TheCurryMonsterr, 39926 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're moving a fridge and have to lay it on its side for any amount of time, you have to let it sit upright for 24 hours before plugging it in to allow the oil in the compressor to go back in place. Not doing this can cause serious damage

Edit: if anyone is wondering, I heard this from my Engineering Thermal Science prof last semester and he said it was just a general rule of thumb so you know for sure no serious damage can occur. I decided to post this after seeing so many college freshmen moving in their mini-fridges sideways this week and I figured they had no clue about the anatomy of a refrigerator and would just plug them in right away
		-- u/schultzie2240, 56076 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're not a "car person", find a neighborhood mechanic and always get small maintenance (oil changes, car inspections, etc) done there so when big stuff comes up, they'll know you and won't screw you over on pricing

My dad taught me this "trick" and it has served me well.  Sure, an oil change might cost less at the Jiffy Lube down the street, but if I pay a few dollars more at "my guy's shop" each time, he's more likely to view me as a loyal customer. He never tries to upsell me like the cheap places do, is honest about maintenance timelines (I asked him how my brakes were looking and he told me they'd be fine for a few more months) and even tells me when its cheaper to go elsewhere (he checked a flat for me for free, told me he couldn't patch it, saw that the model of tire I had was cheaper at the warehouse club in town and suggested I go there instead).

TLDR: Pay a little more for basic maintenance at a good mechanic and create a trusting relationship that will save you big in the long run

EDIT because as this gets more attention, people are assuming I meant either 1) every mechanic will try to screw you if you don't give them ALL your business (obviously not true) or 2) a mechanic you are friendly with will always give you the best deal. As with all LPTs, your experience will vary and you should do your research first to find a good mechanic (online reviews, word of mouth) and do your research on what things "should" cost (approximately) so you know if you're getting hosed or not. But the essence of the LPT is "be kind and whenever possible, be a loyal customer and it should serve you well in the long run"
		-- u/SuddenAborealStop, 40474 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're on a first date and aren't connecting with the other person or feel they're dull, ask them what job they'd choose if money wasn't an issue. It initiates a talk about one's passions, which are rarely dull and are simple to connect.

		-- u/platehuk100, 44183 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're on a plane and it suddenly starts making a quick descent when the oxygen masks drop, don't panic. The pilot is just descending to 10,000ft where there is enough oxygen to breathe normally

Also remember that if this happens he won't be able to notify you and the other passengers immediately because regulations require him to inform Air Traffic Control and the airline first
		-- u/[deleted], 39085 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're posting a long story anywhere, please use paragraphs. Some people are incredibly discouraged by unseparated walls of text, and your otherwise interesting story might go unnoticed because of it.

I've seen a lot of posts in r/tifu and r/maliciouscompliance that were both really long, and just one massive block of text. I personally have a hard time not getting lost in text when it isn't spaced out every now and then, to the point where I don't even try to read it when I see posts like that. 

I'm sure your post is great and interesting, but I would bet that I'm not the only one turned away by massive text walls.

Edit: My first front-page post is me being a grammar nazi. Great.

In all seriousness, thanks for the awards and stuff! &lt;3

Edit 2: For some reason this hit #1 on the front page. I love you guys &lt;3

Final Edit: (this one's actually relevant) apparently, you have to hit enter twice for the paragraph to separate properly. Hopefully this helps!
		-- u/Master_Maniac, 55457 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're put on hold and don't hear music there's a good chance you're just muted and they can still hear you

Might not want to say mean things about someone trying to find you an answer or sing in your car...we can hear you 
		-- u/HerViciousSmile, 39331 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're running late to meet somebody, and don't have a legitimate excuse, don't make one up. Their annoyance to your lateness will make them doubt any thinly veiled excuse you offer. Simply apologise, and tell them you should have left earlier.

They may be annoyed initially, but at least they won't resent you for what they view as you lying to them.

Edit based on a contribution from the comments section:

'Thanks for waiting' is also an effective expression to use when you're late meeting someone. Although, only use this one if the person waiting for you already knows you'll be late.
		-- u/menwithmanners, 43602 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're someone that always listens to music in your car make it a habit at least once a month to turn it off and listen to your car for a couple minutes. There may be an issue you're not aware of which could be caught before it turns into a major problem.

		-- u/pntbll1313, 61987 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're still a teenager, treat your ears nicely. Ears don't repair themselves and earplugs to concerts are better than tinnitus for the rest of your life.

		-- u/Cony777, 47035 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're stuck in the elevator call the Fire Department, not the building management/maintenance

4th of July 2009, I was stuck in the elevator at my apartment complex for over an hour with ~~5~~ (Edit: it was actually 7) other people and a tiny dog.  The apartment manager, through the intercom, assured us that maintenance were on their way.  Finally, we called 911 after one person started having a panic attack.  The fire department arrived and set us free within 10 minutes and they told us we should have called them right away.

The fire department has the means to enter a building and the tools to open the elevator.  Often times there is no maintenance team on site.  If they are, they usually do not have the tools to open an elevator and have to call in support off-site which may take a long time - especially on holidays or weekends.

TLDR: The Fire Department will get there WAY faster than the people on the other side of the elevator intercom.
		-- u/juntadna, 49247 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're taking your animal to the vet for an ailment, get video of them coughing, breathing strangely, limping, etc. Animals may not show the ailment at the vet's office and the video can help the vet diagnose your furry friend.

It also can save you multiple trips to the vet.

Edit: Was not expecting this to blow up this much! I do need to give credit to my own vet for suggesting I do this when I brought my cat in and he wouldn't cough and hack like I was claiming he was doing... jerk...

Also, a lot of people recommend to record illness episodes to show Dr's and a lot of other suggestions for warranties and such.

And, of course, thanks for the gold and silver, internet strangers!
		-- u/tdub34, 46122 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're tempted to upgrade your phone but yours works just fine, try buying a new case, changing the background and download a theme that will change your icons and fonts. It will appear as a different device and may scratch that itch and buy you a couple more months.

		-- u/[deleted], 42681 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're trying to delete your data with a company and they ever ask what region you're in, the correct answer is always California

		-- u/SuperiorOnions, 42862 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're trying to explain net neutrality to someone who doesn't understand, compare it to the possibility of the phone company charging you more for calling certain family members or businesses.

		-- u/PeeWees_Hermin, 90173 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're unsure about a decision, flip a coin. Your reaction will show you which decision you really prefer.

Example: You are not sure whether you should take a job offer or you should stay at your old job. There are arguments gor both an you just can't come up with a decision. You flip a coin, the outcome says "stay", you are unhappy with it. That way you know you should tke the new job.

This little trick helped me a lot of times and never failed me. That way you can be aware of your position regarding a difficult decision. It is not about the coin flip but about your spontanteous reaction.

(Put it in the career flair since I didnt see anything more fitting...)
		-- u/LeBr0wn, 37217 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If you're waiting for the bus at night, turn your turned on phone screen toward the bus as soon as you see it

As a bus driver, it can be extremely difficult to see if someone is waiting at a bus stop when it's dark out.

Turning on your phone and pointing the screen towards the oncoming bus is a great way to make yourself more visible.

If you don't have a phone, another thing you can do is just move around a bit.  

Sometimes people will stand completely still, dressed in their black winter jacket and blue jeans and then wonder why the bus zoomed past them. 

Help out your driver by making yourself visible!
		-- u/rippytherip, 37441 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If your boss or HR tells you that you need to quit or you will be fired, don't quit. Let them fire you.

		-- u/MildlySuspicious, 79073 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If your car is damaged in accident and you’re not at fault, also file a diminished value claim to recoup the loss in value of your car due to being in an accident. If you don’t like the offer you get, hire an independent appraiser.

EDIT: this only applies to the USA and varies by state 

My wife’s 2017 Jeep Grand Cherokee was recently rear ended. After having about $5k worth of damage repaired, I filed a diminished value claim. Progressive Insurance (the insurance of the person who was at fault) offered me $400. I said no. They then offered $600. I said no. The body shop who fixed the car recommended an independent appraiser who they said almost always gets you more money. I paid him $300 for an appraisal report that showed that the value based on auctions etc is between 2-3k. I sent that report to Progressive. They reviewed it and then had their appraiser do their own research and then contacted my appraiser to negotiate a “settlement”. We agreed on $2100. 

The independent appraiser told me not enough people know about diminished value claims. He said if you have a later model car with under X miles (varies by state), it’s a no brainer claim but never accept the insurance company’s offer because they will low ball you a lot until you bring them evidence otherwise. All this cost me was $300 and 45 min of my time to have the appraiser see and take photos of the vehicle.

EDIT 1: As someone posted below, the ability to get a claim does depend on the make and model of your car and it's value. I should add that the independent adjuster I talked to gave me a ballpark value of what he thought the claim should be before I ever paid him a penny. He did say in some cases, it may not be worth it but knowing the details of my car (age, mileage, condition), I was getting low balled. You mileage may vary.

EDIT 2: As many have stated, Diminished Value laws vary by state so please check state laws before filing as to not waste your time (or money). Every state may have different time frames for when you can file. 

EDIT 3: This is based on my experience in America. I have no idea how this works globally outside the US, if at all.

EDIT 4: wow. Did not expect this to blow up like it did. As I stated above, you mileage may vary, it varies by state so do your homework, and my experience was specific to the US. I didn’t know about this and my first experience turned out to be a positive one. Some of you are screaming that these claims are worthless and you rarely come out ahead. Everyone is an adult and can make their own decisions about what to do. I’m just providing the tip because it worked for me so like all tips in life, sometimes it works and sometimes it doesn’t.
		-- u/djseto, 46697 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If your children are breezing through school, you should try to give them a tiny bit more work. Nothing is worse than reaching 11th grade and not knowing how to study.

Edit: make sure to not give your children more of the same work, make the work harder, and/or different. You can also make the work optional and give them some kind of reward.
You can also encourage them to learn something completely new, something like an instrument.
		-- u/TNpantelope, 48347 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If your clothes don't smell fresh even after washing, it could be your machine. The easiest way to get rid of mold in your machine is to use 1-2 dishwasher tabs or some detergent and do a cycle without clothes.

		-- u/[deleted], 39252 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If your dog runs up to someone and they ask you to call the dog back, your first response should be "HERE!" or whatever your recall cue is, not "Why?", "He just wants to play" or "It's okay he's friendly".

It doesn't matter why they've requested it but there's a good chance that it's for your own dogs safety.

Perhaps the person is scared of dogs.

Maybe they're with a child who is scared of dogs.

They might have a dog on a lead who is dog aggressive or scared of other dogs.

There could be machinery that's dangerous for your dog to be around.

They might have livestock with them.

They might have spotted other wildlife that could either cause harm to or be harmed by your dog.

But it doesn't matter. Honour the request and call your dog back, then if you're curious, you can ask why or what's happening. If you don't take heed of the warning and your dog gets injured then it's your fault. If your dog is improperly trained and you *can't* call your dog back then A) it's again your fault if it gets injured and B) it has no business being off lead.
		-- u/MostlyAUsername, 52035 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT: If your employer puts you on a performance improvement plan or suddenly starts asking for daily reports out of the blue, start looking for a job

In most U.S. states, the amount an employer pays toward unemployment insurance is affected by various factors, and one of them is how many employees have collected unemployment insurance in the past.

And in most states, if an employee is fired for cause, and the employer states the firing happened because the employee didn't meet the job requirements or didn't do their job correctly, the former employee might not be eligible for unemployment insurance.

The result is that in a lot of toxic corporations, management will sometimes set up some of their employees for failure. They will for instance put them on a so-called [performance improvement plan](https://www.shrm.org/resourcesandtools/tools-and-samples/exreq/pages/details.aspx?erid=586), or start micromanaging them to death, documenting anything that can be perceived as failures or mistakes using brand new standards. It can also be implemented as part of a [vitality curve](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vitality_curve), where bottom performers are regularly purged from the organization, regardless of the company's results.

It's also sometimes implemented in perverse manners when a company is looking to lay off a percentage of their workforce, and managers are instructed to meet a number within their reports. Some employees, identified as financial liabilities because they might work in a support quality but not directly generate revenues, suddenly see their performance reviews peppered with what were in fact minor issues, but that were inflated to turn them into causes for firing.

And if the employee is fired for cause, they might not be eligible for unemployment insurance, reducing the unemployment insurance tax the employer will have to pay in the future.

Bottomline is this: if an employer suddenly starts playing this trick on you, where you were performing just fine but are now having to jump through hoops, it means your ass has been put on the chopping block. You've been set up to fail, and you will almost certainly be fired soon. Start looking for a job. The good news is that unemployment rates has rarely been this low.

EDIT: Some people in here rightfully pointing that a PIP is not some evil tool and that it can be used to help a struggling employee to succeed. This is not the scenario this LPT is about. This is about the all-too-common toxic workplaces where PIPs and other processes are used to push out employees who were performing well simply because a manager or the company wants to reduce expenses, avoid a lengthy or costly separation, or downright discriminate.
		-- u/SpaceJackRabbit, 50803 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If your employer puts you on a pip (personal improvement plan). Start applying for a new job right away.

In my experience employees Ive seen put on them rarely keep their jobs after the improvement period deadline is up even if they put in the effort to meet the goals. Its more or less a gentle way of fireing someone. 

Put in the work and try your hardest. But expect they will let you go when its up.
		-- u/OlStickInTheMud, 43073 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If your flight gets cancelled while you are at the airport, don't approach the ticket agent, but call the 1800 number to re-book your flight.

Everyone on the flight will be looking to get on the next best option and a lot of them will be annoyed or upset, adding stress to you, those around them and the agents. Your best move is to sit down and call the 1800 number of your airline where a person will be able to re-book you before the red-faced screamers ahead of you in line. 
As an add-on, always be polite to your ticket agent, they might have the power to make your travel a lot more pleasant, and even if they don't they do not have control over your flight getting cancelled, so taking your frustration out on them is not solving anything.
		-- u/LaSwanduh, 38370 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If your friend or coworker tells you they got a new job, ask them the start date and put it in your calendar so you can text them a good luck / happy first day message

I know I’d feel nice receiving this, so I’ve been doing it for the past few years. I have a terrible memory so I put an event on my calendar so I can remember to text them that morning.
		-- u/bubble_chart, 73083 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If your friend owns a business, don't ask for a friend discount or for some free products, a great friend is one that pays full price to support their friend

		-- u/GerardWayNoWay, 76593 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If your grandma or mom knits/crochets you something, keep it. Even if you don't wear it, trust me, one day you won't care what's cool, you'll just wish you had that scarf that your mom spent days making for you. They are irreplaceable.

		-- u/SamuelSaltandSand, 68967 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If your home is freezing and your landlord locks the thermostat with a plastic lock box, place an ice pack on top of the lock box. It will trick the thermostat into thinking it’s freezing and kick the heat on to adequate levels.

Thanks y’all for the support! 

If you’re wondering if this is legal- it is where I live. Idk what more I can tell you. 

If you’re telling me to move, I completely agree and I am moving when the time comes. 

If you’re telling me to get a space heater or heated blanket- I have them both. 

If you’re telling me about the law of the minimum and maximum temperature- I know about all of that. The thermostat is in a warm place and the living area is not warm. This hack adjusts the temp a few degrees…enough to make the room just right. I’m not freezing to death, it’s just uncomfortable. 

There are people in this world that are freezing with a locked thermostat. This is for them. Apparently people in offices and classrooms too.

Oh, and for everyone saying I need to dress like it’s winter- I have a minor circulation condition that makes my hands and feet impressively cold. I dress like it’s below zero all year round to try to keep my hands warm and not as cracked as they get from the cold. So I am not walking around naked…ok sometimes I am naked but in general I am clothed heavily.
		-- u/JennyAndTheBets95_, 71015 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If your kid does a chore of any kind without being asked to, and this isn't common, do NOT make a big deal out of it. The best you can do is sincerely thank them.

If you have a kid who only does chores when told to, when they decide to do one on their own, the worst thing you can do is make a big deal out of it, per example say: Look who decided to do something; or I didn't have to ask you to do that? WoW.

This will largely discourage them to do it again, the best thing you can do is just thank them for doing it. 

There are several reasons for this; It is way easier to do a chore if you're not told to do so, as you don't have the pressure to do it, you just decide to. Thanking your child will make them feel way more accomplished for doing the chore.

In fact in general the tasks and chores you do tell them to do ALWAYS thank them afterwards.

(Repost because i forgot LPT)

Edit: I am sorry if i didn't make it clear but some people were disagreeing with so I'll make it more clear as in what i ment.

If you have a small child say 3 or 4 and they do an unprecedented not requested chore, you should make a big deal expressing excitement. But this post was ment for teens and I'm sorry for not explaining it. And i stand by my statement, a big deal in a mocking form should not be made in any way. Thank them for doing it as if its the norm. I disagree with the offering of gifts every time they do it, as it will make them used to it. And it should be normal to do unsolicited chores.
		-- u/[deleted], 38082 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If your laptop has an USB port with a lightning symbol next to it , you can use it to charge your phone or accessories without switching the laptop on .

If the symbol is there but it doesn’t work, check your BIOS, you’ll have an option to enable usb power delivery .

Edit : You can enter the BIOS only during startup (before you see the windows icon) by pressing a key specific to your system manufacturer. It’s usually one amongst the function keys or DEL key in some cases . You’ll have more information in your instruction manual .

From the comments below,
It can be a yellow port as well . Also only works on USB A
		-- u/[deleted], 37940 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If your parents are still around, next birthday ask them to write down their life story. I did it this year for both parents and they were the two best presents I've ever received

As the children of parents we have a very one way relationship. We see our parents as parents, not people. And for most of childhood that is essentially a service role - they do things for you, you take things from them.

I'm now in my 30s and I realized I only knew a few select moments in both of their lives before I existed. A couple of highlights, but nothing that really painted a picture about how they came to be the people they were as adults. 

So a couple of years ago I asked them both to write down their story for my birthday. Of course, this was a difficult request for them - getting me some socks or a couple of books feels way more comfortable. But I pushed them on it, helped manage their expectations and made it clear I wasn't expecting Ulysses, and stood firm on the request. 

One year later and my birthday comes around again and this time I got the presents I asked for. Instantly read them cover to cover (I mean, one was 4 pages typed up, and the other was a small handwritten book, so it didn't take too long for either of us), and they were so amazing. So much stuff I didn't know about them both. And not just events, but feelings, attitudes, perspectives, and insight into them both as people rather than just parents.

So this is my LPT to you. I am lucky enough to still have both of my parents, but quite a lot of my peers do not, and it really makes me appreciate that I still have the time to do this. If you are in a similar position then I promise you, you will never have a better birthday present than finding out who your parents were before you threw their life into chaos.
		-- u/felixjmorgan, 45835 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: If your pet uncharacteristically starts having random “accidents,” do not start scolding as it could be a sign of a serious issue. Mine starting having accidents last week. Today he was put to sleep and all I can think about was how tough I was on him because of things he had no control over.

		-- u/DonKeedick, 79159 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If your printer is out of black ink, and you need urgent printout please change the color of the font #010101, which is 99% grey, it will help you quite a lot.

Edit: Thank you stranger for this Gold.

Edit: u/PaintersOfBlindFaith Thank you for the proof, http://imgur.com/qEa6qei
		-- u/Prabir007, 66263 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If your spouse is cleaning a section or area of the house, and you feel inspired to pitch in, choose a different area of the house to clean, unless they specifically ask you for help.

I just came up on my 15th anniversary with my beautiful wife. 

I noticed that on the weekends or in the evenings when one of us starts cleaning around the house, it will spur inspiration for the other one to clean as well. 

But so many times I’ve made the mistake of seeing my wife in the kitchen cleaning and thinking to myself, I want to support her efforts, so I start cleaning around her in the kitchen. 

HUGE mistake... my good intentions quickly turn into her felling like I don’t approve of the job she’s doing so I “had to step in”, when really I just wanted to help. 

Instead, when inspiration strikes to support my wife and her cleaning efforts, whenever I choose a different part of the house to clean, she notices it and is pleased.

It’s the same thing in reverse too... if I’m cleaning the kitchen and she comes in and starts opening and shutting cabinets right next to me, I csn get annoyed. And then I realize that I do the same thing to her. 

Live and let live. You can’t change anybody. You can only change how you react to anybody.
		-- u/bottlecap112, 42369 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: If your work's Paid Time Off arrangement allows it, and especially if your company offers unlimited PTO, take some random middle-of-the-week days off every once in a while. Go on a day trip, run some errands, or just sit at home and be unproductive for a day or two. Makes a world of difference.

		-- u/grizzburger, 43233 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: If your workplace is in the process of firing you, and they ask you to write a letter apologizing to the company, DO NOT. This is an admission of guilt and will torpedo your unemployment case.

My friend worked at Wal-Mart for 7 years and when he came up for promotion they fired him officially for "using the bathroom too much." The company asked him to write a letter apologizing for it and it caused him to lose his unemployment and a judge ordered him to pay back all the unemployment he'd already gotten.

Do not say or write ANYTHING that can be construed as an admission of guilt.
		-- u/alegonz, 58806 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If youre ever using one of those spin the wheel coupon things on a purchase for a website and it gives you something like "meow10" try inputting increments of 5, like "meow20" or "meow30" because it's very likely its a super generic code and you got the crappier one for your purchase.

Edit: yes I realize I did increments of 10.
10, 15, 20, 25, 30. 
Better?

Also, someone mentioned you should start from higher up and go down so you don't miss a chance at a higher discount. Im sorry whoever you are I have lost you in the comments.

Props to u/debilitatingfart who posted something extremely similar a month ago and got no love
		-- u/luminousshadows, 39107 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re around 12-15 listen to as much music as you can cause the music you listen to during those years will stick with you for life and the feeling of going back to those songs when you’re older is quite euphoric.

		-- u/[deleted], 88173 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re building a house now, have the builder install an appropriate electrical circuit to charge an electric car (typically 240V in North America). Even if you don’t have an electric car now, within a decade you probably will.

Odds are you don’t have an electric car right now and might not be considering one yet. Electric cars are just starting to become more mainstream now, with many manufacturers introducing their first (or first mass-market targeted) electric car for this model year. Within the next decade, though, if you’re looking at a new car, you’ll likely be considering an electric vehicle from a wide variety of manufacturers. It will probably be cheaper to install the electrical circuit now before drywall is up than to do it later after the fact. You don’t need to install a charger; just get the higher voltage outlet installed that a level 2 charger needs.
		-- u/jqubed, 47943 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re ever in the heat of an argument, always act like you’re being recorded. This helps you from saying things you don’t mean and could regret later.

This has always helped me remain calmer in disagreements!
		-- u/Valuable_Armadillo, 40532 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re hosting a webinar or Zoom call, don’t “wait a few minutes for late people to join in.” It just makes every webinar start 5-10 minutes late, rewards the wrong people and punishes people who arrive on time.

		-- u/redditpey, 49173 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re listening to someone in the middle of a conversation and it gets interrupted, one of the best things you can do is to ask them to finish what they were saying.

It shows that you truly care about what they have to say and that means so much more than you’d think. This will do wonders for making friends as well as improving relationships in general.

Everyone wants to be heard, but nobody wants to listen.
		-- u/theiceman1337, 40684 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re making a joke with a child and the child becomes visibly upset, immediately stop.

From years of experience of being with family members who thought that making a child cry was “cute,” if you’re playing a prank, making a joke, or having fun with a child, or literally anyone regardless of the age, and they begin to cry or become upset, stop what you’re doing and address it. Continuing to laugh and make fun of a child while they are crying is confusing for them and they will feel completely vulnerable and torn down, and they will remember that you were being unsupportive of their pain.
		-- u/nymphili, 53854 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re on the fence about buying anything ask yourself “if I had to choose between being given this item or it’s equivalent value in money, which would I take?”

For example, I want new boots that are $200. Imaginary magic being offers me boots in one hand or $200 in the other. I can only pick one. 

Most of the time I pick the money! But every now and then I pick the item. Something to help y’all save some money when making purchases :)
		-- u/itswonton, 41287 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re picking up takeout, call the restaurant to order directly, rather than use a food ordering app. The restaurant will make more money because they won’t need to pay commissions for the app.

Apps like Uber Eats, Deliveroo and Menulog can take a commission from the restaurant if you order through them, even if they’re not delivering it.

Order from the restaurant directly and you’ll help a small business keep more of their money and it will cost the same or even be slightly cheaper for you.
		-- u/[deleted], 36932 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re planning a camping trip or a national park trip or anything of that nature, check the moon cycles and try to go during the new moon phase. You’ll see way more stars.

Obligatory reactive LPT from someone who just planned a trip to Joshua Tree during the wrong moon cycle.
		-- u/katsuthunder, 51097 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re potty training your child, put TWO sets of mattress pads and sheets on their bed, in alternating order: mattress pad, sheet, mattress pad, sheet. If they have an accident in the middle of the night, just pull off the top set and the bed is already ready to go again without a hassle.

		-- u/emhaz4, 41970 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re staying in a hotel and need to iron your clothes, send the first few puffs of steam into a towel. It may have been a while since the last time the iron was used, and the steam holes may be filled with nasty brown mineral deposits which you don’t want heat-blasted into your clothes

		-- u/wowbobwow, 60729 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re too scared to get into an argument with someone, you’re never really going to trust or understand each other.

		-- u/TheFlightlessPenguin, 46204 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re trying to eat healthier or lose fat, after buying fresh fruits or veggies, pick/cut/wash them asap for healthier snacking and quicker availability. The tendency when snacking is to grab-and-eat rather than taking time to fully prepare. Unhealthy food can be too conveniently available.

		-- u/[deleted], 45837 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’re working in a technical role (IT, Engineering, etc), write everything you do down as if it was a user manual. Ignore those who say it will be used to replace you. It is far more likely to be used to show management “you can give me that promotion, as the next guy is all set”.

It’s also going to help build skills in communicating things clearly, precisely and in a way anybody can understand. You’ll also be amazed how many times writing something out instructionally can lead you to think “wait, why do we do it like that?!” - identifying opportunities for improvement.

Edit - wow, lots of comments - both positive and negative. For some extra help / elucidation:

-	I found this very helpful when I was starting my career. The biggest part not being the sharing of knowledge, but the act of setting it out “on paper” to better see where things need to change, where I didn’t know all I could know, and where others may struggle in the future.
-	I am indeed now a director. Our company is quite small, but we have had engineers come and go and move on to amazing things, both internally and externally. It’s those who communicated and shared knowledge who moved the furthest; I can honestly say my proudest achievement is knowing some of my employees are now in amazing roles in other firms. As a manager, it’s a sign that you gave them the right challenge, the opportunity to grow, and the confidence to see they can do more. I’m never sad to see someone go elsewhere if it’s because they’ve found a better opportunity - it means you were a crucial part of them making a success for themselves.
-	Most importantly, where I’m from, there are employment laws in place to ensure if someone is fired because they’ve been forced to “work themselves out of a job” then they can sue for constructive dismissal. I know some managers look for ways around this, but generally here it’s not a common motif. As such, I do agree that if you’re in a country like India, China, USA, where some of these protections and freedoms aren’t so readily available, it is better to tread with caution in terms of sharing information. In others, like Germany, UK, most of Scandinavia, the culture is very different, and going above and beyond to communicate and help others can be well received.

But yes, as with anything - this has been an experience I’ve personally found valuable and looking from the other side can see why, but always think about how it applies to your situation. I guess as a second tip - if you’re working for a company where you feel the management are always trying to find ways to screw you over, maybe it’s time to find a new company to work for...
		-- u/squonch, 51173 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: If you’ve got some free time and you’re planning on spending it watching tv/playing video games, etc. make yourself go on a short walk or do some brief exercise beforehand. You’ll probably end up going longer than you planned and you’ll feel better about relaxing after.

		-- u/Just_OneReason, 45972 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: In most cases you don't need to wash your clothes with hot water. Heating the water takes up almost 90% of the energy expenditure of a washing machine. Most detergents nowadays don't even need high temperatures and work fine in the cold. It's better for your wallet and the environment.

		-- u/According-Anybody508, 47219 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Inflation is currently ~2% per year. If you are not getting more than that per year as a raise, you are getting a pay cut. Make sure to take inflation into account when you get a raise.

		-- u/Mi-yeon_2, 60580 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of asking for someone's number, just give them yours and tell them you'd love to hear from them it will avoid any awkwardness in case the feeling isn't mutual

Either you'll hear from them or you won't, but it avoids someone having to say no or giving a fake number cause they don't feel like they can say no
		-- u/Miss2war, 41510 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of buying a card to go with a child's present get an inexpensive book and write your message inside the cover. It will become part of the gift while still doing what a greeting card would.

		-- u/fouronthedice, 44237 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of buying a dog as a Christmas present, buy accessories such as a leash, collar, and bowl. Your child can open these and get excited on Christmas morning. Then, when things have settled down, you can take your child to the shelter to pick out a pet together.

Animal shelters fill up with unwanted "presents" in January. If you hold off just a little, you can be a part of the solution AND find a pet that jives with you and your family's personality.
		-- u/alextriedreddit, 59024 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of sending flowers to a funeral, give them pictures and videos of their loved ones that they may not have copies of.

This is a heartfelt move especially if they didn't take many pictures as a family and it may let them see a side of their loved one they didn't know about.
		-- u/Tipsypaddy, 45516 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of trying to kill a fly by hitting it, spray it with water

During the summer my house gets filled up with flies because my kids are always running in and out of the house. So I carry a spray bottle around with me. The minute I see a fly in my peripheral vision or if it lands on something I spray it. The fly can’t see the water coming the way it would see my hand or a flyswatter coming. Once it gets wet it’s wings don’t work anymore and eventually it will fall. That’s when you squish it. Works every time.
		-- u/Scarlaymama0721, 51685 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of using a Coinstar and losing 11% of your money, take your change jar when you go shopping and when it's time to pay, use a self checkout machine and just drop change into the coin slot. It counts the change just like a Coinstar and you keep all your money

		-- u/TheresA_LobsterLoose, 43441 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Instead of using the phrase "I assumed..." use the phrase "My understanding was..."

The phrase "I assumed..." has a very negative connotation, and people will view it as you jumping to conclusions without sufficient evidence.

On the other hand, if you use the phrase "My understanding was...", it has a way more positive connotation. Plus people will just view it as you made a slight mistake in understanding, and will be far kinder to you.

This is best applied in a workplace/professional environment. If you tell your boss that you "assumed" something typically results in a reprimand; saying "My understanding was..." will instead just be viewed as a miscommunication.
		-- u/FrenchJello, 41293 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: It is important to know when to stop arguing with people, and simply let them be wrong.

You don't have to waste your energy everytime.
		-- u/ritzz2_0, 90816 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: It is important to note that you get the courage after you do the thing that you are so anxious and terrified of doing, not before.

		-- u/Utter_Perfection, 37745 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: It is safer to protest in front of the National Guard than the police, as the National Guard has to follow rules of engagement unlike the police.

I do not condone looting and am only bringing this up as stories of protesters and reporters being arrested, blinded, and assaulted with chemical weapons becomes more prominent. You are by far, much safer with a group that will be held legally accountable watching over you.
		-- u/akatoshslayer, 78160 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: It only takes about 2-3 weeks of clicking unsubscribe on every single marketing email you receive to change your inbox (and your life) forever

Do it every time for a couple of weeks and you're golden

Edit: this is my second front page of reddit in two days with two consecutive protips. that must be some kind of record, right?!

love y'all!
		-- u/m77w, 73765 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: It takes extreme strength and courage to be a consistently kind person in a world that rewards selfishness. Make sure to thank people who demonstrate kindness. They are choosing the hard, selfless route in order to make the world a better place for everyone.

A simple “thank you for your kindness. It takes a lot of courage and strength to be kind” goes a long way.

It also reminds you that their kindness is a choice and that it does indeed take strength and courage.
		-- u/AdSnoo9734, 76301 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: It's ok if you feel more grief from the passing of a pet than from a relative. It's about who you spent the most time bonding with. Don't beat yourself up for your own feelings. Trust them. They are true.

		-- u/TheKingOfDub, 49518 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: It's ok to be selfish when it comes to your health right now. Be clear and stern when it comes to the boundaries you need to feel safe.

Edit: Just to clarify for those who seem to be inferring things from this post that are not there: This is in no way a justification for hoarding things or otherwise being rude. 

There are an unfortunately large number of people who are conditioned in one way or another to believe that considering their well being before another's is selfish or otherwise wrong- this post is for those people; not for people looking to justify buying a pallet of toilet paper or the like.
		-- u/muzau, 47764 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: It’s a good thing to feel ashamed/ embarrassed by what you did at a younger age; this proves that you’ve matured.

		-- u/Aki-Lui, 45247 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: It’s really easy to replace a shower head and they are relatively cheap. Buying a new one can completely change your shower experience.

		-- u/SplungerPlunger, 45410 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Job descriptions are usually written to sound more complicated and high profile than the jobs really are. Don’t let the way it is written intimidate or deter you from applying to a job you think you can do.

		-- u/RoseyPosey30, 56602 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Job security is a two-edged sword; if you are irreplaceable, you are also unpromotable

Always have a plan for your success: this means doing work that you are  good at, and having someone available to do your job so you can be  promoted to your next job.
		-- u/slumdogbi, 40424 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Just because technology allows us to reply to someone in real time does not mean you have an obligation to do so. You don’t have to apologize for taking time to respond!

Edit: This is meant for those that want to maintain a healthy balance between work, personal life, and technology. I consider a reply timely and professional if it’s within 24 hours. Obviously if it’s an emergency you should respond sooner!
		-- u/vinchenzo54, 54314 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Just because you did something wrong in the past, doesn’t mean you can’t advocate against it now. It doesn’t make you a hypocrite. You grew. Don’t let people use your past to invalidate your current mindset. Growth is a concept. Embrace it.

		-- u/storermdggd, 60861 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Just because you did something wrong in the past, doesn’t mean you can’t advocate against it now. It doesn’t make you a hypocrite. You grew. Don’t let people use your past to invalidate your current mindset. Growth is a concept. Embrace it.

I just found this quote online and wanted to share it with you guys. Sorry if it’s not the right sub, please let me know. 

When I read this it really spoke to me. I’ve made mistakes in the past but I’ve also learned from them and I’m a better person because of it. 

Everyone makes mistakes and the only thing to do is deal with them and learn from it. Don’t let anyone hold your past wrongdoings against you in order to belittle or invalidate the person you are now.

Edit: Can I just say this post is not directed at American politics. I’m not from America nor do I know much about your politics. I’ve not heard of the name Biden until today, sorry!

Also, thank you to everyone for the upvotes and rewards, I really didn’t expect this post to gain much attention! To the people who are saying they needed to hear this today, I’m so glad it has uplifted you even a little!
		-- u/ninnymugginsss, 119953 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Just because you're approved for credit doesn't mean you can afford the payment

		-- u/notlikelyevil, 48597 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep a 'gift list' and write down whenever your partner/mother/father/friend expresses an interest in an item or hobby. Then you'll always have ideas to draw upon when Christmas/Birthdays/Weddings come around

		-- u/MarthaFarcuss, 48185 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep a separate master resume with ALL previous work experience. When sending out a resume for application, duplicate the file and remove anything that may be irrelevant to the position. You never know when some past experience might become relevant again, and you don’t want to forget about it.

EDIT: Wow, this blew WAY up. And my first time on the front page too. 

I guess I can shut down some of the disagreement by saying that every field does things a little bit differently, but this is what’s worked for me as a soon-to-be college grad, with little truly significant work experience, and wanting to go into education. Most American employers/career help centers I’ve met with suggest keeping it to about a page because employers won’t go over every resume with a fine-toothed comb right away. Anything you find interesting but maybe less important could be brought up in an interview as an aside, perhaps. 

A few people have mentioned LaTeX. I use LaTeX often in my math coursework, but I’m not comfortable enough with it outside of mathematical usage for a resume. Pages (on Mac) has been sufficient for me.

As far as LinkedIn go, it’s a less-detailed version of the master document I keep, as far as work experience goes, but I go way more in depth into relevant coursework and proficiencies on LinkedIn than I do on paper. 

TL;DR- I’ve never had two people or websites give the same advice about resumes. Everyone’s going to want it different. *Generally* in the US, the physical resume could afford to be shorter because it leaves room for conversation if called for an interview. 
		-- u/rlc327, 76738 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep an eye on OTHER news the next few days - most of the bad news being released will get buried beneath the bigger world news, which makes NOW a great time for people  businesses to release the things they want as few eyeballs on as possible.

		-- u/Sigurlion, 54434 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep inviting that friend who always says no

If you have a friend or coworker who you have invited to do things with you or your group of friends and they continually decline, don't stop inviting them unless they specifically tell you not to invite them any more. Some folks really would like to be included but really do have other obligations, or maybe they're just super shy and need to be invited several times before they feel like they can work up the courage to go. Or perhaps they are battling depression. Don't give up on that person. You may be just the person they need to get them out of their shell or to eventually become the kind of friend that helps them see the good in life and want to continue going on living. Be awesome

Edit: Thank you for the awards kind strangers!
		-- u/a116jxb, 92182 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep your dog leashed in public at all times no matter how well trained you think he/she is.

Seeing lots of dogs walking off leash in public parks now that dedicated dog areas are locked up during the lockdown. Some look like new owners with new puppies.

Not everyone likes dogs. Some are allergic. Some are deathly scared. Dogs can also react to sudden unexpected movements in surprising ways. Even if you lose your grip on a leash, it's easier to catch a leash than the unleashed dog. 

Keep your dog on a leash at all times in public. For everyone's safety, including your and other dogs.

Edit: lots of great comments below. Some awful stories about off leash dogs. Wanted to address a few points that have come up in the discussion:

For those confident in their dog's training, a leash is most likely to save your dog's life, not anyone else's. Your dog is more predictable to you but you have no idea how other dogs or people will react. With a leash you can get them out of any dangerous situation.

A leash is not a replacement for training or socialization, it's more like a safety. Train and socialize your dog. And that never stops. If your dog can't walk on a loose leash it's because it wasn't trained to do so.

Exercise for high energy breeds. There's a reason high energy breeds are only recommended for people with high energy lifestyle people. Use 30ft or 50ft leads to train recall. Train your dog to run along side you. Go out to remote hiking trails. Running around in your local public park isn't nearly enough.

And retractable leashes are terrible. They teach the dog to pull, and you can get some nasty injuries if they get caught in your dog or your leg.
		-- u/jucromesti, 37902 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: Keep your mouth shut at work, avoid gossiping about colleagues and try not to get into workplace politics. Even if you think you can trust a coworker, it will mostly likely backfired on you

Edit: “Most likely backfire on you” damn auto correct
		-- u/Waste-Associate5773, 52157 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Know someone who has lost a loved one? Make sure they have plans the day AFTER the funeral. That day is beyond tough.

Everything leading up to the funeral is people contacting you, visiting you, making sure you're ok. And then the day of the funeral, you are surrounded by people who love you, care about you, etc. But then the funeral is over, and people think you just need time alone. NO. THIS is the time to make plans. Take them out to lunch, watch a movie together, go hiking, anything. It will mean the world to them.

EDIT: Some really helpful tips and advice in the comments! Thank you so much for the awards, too.
		-- u/fungobat, 45033 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Know the Signs of Stroke. My dad had stroke on Christmas Eve. Got him to ER in 30 mins. He should be fine.

Know F.A.S.T.    

F - Face Drooping    

A - Arm Weakness    

S - Speech    

T - Time to call 911 in U.S./999 in U.K (even better to drive them immediately if you can get them into a vehicle, "Time is Brain", meaning the longer the stroke lasts the worse the damage can be.  And I often heard the stroke doctors talking about the short window of time they had to be able to give the TPA protocol when I worked in the hospital)

EDIT:  "IV tPA should be administered to all eligible acute stroke patients within 3 hours of last known normal and to a more selective group of eligible acute stroke patients (based on ECASS III exclusion criteria) within 4.5 hours of last known normal. Centers should attempt to achieve door-to-needle times of &lt;60 minutes in ≥50% of stroke patients treated with IV tPA."    

https://www.acc.org/latest-in-cardiology/ten-points-to-remember/2018/01/29/12/45/2018-guidelines-for-the-early-management-of-stroke#:~:text=IV%20tPA%20should%20be%20administered,hours%20of%20last%20known%20normal.

EDIT:  Getting messages saying it is bad advice to advise not to call 911.  Let me be clear, you should call 911 for their advice and on which hospital you should go to, and if the person can't walk, obviously they need an ambulance.  But in my specific case, my parents live in the country so we would have been waiting AT LEAST 30 minutes for an ambulance to arrive, precious time to assess and load my dad into the ambulance, and then drive back into the city. In my case, it made sense to just load up and go, but we probably should have had 911 on the line while we were driving.

-----

Additional symptoms:

Sudden Numbness

Sudden Confusion

Sudden Trouble-Seeing

Sudden Trouble-Walking

Sudden Severe Headache

-----

Prologue:  I worked at a hospital that is a stroke center from 2010-2014 as a grunt.  Dad is a retired doctor.

I went to my parent's early on Christmas Eve 2020, was helping dad put heavy stuff in the attic.  Afterward, he said he needed to vacuum but could not say the word "vacuum", and then said "am I having a stroke?"   I thought, "fuck".  Then he said vacuum, and walked to his bedroom, and I hoped it was just a brain fart and he was fine.  Nope, he comes into living room and sits down in chair, and he can't speak.  At all.  He points to his mouth. No facial drooping.  I later learned he meant he was drooling.  I thought, "fuck, fuck, fuck".  I knew he was having a stroke.  Mom walked by, I said "dad is having a stroke".  She said "no no no,", and gave him an aspirin.  I said we can't wait,  we gotta go to the hospital now.  Got dad into the car and had mom drive to the stroke hospital I used to work at, in about 30ish minutes from onset of stroke.  They gave him the TPA protocal.  They said he most likely had the stroke due to him being in Atrial Fibrillation, which fired off a clot to his head.  He went up to the ICU that night, Christmas Eve.  He was able to speak that night.  The next day, Christmas Day, even better.  He was released on 12.26.20, able to speak very understandably with only a slight defect that should go away, because the neurologist said he should recover fully.    
    

If they can walk, don't wait on an ambulance, throw them in a vehicle and get them to a major hospital ASAP.  It would probably have been at least an hour longer wait if we had waited on an ambulance.  Ideally, know what your local medical facilities are known for (heart, stroke/neurological, children, etc) and where they are so you can make an educated choice about which you should drive to.

-----

EDIT 1:  Woke up so grateful to see that many people are seeing this info.  My dad told me once he was able, "you saved my ass", so hopefully this info will allow you save someone else's ass.    

EDIT 2:  Per u/SquiddlyGiggly, giving aspirin is a no-no because it can make the stroke worse.  Good to know, I'll pass that info along.  I think my mom gave him aspirin because my dad had a quadruple bypass when he was 64 and she probably thought he might be having a heart attack and just couldn't speak due to being out of breath.  Which leads me to...    

EDIT 3:  My dad had a quadruple bypass when he was 64.  He said his blood pressure has been fine even without medications, so he stopped taking his medications for his heart awhile ago.  And apparently he was right about not having heart blockages or high blood pressure, but those aren't the only heart worries it seems.  I thought he was still getting checkups, but I learned after this that he has been refusing to go see his doctor.  If he had, perhaps they would have caught the Atrial Fibrillation (A Fib) and treated it before this happened.  My mom thinks this was a blessing because hopefully it will be a wake up call for him to take ongoing checkups seriously.    
    

So one more thing to add to this LifeProTip, show your family members this story and the importance of getting checked out and addressing issues before they become worse.  Dad said another stroke patient came in while he was there, and the guy was basically a vegetable.  Remind family that they may be ready to die, but are they ready to live with permanent handicaps like not being able to speak or use half their body.    

EDIT 4:  I just remembered a stroke patient I had when I worked at the hospital.  Guy was late 40s, maybe early 50s, looked like he was in great shape (thin body type) and like he worked a manual job.  He was laying there with his eyes closed and not able to speak, just grunt.  I "think" that was his 2nd or 3rd stroke, progressively getting worse I think.  Anyway, my point is, do not judge their age or outer appearance as to whether they can have a stroke.    

-----

EDIT 5:  Credit to u/RetardedinRetrospect for linking this video that shows a Stroke as it happens:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4kgmqPahsSEfeature=youtu.be    

Also, an informative TEDtalk on the subject:    

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mYD7Y9CXeUw
		-- u/MinMaxRex, 36847 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Know you're about to get fired? Then for heaven's sake don't throw your resignation in first in one last show of defiance. The meeting where they let you go is your chance to extract a great severance package and positive references. Employers want a clean departure—don't make their life easy.

If things have gone sour but you think they're on shaky ground, hold your nerve and stay the course. Your future self will thank you for it.

Edit: Lots of debate about whether you are getting fired, laid off, terminated, fired for cause, or whatever. The point is: you don't make your situation better by quitting right before they fire you. Their documentation will be the same: terminated for xyz.

Edit2: The 'severance package' might amount to just securing a supportive reference for your next job.
		-- u/m77w, 89479 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Lads - if you can't do "handsome", do "tidy".

Some of us are born with good looks, or work hard to achieve a gorgeous body, or naturally grow into a chiselled jaw line... For various reasons you might not be able to do these things, but you **can** be *tidy*. 

It's honestly surprising how far a neat haircut, clean well-fitting clothes, and subtle aftershave will go in a...
• job interview
• date
• any social event!
		-- u/ThrowInTheChair, 67950 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Large candles have a minimum first burn time to prevent tunneling.

The first burn is the most important. Candles should burn one hour for every 1 inch in diameter of the actual candle size. Therefore, a 4 inch diameter candle should burn for a minimum of 4 hours to liquefy the entire top layer of wax. If the wax is not allowed to liquefy or to melt from edge to edge of the jar or tumbler, it will create a 'memory ring,' especially if this is the first time the candle is lit. Once a candle has this 'memory ring,' it will continue to tunnel and to burn that way for the life of the candle.

I learned this last year, and it has greatly improved my candle burning life. Not super exciting, but enjoy!
		-- u/Robotdeath, 38660 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn Excel, even if the primary function of your job doesn’t require it or isn’t numbers related. Excel can give you shortcuts that will help you with your job substantially, including working with text or lists at scale.

		-- u/skidniks, 36855 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn a skill to make something physical and tangible, what you can touch and feel. E.g., leathercraft, woodworking, cooking, painting, photography with the intent to print, etc. Being able to touch your creation is a huge stressbuster, a way to get off social media, and thoughtful presents.

		-- u/hash1e, 37461 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn excel. It's one of the most under-appreciated tools within the office environment and rarely used to its full potential

How to properly use "$" in a formula, the VLookup and HLookup functions, the dynamic tables, and Record Macro.

Learn them, breathe them, and if you're feeling daring and inventive, play around with VBA programming so that you learn how to make your own custom macros.

No need for expensive courses, just Google and tinkering around.

My whole career was turned on its head just because I could create macros and handle excel better than everyone else in the office.

If your job requires you to spend any amount of time on a computer, 99% of the time having an advanced level in excel will save you so much effort (and headaches).
		-- u/ravnicrasol, 58482 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn to accept that others don't care about some things as much as you do

I see a LOT of judgement in various subs:

* How can you not recycle? It's easy! Planet murderer!
* What do you mean you don't exercise regularly? It only takes like 30 minutes a day? Why are you so lazy?
* How can you eat meat? A vegan diet is an easy adjustment, you monster.

And so on.

The thing is, it doesn't matter how objectively awesome and beneficial a thing is, everyone has limited pools of time, money, interest, and willpower. It's great that you bike to work, champ! But try to remember it's not just "10 minutes on a bike" it's

* Getting a good bike and a place to store it
* Having good gear
* Learning the rules and regulations involved in using it in your area
* Having the energy to get up early enough for the extra time to prepare for a bike trip
* Having a shower or place to change at work (and having to actually change at work)
* Having a place to keep your bike
* Having to take the bike home no matter how late in the day, how the weather has changed in that time, or how exhausted and awful work was that day.

Basically, people vastly oversimplify what THEY like or do because the downsides either don't matter to them or they forgot they existed due to their lifestyle. As another example, I saw a former marine judging people for being "lazy" because they didn't regularly exercise. Meanwhile, I know people who are struggling to have enough energy to cook dinner instead of microwave foods at the end of the day due to kids, physical issues, emotional issues (depression for example). And what if someone just hates exercise while you personally don't mind that much (or love it) ? Doing a thing is much easier when you naturally enjoy it (or had some kind of life event that let you overcome your dislike or motivated you more than average to overcome it).

The point is that something that you can easily slot into YOUR lifestyle may not work so easily for someone else. Don't judge someone who's struggling with crippling debt and money management for not being charitable like you. Don't look down on someone who has computer trouble just because you like computers and it's easy for you to learn the ins and outs of computer security. Don't judge people when you don't know their limits and capabilities.

EDIT: This guy's comment really helps put it in perspective: [https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/pegs3q/lpt\_learn\_to\_accept\_that\_others\_dont\_care\_about/haxh0nr/?utm\_source=redditutm\_medium=web2xcontext=3](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/pegs3q/lpt_learn_to_accept_that_others_dont_care_about/haxh0nr/?utm_source=redditutm_medium=web2xcontext=3). Bottom line, there are a million "causes" and banners people gather around, and judging people because they're not under your banner is missing the point that you're not under theirs either. And even if someone is under no banners, there might be a very valid reason for that too. Try not to judge people you don't know or understand.

EDIT2: people getting super bent about the idea that someone might not care about recycling.
		-- u/suddenly_ponies, 37802 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn to do -- and enjoy -- things by yourself. You're going to miss out on a lot of fun if you keep waiting for someone else to accompany you.

Yes, bring on the inevitable and endless masturbation comments. 
		-- u/enfanta, 65782 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Learn what to stockpile in case of plague, earthquake, blizzard, or other major events. You probably don't need to hit the freezer section of your local store.

 Just saw this on the facebooks - an interesting take on how to stockpile food and essentials. All I saw in my local Costco was people ransacking the frozen and perishable food sections, plus TP and paper towels. 

&gt;All joking aside, I grew up in a war zone so while everyone was panicking buying all the freezer stuff at walmart yesterday I was grabbing the supplies that worked for us during the war. Halfway down the canned food isle I was grabbing a few cans of tuna, corned beef, Vienna wieners, and spam a guy bumps me with his cart, he looked like he was new to the country so I thought Syrian or afghani, looks at my cart then looks at me and says in Arabic. Replenishing? I said yup. He then laughs and said with a wave of his hand they're doing it all wrong. I started laughing and he said I guess you experienced it too. I said yup. I told him I'm always prepared for disaster just in case. He laughed and said if it's not one thing it's another it can't hurt. To put it into perspective we had pretty much the same thing in our carts.  
&gt;  
&gt;While everyone was buying the frozen meats and produce we had oranges, bleach, canned food, white vinegar, crackers, rice, flour, beans (canned and dried), and little gas canisters for cooking.
		-- u/Nanocephalic, 44027 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Learning how to manage failure is the biggest skill you can have. You can't learn if you don't try, you can't try if you are afraid to fail and you can't be good at something if you have not failed multiple times. If you are someone who boasts about not failing ever, you are not trying enough.

		-- u/bongsfordingdongs, 55202 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Leave "natural" peanut butter jars upside down overnight before stirring them up. The oil will rise to the bottom of the jar making the stirring process much cleaner, easier, and more efficient

		-- u/kickypie, 52290 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Leaving an abusive spouse? Narcissistic Parents? Before saying anything, find important documents like your birth certificate, passport etc...

Thinking about leaving your spouse/partner, or leaving the home of abusive parents? Try your best to get your hands on important personal documents like your birth certificate, passport, social security card etc... it can be very difficult to get replacements.

These documents can be targeted, they can also open the door to "having to go back" for them. Don't let anyone hold you hostage.
		-- u/missmegz1492, 45116 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Let people finish their sentences, even if takes them a moment to find a word or thought.

This whole thing may seem silly, but I can be a bit anxious in conversation because of my introverted tendencies. No small talk, straight to the point please. This often led to me trying to finish peoples sentences or thoughts out of sheer impatience, and people start to pick up on that. People felt nervous speaking with me and in a leadership position at my job it wasn't helping with moral or gaining the trust of my employees. 

Lately I've been trying to sit back and let people finish their thoughts and its made myself and my team a lot less anxious.

I'm not sure if I'm the only one who does this, but I thought it could help someone.
		-- u/DeffreyJarthurAvis, 48907 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Let someone know you're picking up the tab for a meal AFTER they've ordered. This allows a considerate friend to order what s/he wants freely and also prevents a colleague/acquaintance from taking advantage of your generosity.

		-- u/nikodaemus, 63904 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Librarians aren't just random people who work at libraries they are professional researchers there to help you find a place to start researching on any topic.

		-- u/DurntoWebster, 69038 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Librarians aren't just random people who work at libraries they are professional researchers there to help you find a place to start researching on any topic.

		-- u/homelessdreamer, 80737 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Loyalty to your company only rewards the company. Hopping companies is the best way to increase your salary, don't sit there hoping for a raise. Apply to other jobs, get a better offer and use it to leverage a raise or take the offer.

You'd be surprised how many people nearly double their salaries just by applying for jobs.
		-- u/seanmashitoshi, 77475 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Make it a road trip game to count motorcycles on the road for points, it will make you more aware of them and if you have kids it will teach them early to keep an eye out. It could inadvertently save a life :)

		-- u/proygratoke, 48654 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Make it a rule for yourself to NEVER insult how another person finds joy or expresses joy

I.e their hobbies and their smile. It’s incredibly sad when some covers their mouth or face in the middle of a joyous moment because they were always told that the gap in their teeth looks weird or that they have an overbite.

In addition, seeing people never share anything about what makes them happy because their parents or their peers always tell them that their hobby of painting and collecting figurines is lame and childish.

This is one of the times that you should just keep that opinion to yourself

Edit: Christ on a bike, if someone derives joy to the detriment of others you call them out, if it’s illegal you call a cop.
		-- u/CrownAtlus, 77928 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Make peace with the fact that you have nothing to prove to anyone and you can walk away. It will change your perspective and ultimately save you time and emotional energy.

Some people just want to see the world and everything in it burn. You try to tell them, and educate them, but nothing you say will get through to this person. 

It’s okay to have pride. It’s okay to be upset. But recognize that you have absolutely nothing to prove to anyone. You’re great, you’re doing your thing, and you got this. 

It’s okay to walk away, it doesn’t make you seem like a lesser person. You haven’t failed anything. That’s just a mental “what if” that the person is using to control you. 

Disclaimer: Applies to social situations that are emotionally fueled and will ultimately bring more harm to you than good. A little common, but worthy of a reminder nonetheless. 

Stay safe and happy out there, you got this.
		-- u/Bubdolf7, 40665 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Make the habit of using questions instead of judgement on scenarios where you’re trying to express your opinion

I’ve been using this tip particularly with my family in the regular basis. I no longer tell my wife “you look like you didn’t sleep right”, instead I ask “how did you sleep?” Or to my daughters, instead of “you broke this toy” I would say “what happened to the toy?” and let them explain. This has helped me be seem as more understanding, less accusatory and gives others the opportunity to rationalize and explain the situation. This also helps them vent and respect me more for not jumping into conclusions, but ultimately this helps avoid conflict. 

Edit: 

⚠️ this may not work in every case. Use judgment.
		-- u/Rcaroman, 36943 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Many problems in marriage are really just problems with being a bad roommate. Learn how to be a good roommate, and it will solve many of the main issues that plague marriages. This includes communicating about something bothering you before you get too angry to communicate properly.

		-- u/[deleted], 99963 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Many smart phones have a feature that allow medical providers to access your medical information from a locked screen. However, many people don’t realize it exists so don’t fill it in. I’m a paramedic, and can assure you filling out that info can and has saved lives.

		-- u/Scribblebonx, 49962 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Military dogs are amazing at what they do but the breeds are high octane and need to be worked. They may not be suitable for all homes as pets without extensive training. Please don’t get a dog breed because it is a hero, get a dog breed because it fits your family’s lifestyle.

		-- u/sab340, 69816 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Monologueing kills your social life. Don't volunteer details about your life when no one asked. Arouse interest, then share when they ask!

Monologueing is basically when someone makes a conversation one sided. It sounds a lot like someone talking to themselves but just in the presence of another person.

When we monologue it makes people tune us out which ultimately defeats the purpose of a conversation. To make it easy conversations should be 50 50. Obvs not everyone is talkative but also a large amount of people will just be polite and let you talk even though they really want to get some words in. Maybe they had something to say 30 seconds ago but you kept talking... For some reason.

Anyways that's my 2 cents. Monologueing is very frustrating in general when people wanna talk too.
		-- u/Randys_Throwaway, 43009 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Most juices/drinks that advertise 50% less sugar are simply watered down. You can save money by watering down the normal product.

		-- u/InnateAnarchy, 37231 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Most modern microwaves have a mute function to turn off the beep. Typically it's by holding 0 for 3 seconds

Well this blew up. Glad I could help guys. 

So I'm seeing that 0 locks some of yours. 0 works on mine. Look at the numbers carefully, one of them should in very small print say "mute", even if it's not the 0. Yours might be the number 1 or 2.
		-- u/hehyih, 57626 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Most people will bend over backwards to help you learn about a topic they feel passionate about.

I've found this most useful when starting a new hobby. I usually just find someone that already knows what they're doing and get a brain dump from them.

Its kind of amazing what people will offer to do for you when you genuinely want to learn about something they find interesting.
		-- u/[deleted], 55272 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: My life advice? Don't save the good wine for a good day. Good wine is wasted on a good day. On a good day, all wine is good wine. Bad wine is good wine. Drink the good wine on a bad day. That's what it's for.

		-- u/Boobglow, 88037 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Need to divide something fairly between 2 kids? Let one kid make the split and let the other kid choose the partition. Because kid making the allocation won't know which partition he/she is getting, it will incentivize him/her to make the fairest possible split.

		-- u/ky4tz, 54374 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Need to divide something fairly between kids? Get one of them to divide, and the other person gets first pick. This can also works for drunk adults.

		-- u/ritzz2_0, 41492 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Never assume that someone won't be able to go to an event, it's always better to invite them anyway, that way they know they haven't purposefully been left out. It'll avoid a lot of negativity.

		-- u/StormsEye, 37152 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Never compliment someone for losing weight unless you know it’s intentional. I once told a coworker he looked great after he lost a little weight. He looked sad afterwards. I didn’t understand why. I found out later he had terminal cancer. I never comment on anyone’s weight now.

Edit: I’m just saying don’t lead with “you look great!” Say “wow! Great to see you! What have you been up to?” People will usually respond with an answer that lets you know if they have changed their lifestyle. Then you can say “yeah! You look amazing” 
I’m a super nice person. Not a jerk for those of you saying I’m a robot or making mean comments or saying I should have known the difference. Wow.
This man had just lost maybe 7-10lbs. It was early on in his illness. He eventually get losing weight and passed away...
So I was giving this life tip so people aren’t haunted like I am. In that moment I reminded him he was dying and I hurt him.
		-- u/Eat_it_Stanley, 53153 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Never get into a physical fight, except your life is in definite danger. The consequences can be life changing.

There are lots of fighting videos on the internet, but they never show  the consequences, hours, days, months later.  Usually the police get involved, and in extreme cases the loser may die. It may be months later, but you may be held liable. You may claim self-defence, yet it may involve protracted legal problems.

The regrettable thing is that conflicts are usually over some silly issues, like ego, insult or road rage. Once a conflict appear to be reaching face off. Leave.  The worst thing about knocking someone unconscious is the time you wait for the person to come to recover. Sometimes, it doesn't happen. 

Finally, never ever put your hands  on an elderly person. Never
		-- u/Ricwil12, 47364 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Never hold 100% to any belief that you are absolutely sure of . always leave atleast a 1% chance to question your belief in light of new information

Chances are that if you starts to question something , there would be so much evidence for the belief that you are holding that you would rightly reject the supposed new information which may or may not be true and just a plain rumor

Eg Flat Earth ... There is so many evidence in favour of the earth not flat that no new rumor or any new conspiracy theory will hold

EDIT This Blew Up . I agree this is something not a LPT and should be obvious from get go ... but for the last month faced us with scenario where some of my friend lack of open mindedness left us with terrible loss. Many people I know just dont want to listen and act a dangerous precedent ... As long as you are willing to rationalize and use mind you would be comapartively less to get caught in cult mentality .....

I think Just having an Acceptance that this might be something true even I am sure of the other and do your own research  and with enough evidence claim or reject something is what is required

EDIT 2 The obvious LPT definately is more in the context of everyday life and situations. Obviously there are accepted facts that Holocaust Happened , moon revolves around the sun , earth is not flat etc which have Something  we Have large amount of evidence that supports it

EDIT 3 I think If there is something that you heard on fb and a new conspiracy theory , its definately have a higher chance that you would reject that because there is nothing that would support that unfounded claim

		-- u/Sunapr1, 48244 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: Never loan someone an amount of money you aren't okay losing permanently. You need to mentally consider it a gift and consider the money gone. So many people are terrible at paying back so when you consider it a gift it is a nice surprise if the money comes back. If not you really helped them.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 40703 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Never make a career decision based on your loyalty to a company.

Corporations have absolutely zero loyalty to you.

You can work at the same company for 20 years, survive all sorts of mergers and acquisitions, and be close enough with your boss that you go their kids' weddings.

The instant an opportunity comes up in which it is financially advantageous for the company to outsource or contract your position, they will "make a business decision," and your job will go to the lowest bidder.

If you shop around and get an offer at another company that pays better or has significantly greater advancement opportunities, take it.  Don't let yourself become too comfortable in one position for too long, because ultimately you're expendable.
		-- u/FastWalkingShortGuy, 38543 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Never send a work email when you’re emotionally compromised. Type it up, save as draft and walk away. Ideally, sleep on it. You’ll make a smarter choice when not heated

		-- u/Jumping_Bear_, 45044 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Never tell a coworker anything you wouldn't want your manager to hear no matter how much you trust them.

Edit: Thanks for all the silvers everyone! I got fired a few weeks ago because I told my coworker I was having trouble memorizing the alcohol we had at the store and for taking off for surgery (I'm assuming.) I'm having a hard time so it was nice to see everyone with the same problem. Hope y'all learn this lesson through me and not how I did lol.
		-- u/J_of_a_trades, 64059 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Never underestimate the power of a stoic blank stare in confrontations. It's easy to engage and retort but giving absolutely nothing cuts deep. It's the kryptonite to crazy. You deploy that and people will either tire themselves out or realize they are overreacting real quick and retreat.

Edit: GUYS[!](https://youtu.be/aS4w0Y1Kif4) If the situation calls for an explanation and/or cooperation then ***of course*** you should fix it with dialogue.

Also if you are being threatened by an increasingly maddening individual then you should remove yourself from the situation.

Nothing applies to everything.

Edit 2: Yes, I'm advocating you do this every single time. Always. Every time till the end of times. You should never use discretion and only use this incredibly specific advice applicable to certain general situations. I have yet to hear from anyone disproving or disavowing it. Do this and only this. Forget everything else. This is the only way.
		-- u/Daniiiiii, 44400 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Never underestimate the power of ignoring someone

Ive avoided tons of fights, confrontations and rude people just by simply ignoring them. Yes it seems like a cowardly move, but the payoff is huge. Showing someone you simply dont care about their absence is the ultimate insult. You simply can live a peaceful life without issue once you learn to not care about others or their issue with you.
		-- u/MrSvela01, 37761 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: No matter how much your workplace pushes "team building" and "family culture" - remember, they're not your friends and it's still a workplace.

Unfortunately, I learned this the hard way. I work for a small business who put huge emphasis on everyone being friends and building a strong team, but it just means it hurts more when someone inevitably stabs you in the back. I'm not saying go around and be a dick to people for no reason, but it's better to build relationships outside of work or in places where there aren't any politics or power imbalances.

Edit: Wow I didn't expect this to blow up and there's too many comments now for me to keep up with. It's kind of vindicating but also sad that so many people feel the same or have had similar negative experiences. For the "my workplace isn't like this" and "my co-workers are my family" people - I hope it stays that way for you, I really do, but I'd maybe read some of the stories on this comment thread and be wary. It's better to be safe than sorry right?
		-- u/[deleted], 99514 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: No matter how small the job is, wear correct masks/respirators/eye or ear protection. Your future self will thank you.

		-- u/CowboyG96, 50046 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: No one will remember your GPA, your salary, your fancy job title. People WILL remember your time spent with them, your experiences with them, your character  how you treated them. In the end, some things matter, others don’t.

		-- u/raviji22, 48247 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: Nobody cares if you overwork yourself until hitting a burnout. Keeping a good work/life balance is your own responsibility.

Edit:
Disclaimer, as it seems necessary, ofc there are people in slave like work conditions which have no other chance than work as much as they can, only to make ends meet.

But there are also a lot of people in good jobs (let's say marketing) who are caught in this work and work more mindset, this post is about them.
		-- u/onlyforthisjob, 63408 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Normalise teaching your kids that safe adults don’t ask you to keep secrets from other adults

		-- u/Expensive_Equal6747, 68108 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Not watching the news makes you happier.

		-- u/j_abitante, 41095 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: On mobile use chrome to watch youtube and request the desktop version. Now you can listen to youtube in the background while the screen is locked.

Edit: As /u/yayPower pointed out it seems like one has to open a new tab for this to work.

Second Edit:

Wow this got bigger than expected. Thank you for the gold kind stranger. 

It doesn't seem to work on every Android device. I'm on a Nokia 8 and have tested it multiple times now and it definitely works.

Sometimes you have to additionally press play on the lockscreen for it to work.

As several people mentioned there are multiple third party apps that may do a better job at this.
		-- u/t-jark, 47161 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Once you move out of your childhood home, try every style of food again!! Even the ones you think you hate

Parents, family, and caregivers are a lot of things - but more often than not, they aren’t professional chefs. But in your youth, you can only form opinions based off what you experience. Growing up, I always assumed I was a “picky” eater. And would avoid tasting or trying new things, having had an ingredient or two I disliked in my childhood, and assuming I wouldn’t like the dish. 

In turns out, my mother just was a terrible cook. It wasn’t until I set out into the world and realized so many things are delicious! Don’t like vegetables? I didn’t either when they were slopped out of a can and put on my plate. But grilled and seasoned correctly? Absolutely delicious. 

If you feel you have a limited pallet and typically just stick to foods you know are “safe” PLEASE do yourself a favor and try them when prepared at a restaurant! Or even just watch YouTube videos on how to prepare them appropriately yourself. Odds are, you’re missing out on a world of delicious culinary offerings all because of a misconception formed in your youth. You more than likely don’t “hate” a certain type of food, you’ve just never experienced it cooked correctly. 

Bon appetit!
		-- u/No_Salamander_6579, 42951 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Once you’ve already made a mistake, or let someone down, HEAVILY resist the temptation to over-explain, justify, or excuse your actions. Own up to it, offer to make up for it, and move on.

		-- u/Danokitty, 52743 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: One 18 inch pizza contains more pizza surface than two 12 inch pizzas. Calculate the area of a circle and with an 18 inch you get 256 square inches of pizza versus 226 on the 2 mediums. If you want the most bang for your buck, consider the larger sizes and feed more people for less money.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 44640 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: One of the biggest reasons people have messy living spaces is that they don't have enough dedicated places for their stuff. Try to give everything a defined space to be in/on/under and you will be much less likely to just drop it wherever.

		-- u/Dota2TradeAccount, 37768 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: One of the first things you should do when moving into a new home is to change the locks. You never know who might have a key to the house in their possession.

		-- u/[deleted], 38672 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Open VLC and drag a youtube link to it. It'll play in VLC (with all the capabilities of VLC), and it'll skip ads.

		-- u/Eoussama, 50657 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Open chip bags upside down. They've been sitting upright most of their lives which makes the seasoning settle to the bottom of the bag.

Edit: Hey, thanks for the silver and gold whoever did that! I'm definitely pleasantly surprised this blew up like it did. Never knew that chip bag opening could be such a hot topic.

Aside from the seasoning (yeah, agreed that this only really happens with some chip types), the bigger part of this for me is that the little crunched up pieces fall into the big chips, so you get big chips that are topped with tiny more seasoned chips throughout the bag.

Also agree from a health standpoint, the better LPT is probably to eat fewer chips :-P But nothing wrong with treating yourself every now and then.

Thanks again folks! Fun way to end the weekend :)
		-- u/chud_munson, 39328 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Overwatering kills more houseplants than underwatering, and its symptoms are very similar. When in doubt, don't water. Other beginner tips in the post.

Many people enthusiastically bring home a pretty houseplant for the first time, and proceed to water it every day to keep it happy. While understandable, you're setting yourself for heartbreak and frustration.  It is natural to assume that the one thing we know we have to do to plants should be done often, and the more often the better, but root rot is usually not fixable and will slowly kill your lovely plant. Underwatering, on the other hand, can be fixed very easily. As a rule of a thumb, once a week is perfect for most plants.

Missing the outdoors and ending up with about 60 houseplants through a year of lockdown, I have learned that majority of them prefer to be left to their own devices. Here is a rather conclusive guide working for vast majority of widely available plants:

- give them a sunny spot. Seems obvious, but we might be tempted to place them for aesthetics out of sun. There are plants that don't mind (ferns are the best example), but most do. Give them sun or grow light. Remember that more sun makes them dry up more often (so on a sunny window sill, water once every 5 days, in a shadowy corner, once every week)

- once every 2 weeks, take a soft cloth, slightly wet, and clean the leaves. Dust sets on them as well, and it makes it harder for them to undertake photosynthesis properly. It is also a rather soothing activity. Everyone wins.

- get a plant food. They are usually cheap and you can also make your own, and they can make your plant grow like crazy. Don't overfertilise tho - about once every 3 months enough. Too much fertiliser is a thing, and it can burn them. Don't fertilise in the winter.

- ⚠️ on the topic of eating, many houseplants are toxic to pets if ingested. If you have pets, particularly playful ones, make sure to research ahead to avoid trouble!

- Don't rush to repot. I know you want to put them in these cute pots you got, but keep them in nursery pots for at least a month. Many plants experience environmental change shock between you taking them from the store and bringing them home, so don't make it harder for them, they will thank you with many happy years in those sweet pots of yours.

- speaking of pots, always have drainage. Try not to put plants straight into a decorative pot without drainage - get a bigger planter and put it in with nursery pot and tray.

- chop of leaves that go yellow - they won't go green again, and the plant is wasting resources on it.

- if cactuses or succulents, you still have to water them, albeit rarely. Many people recommend cactuses as the most beginner houseplants, but you can absolutely kill both cactuses and succulents, and not only as a beginner (I'll be the first one to admit I've killed a few). But even if they do not die on you, they will not look as lush as when bought in few months unless quite a lot of care is given. If you really want an unkillable plant, get a pothos or peace lily. They both droop when thirsty (so they give you a clear indication as to when to water them), have a lovely chunky foliage, are quite cheap and very sturdy. Another great ones are snake plants. Most cactuses and succulents would go on 4th and 5th place on the "hardest to kill" list.

- your plant may experience a bit of a shock after about half a year since you bought it, as the fertiliser given in store usually runs out around that time. Don't panic, it is not dying, just give it a little love and plant food and it will be happy again.

Follow these and you should be just fine for the majority of plants.

Houseplanrs are awesome decorations that can light up any place, and more than you think are extremely low maintenance. It is a nice hobby for the soul, and don't stress if you kill one, happens to everyone every now and then. Some species are drama queens, and some specimen of no-fuss plants are ungrateful bastards. That being said, most will comply, because they want to be alive just as much as you want them alive. [Here](https://youtu.be/l6huWZZaZek) is a little guide on what to expect from common low maintenance species. Good luck! 💚
		-- u/encouragemintx, 58873 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Pack a go-bag. Throw a few clothes and a few basic supplies (toiletries, granola bars, money) in a duffel bag. Leave it in your trunk.

My wife mocks me (lovingly) for keeping a go-bag in my trunk. I recently had abdominal pains at work and had an emergency appendectomy. Guess who strolled into the ER (ok, hobbled in and practically crying) with a gym bag with pyjamas, tooth brush/paste, glasses, warm socks, device charger and headphones. 

Honestly, it made my life easier as I could be as comfortable as possible without making my wife run around putting stuff together and running the gauntlet of COVID screening to drop stuff off for me.

Edit: there are thousands of variants of go-bags and tutorials on what to pack. If you live in a hurricane zone, your bag may be different than my general purpose bag or my winter car kit. Pack something.
		-- u/EtOHMartini, 41581 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Parents of young children, take your kids out to breakfast occasionally (once Covid has passed). Breakfast is typically child-friendly, meals are served quickly and are relatively inexpensive. This is a great way to teach young children how to behave in a sit-down restaurant.

		-- u/aeraen, 68620 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Pay Attention to the smell of your home when you come back from a trip - that's what it smells like to guests all the time, you just get used to it.

Whoa! Front page! And all because I stumbled back in my house, half-asleep and jet lagged from Vegas and noticed my house really smells like my dog. I have so many people to thank! And so many dogs to thank! Like mine, for example. 

Edit: Thanks for the gold! And to the rest of you, uh, go Bears and Trubisky is the future. 
		-- u/ProfessorLiftoff, 103518 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Peel off the painter's tape when you are done painting and the paint is still wet. If you wait for it to dry, the clean lines will be ruined.

Learn from my infuriating experience!!

Edit: holy crap this thing took off like a rocket ship. I have nothing to add here other than I genuinely, from the bottom of my heart, wish you guys the best of luck on your painting projects. I hope the awful experience I had with painters tape serves as a cautionary tale and hope you don’t make the same mistake I did. :)

Edit 2: almost 42k upvotes. This. Is. Insanity. I knew my undergrad and grad degrees in English would pay off. TAKE THAT MOM AND DAD!!!!!!!!!!

Edit 3: After my rags to riches story where I became a billionaire with this post, my inbox has been dessimated. Currently looking for someone to sift thru it and to only save the nudes. You can find the job posting on LinkedIn if interested. Good luck to all the candidates.

Edit 4: \* Decimated.
		-- u/w00dw0rk3r, 62687 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: People can have invisible disabilities- don’t assume someone is “totally fine” if they look able-bodied and mentally with it. Just because you can’t see them struggling doesn’t mean they aren’t- they might just be really good at hiding it.

Someone’s life is rarely how it appears on the surface and there can be a lot more going on than you think- avoid making assumptions based on how they appear to you.
		-- u/Chunky_pickle, 46483 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: People outside the EU can now revoke consent for personal info use in targeted advertisements on Reddit.

Check the settings and security options on the website or on mobile.
		-- u/PlasmaCow511, 46525 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Pet guardians: your relationships with your pets will improve drastically if you remember that your pets are companions for you, not worshipers or ego inflators. Treat them with respect and a sense of humor, as you would a friend.

Creating rigid expectations for your pets or taking bad behavior personally (“my feelings are hurt because my dog likes X more than me” or “my dog makes me look bad when he does Y”) often makes problems worse.  

If you want to develop a stronger relationship, build it through play, training, and kindness. Don’t do things that bother your pet for fun (like picking up a cat that doesn’t like it, touching a dog in a way that annoys them, etc.). 

And remember that every animal is an individual and has a different personality. Some animals don’t appreciate some kinds of connection with others, or have traumas to contend with that make their bonding take more time. Have expectations of your pets that are rooted in fairness and love, not ego or the expectation to be worshipped.

Last but not least, if your pet needs help, get them the appropriate help, as you would a friend. This will also help build trust.

My opinion is that animals don’t exist to worship humans, but my experience is that we can earn their love and affection through respect ❤️
		-- u/wilderness_friend, 49004 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: Pets are not good Christmas presents. Thousands of cats and dogs given as gifts are dropped off at shelters after the Holidays.

Thank you for all the awards! For extra measure, after the holidays animal shelters will need extra volunteers. Why not make that one of your New Year's Eve resolutions?
		-- u/bluelily216, 38662 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Police don't need a warrant to enter your phone if they use your biometrics. If you turn off your phone before arrest, your phone should default to using the password instead upon restart causes the police to need a warrant to access it.

EDIT: it seems that in California police need a warrant for biometrics as well

To those saying you shouldn't have anything to hide, you obviously don't realize how often police abuse their power in the US. You have a right to privacy. It is much easier for police to force you to use biometrics "consentually" than forfeit your passcode.
		-- u/linguiniluigi, 57574 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Potatoes are cheaper than Ramen, have more nutritional value, and will keep you full longer

If you are strapped for cash and need food, instead of trying Ramen and Noodles, buy a big bag of potatoes, there are so many ways of cooking them and almost all are delicious.
		-- u/[deleted], 68543 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Procrastinators, make a PHYSICAL to-do list. Carry it with you. As you mark off each item, you will experience a sense of accomplishment and feel better about yourself. Start with a small and manageable list and expand as you get better.

The visceral action of scratching off an item as they get done, as well as the visual aspect of seeing what was accomplished can be psychologically rewarding and addicting.
		-- u/ihavethebestmarriage, 37689 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Put a mirror behind you at the counter or at your desk. This way angry customers who approach you will have to see themselves in the mirror behind you and the chances of them behaving irrationally lowers significantly. No one wants to see themselves act like a dickhead.

		-- u/uv147, 90562 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Recording narration? When you make a mistake, clap your hands. Later, when you're editing the audio, the claps will show up as spikes on the waveform and make editing much easier

		-- u/angel_butts_69, 76082 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Reddit can be just as addicting, and mentally damaging as other social media. Take a step back every once in a while

Lets be real, Reddit can be quite repetitive, frustrating, and sometimes straight up depressing (especially if you follow the news and politics closely), so it's nice to take a step back and leave it for a while.
I think that it helps me, especially around this time of year, to connect with the people close to me.

I'm not saying to quit Reddit forever, it's a great site. But a break can do you some good.

Edit: I’m surprised that so many people actually agree with this, but it makes me feel more sane knowing that I guess haha. Think I’ll take my own advice and leave Reddit for a while. Thanks for all the comments!
		-- u/Randomlychozen1665, 45059 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Reddit has quietly enabled a setting that, by default, allows them to collect your location data. Disable it by going into your privacy settings.

Edit: if you're deleting the app, consider switching to [Ruqqus](https://ruqqus.com)
		-- u/selplacei, 66416 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: Remember that tomorrow is April Fool’s Day and the Internet will be lying to you more than normal

Hopefully people will take into account that COVID-19 might not make this the best time to try for a “funny” lie, but it seems unlikely.
		-- u/majorjoe23, 41420 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Rememeber, at a job interview, YOU are also interviewing the company. Ask more questions, don’t settle so quickly because it might not be for you after all

		-- u/LordNadez, 55381 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Reminder that you can create unlimited email addresses in gmail by adding a plus sign followed by a word to your existing address. Use different emails such as email+netflix@gmail.com, email+spotify @gmail.com for different services.

This also helps identify who is selling your email since spam will be addressed to the specific email. You can filter out the address to keep your inbox spam free.

Edit: Just to be clear, you don’t have to create a new email address just use this format when signing up on a website. The emails will still reach your original mailbox.
		-- u/[deleted], 47291 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Remove all dealer decals from the back of your car. Its your vehicle now and they are using you for free advertising.

RIP my inbox. Thank you redditors for the awards, the varying opinions and valid counter arguments and  a special shoutout to all the toxic haters who helped me make the front page.
		-- u/[deleted], 84618 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Responding to everything with negativity is a terrible habit that's easy to fall into. Internet culture rewards us for pessimism, but during personal interactions it's a huge turn-off.

I used to be an extremely negative person, and I still have a lot of trouble fighting my instinct to tear everything down. That's what gets the most attention in online spaces, complaining about or deconstructing something. This became doubly intense when I hit my angry atheist phase around 20. I actually remember alienating potential new friends by shitting on every movie/game/activity/belief system they brought up, and when they would stop texting me back I'd think "I wish this person wasn't so boring." I wanted them to play the negativity game with me. 

A cool decade later, I've figured out that they weren't boring at all. I was. Everyone knew not to float an idea my way, because I'd predictably tear it apart. I now run into people who act like I used to act, and I feel so bad for them. I wish I could tell them "hey, if you shoot down everything everyone says, nobody is going to want to say anything to you anymore."
		-- u/SimpleFortune8353, 56380 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Reverse image search before purchasing from Wayfair

When shopping online, many people know to Google the product name to see if they can find the same exact product cheaper from another store. Wayfair  their brands (Joss  Main, AllModern,  Birch Lane) rename all their products/vendors  give them bogus names so it's harder to do this  make it seem like the product is exclusive to them when it's not.

Reverse image search to find the real product name and manufacturer name  then you can much more easily find it somewhere else - often for cheaper.

---

Let's take a lamp for example:

* **["Mailiah 29" Table Lamp" by "Highland Dunes"](https://www.wayfair.com/lighting/pdp/highland-dunes-mailiah-29-table-lamp-w000784812.html?piid=627550410) on Wayfair** ($127.99)

But when you [reverse image search](https://www.google.com/search?tbs=sbi:AMhZZisaBUOrMWZcFrSm36J185qOshtSbrdWKbbo9-bfBDOUONL88hhDMOD6SRMU-JbLDiCMLcVaaMwJrA3mrmohpChd_1wEJaipToQaUkGCk4lgni-psKtXJe1dkf_13XWTrOeKYfcz_1OVJqy9bKnBJQhNXrAgKW5_1iqx5td1fY0E3DkexFSTSsk_1sjQaHvB09kdnhw6nJh2ROuk5kfu3XbKIH6pee1UxPbYB0mFZcwXSkGY-SwbRPjG1Qz8B9uEl0W1OyhryGnplXzA0yBa0Md1jdFTEsAGikpk8Rp6GjtoDkBCAl93TDgS1qBCLTQ0_1R9C67kV5jprOFj3Qg6tQoighWh3yA8Vq0Ahl=en) you'll see it's really called:

* **"Ollie 29" Table Lamp" by "Catalina Lighting"**

Now that you know the real name, you can easily see it's sold at [Walmart ($105.59)](https://www.walmart.com/ip/Catalina-Lighting-Catalina-Ollie-29-3-Way-Clear-Dimpled-Glass-Table-Lamp/41235796?wmlspartner=wlpaselectedSellerId=1812adid=22222222227028874167wl0=wl1=gwl2=cwl3=61668264369wl4=aud-393207457166:pla-97832547369wl5=9007924wl6=wl7=wl8=wl9=plawl10=102975322wl11=onlinewl12=41235796veh=semgclid=CjwKCAjwqJ_1BRBZEiwAv73uwEyE9OE-2CA2Dx835PkSd7aGkrmVdI_Sa5zUv4NR7DVtXgPJV-JWQRoCalcQAvD_BwE), [Overstock ($105.59)](https://www.overstock.com/Lighting-Ceiling-Fans/Catalina-Ollie-29-3-Way-Clear-Dimpled-Glass-Table-Lamp/16291018/product.html?refccid=RTVGTIFQWA7ZBFKAGSD5DQVGBUsearchidx=0lowestPriceOptionId=27045503kwds=Catalina%20Ollie%2029%26quot%3B%203-Way%20Clear%20Dimpled%20Glass%20Table%20Lamprfmt=), [Kohl's ($203.99)](https://www.kohls.com/product/prd-2612423/catalina-dimpled-table-lamp.jsp?skuid=77383726),  [Amazon ($105.59)](https://smile.amazon.com/Catalina-Lighting-19144-000-29-inch/dp/B00MYC0R2S/ref=sr_1_1?dchild=1keywords=catalina+lighting+ollie+lampqid=1588098101sr=8-1). And it's $22.40 cheaper on Amazon, Walmart  Overstock

---

Edit 1:
Here are a few methods to reverse image search. I'm sure there are more.

Desktop:

* Right-click an image  select "Search Google for this image" (maybe this only words in certain browsers, not entirely sure)

* Or you can use [images.google.com](http://www.images.google.com)  click the camera icon to upload a pic or paste the URL of the image

Mobile:

* Use Chrome and hold down on an image  select "Search Google for This Image"
* Use the Google app  open Google Lens
* Use [tineye.com](http://www.tineye.com)

---

Edit 2: Added the current prices for that lamp since prices will change in the future.

Also a couple more notes:

* Some commenters let me know this practice is called "white labeling." I'm assuming it's legal because the suppliers agree for Wayfair to do it when they agree to sell on Wayfair.

* This doesn't always work; sometimes Wayfair has it cheapest. So you can also try this tip the opposite way if you're about to buy something at Target/Home Depot/Macy's/etc, you can reverse image search to see if Wayfair has it cheaper under a fake name.

* Wayfair creates their own photos/renderings sometimes, so you may need to try a few photos.

* Since Wayfair, Joss  Main, AllModern,  Birch Lane are all owned by the same company, they often offer the same product on multiple sites with different prices. Sometimes the names are the same, sometimes different. So be sure to check their other sites too before purchasing.

    For example, this 5' x 8' rug is on all four sister sites:

    *  Wayfair: [Handmad Braided Gray Indoor / Outdoor Area Rug by Wade Logan](https://www.wayfair.com/rugs/pdp/wade-logan-handmade-braided-gray-indoor-outdoor-area-rug-w002904453.html?piid=836378768)  - $143.99
    * Joss  Main: [Handmade Braided Gray Indoor / Outdoor Area Rug](https://www.jossandmain.com/rugs/pdp/handmade-braided-gray-indoor-outdoor-area-rug-wdln2358.html?piid=23573723) - $158.39
    * Birch Lane: [Handmade Braided Gray Indoor / Outdoor Area Rug](https://www.birchlane.com/rugs/pdp/handmade-braided-gray-indoor-outdoor-area-rug-wdln2358.html?piid=23573723) - $144
    * AllModern: [Walmsley Gray Area Rug](https://www.allmodern.com/rugs/pdp/walmsley-gray-area-rug-a000204971.html?piid=2002933957) - $150

    So you may think you're getting the best deal at Wayfair, but reverse image search helps you find that it's really called the "Lefebvre" rug made by a company called "nuLOOM"  you can easily find out it's sold at [Home Depot](https://www.homedepot.com/pep/nuLOOM-Lefebvre-Casual-Braided-Salt-Pepper-5-ft-x-8-ft-Indoor-Outdoor-Area-Rug-HJFV01C-508/206984584), [Target](https://www.target.com/p/braided-lefebvre-rug-nuloom/-/A-51692002?preselect=51529119#lnk=sametab), [Kohl's](https://www.kohls.com/product/prd-2851085/nuloom-festival-lefebvre-terra-solid-rug.jsp?skuid=63960126), [Lowe's](https://www.lowes.com/pd/nuLOOM-Salt-and-Pepper-Indoor-Outdoor-Coastal-Area-Rug-Common-5-x-8-Actual-5-ft-W-x-8-ft-L/1001110766), [JCPenney](https://www.jcpenney.com/p/nuloom-braided-lefebvre-salt-and-pepper-rug/ppr5007334058), [Macy's](https://www.macys.com/shop/product/nuloom-festival-braided-lefebvre-area-rug?ID=10572683),  [Bed Bath  Beyond](https://www.bedbathandbeyond.com/store/product/nuloom-festival-lefebvre-braided-rug-in-black-white/3321002?skuId=77145577) for anywhere from $111.92 (Home Depot) to $367.20 (Macy's) - in which case you'd obviously go with Home Depot.
		-- u/refusestopoop, 37423 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Roast yo’ broccoli. Broccoli is a cheap, ubiquitous vegetable that too often is steamed or boiled to death, sapping nutrients and flavor. Toss with olive oil and salt and roast at 400.

Edit: A lot of people are asking about cooking time. I didn’t include that because it’s very subjective. I like the florets browned and the stems crunchy. 15 minutes at 400 degrees is a good guess for that, but if you like softer veggies and less browning you might want to decrease the temp to 350-375 and go a little longer. The stems won’t have as much “bite” that way.

That said, you’ll want to check in on it and see for yourself. I use color more than time to determine doneness.
		-- u/RockleyBob, 87215 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Scratch your girl's back underneath her bra band

Attention men and ladies who like ladies: scratch your girl's back right where the bra band sits. It feels amazing! Especially after a long day!

Edit: OMG! This blew up! Thank you so much for the awards! Scratches for all!

Thank you /u/hopleaflet!

Edit 2: Holy shit! Thank you! Thank you so much for the awards! All because I like my back scratched LOL!
		-- u/PantySniffers, 59246 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Shift + Backspace deletes word by word, rather than letter by letter.

CTRL + BACKSPACE, for most modern programs

OPTION + DELETE (ALT + BACKSPACE), if you're on a Mac

CTRL + W, if you're using a Linux terminal
		-- u/Rezanator11, 48412 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Since there are reports that the United States Government will possibly be sending money by check or direct deposit to American citizens "shortly," the FTC has made a list of three important tips to keep in mind.

The details are still being worked out, but there are a few really important things to know:

1. The government will not ask you to pay anything up front to get this money. No fees. No charges. No nothing.

2. The government will not call to ask for your Social Security number, bank account, or credit card number. Anyone who does is a scammer.

3. These reports of checks aren’t yet a reality. Anyone who tells you they can get you the money now is a scammer.

Predict that the scammers are gearing up to take advantage of this.  So, remember: no matter what this payment winds up being, only scammers will ask you to pay to get it. If you spot one of these scams, please tell the Federal Trade Commission: [www.ftc.gov/complaint](http://www.ftc.gov/complaint). W

The FTC encourages you to keep up to date with the latest Coronavirus-related scams at [www.ftc.gov/coronavirus](http://www.ftc.gov/coronavirus) or by [signing up to get these consumer alerts. ](http://www.ftc.gov/subscribe)

FTC notice reference: [https://www.consumer.ftc.gov/blog/2020/03/checks-government?utm\_source=govdelivery](https://www.consumer.ftc.gov/blog/2020/03/checks-government?utm_source=govdelivery)

Edit 3: WOW THIS BLEW UP, THAT'S AWESOME! Lots of questions in the comments about the $1,000 - Please keep in mind this post is to educate yourself and others about the scammers that have probably already started scamming people. 

Edit 2: if you sort by ‘QA’ I made a‘copy text’ so you can share these three tips easily

Edit: since this has exploded (which I am grateful for!) I would like to also point out some things...

I’m not sure of the numbers but people fall for the classic “CONGRATULATIONS MR/MRS; PRINCE of x country wants to give you a MILLION dollars!!!!! if you give us your information” all of the time. And that is 100% a lie, but people STILL FALL FOR IT. 

Think about this.. the news is telling people the government is giving them $1000. So when someone calls requesting their information, the news told them its happening so it has to be true. Like, holy shit people! This is going to get so many people and it’s not getting the attention it deserves on a national level! 

Please please please spread this! If I could I’d trade all the awards (thank you for them) on this post to save ONE person from being scammed out of (what is probably) their life savings I would. Thank you everyone. Please spread this!
		-- u/EricPro21, 62697 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Single people at work are often expected to pick up the slack (with no extra remuneration) when their colleagues set good limits because they have families. It's OK to have a life and have boundaries with your job to spend time doing things other than being with kids or a partner.

It's also OK to expect to be compensated for the extra work, if you do it.
		-- u/survivalothefittest, 38422 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Some of your friends need to be explicitly invited to stuff

Some of your friends *NEED* to be invited to stuff

If you're someone who just does things like going to the movies or a bar as a group or whatever, some if your friends will think that you don't want them there unless you explicitly encourage them to attend. 

This will often include people who have been purposely excluded or bullied in their younger years. 

Invite your shy friends places - they aren't being aloof, they just don't feel welcome unless you say so.
		-- u/TheLastTransHero, 58649 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Some people aren't good at asking for help because they're so used to being 'the helper'.

Throughout their life they've experienced an unbalanced give and take, so their instinct is usually "I'll figure it out on my own". So please Check in on the "helpers" in your life.
		-- u/ritzz2_0, 63007 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Some tips for buying a used car for people that know nothing about cars

I’m a mechanic/auto shop owner. I figured I’d put some stuff together for anyone interested in buying a used car but doesn’t know anything about cars. Obviously the best option is to take it to an auto shop to have it thoroughly inspected by a professional before you buy it. The key word here is BEFORE you buy it. I don’t know how many people I’ve had come to my shop for an inspection after they bought it….ugghh. The $150 or so you spend is worth not buying something that may have thousands of dollars of problems. But if that’s not an option, here are some tips to help keep you from buying a lemon:

1-Buy a cheap OBD scanner/reader. You don’t need to spend a lot, as they’ll all do what you need here. A bluetooth OBD reader and the TORQ app for you phone seems to be pretty popular/good choice. Practice using it on some cars. Some of the stuff I'm going over may seem daunting, but if you practice it on a car a few times, you'll get the hang of it, and this will all make sense. You could be saving yourself thousands in repair here, so take a few hours to practice it. It's not hard once you do. You should be able to do all of the stuff I'm going to talk about with your scanner in under 5 mins total. You don’t have to worry about reading and interpreting data. The main thing you want to do is check for codes in the engine and transmission ECUs. ECU stands for Electronic Contrul Unit. Basically, it's the computer that controls the engine or transmission. They are sometimes referred to as ECM, or Engine Control Module, and TCM, or Transmission Control Module. Sometimes they'll be referred to as PCM, or Powertrain Control Module. This is what it's called when only one computer controls both the engine and automatic transmission. The PCM may be one physical computer, but logically, it's 2 computers. So if you connect your scanner to a PCM, you'll still see two separate options, one for engine, and one for transmission. Do note that if you have a manual transmission, there won't be a transmission computer.

So when you connect to each one, there should be no codes in either. If there are codes, there’s an issue. It may be minor, it may be major. Google it if you want, but not knowing what the codes mean, your best bet is to walk away. If your scanner is a better one, you can also check other modules (computers) for codes. However, it’s pretty common on newer cars, especially European, to find obscure codes in obscure modules. Normally they’re not an issue. Focus on the Engine and Transmission. ABS (antilock brakes) and SRS (safety restrain system...airbags, seat belts, etc) modules normally shouldn’t have codes lingering either. Make sure to also check after test driving. The codes may have been reset by the seller to hide a problem (more on that in the next paragraph). They may have returned during your test drive, so check again!

Use the scanner to check the monitors on the engine ECU/Computer. Monitors are a series of self checks that the ECU does on the engine. All applicable monitors should be set (passed/complete). They get reset when you clear the check engine light, or when you disconnect the battery (usually). If all of the monitors haven’t passed, then it’s quite likely the person selling it has reset the check engine light recently (may be trying to hide a problem), or there’s a problem that isn’t allowing the monitor to complete. Not a good sign.  Walk away. To complete all of the monitors can take quite a few miles and sometimes several days. So there's a good window there for you to catch someone doing some hanky panky.

2. Crank the engine without starting it. What you want to do is listen to the engine during a continuous crank. On American cars and on Mazdas, this is easy, as they have what’s known as a Clear Flood Mode. You turn the key to the on position, wait a few seconds, depress the gas pedal all the way, then try to start it. The engine will crank away without starting for as long as you hold the key (or in the case of a push button start, until you hit the button again). If the engine starts, quickly let off the gas so you don’t revv up the engine too high and try it again. You’ll want to listen to it for a good 10 seconds or so. This is a very easy way to check compression on an engine. The main thing you hear when cranking an engine is the electric starter working to try and spin the engine. As a piston comes up and compresses the air, the starter has to work harder to spin the engine, and the speed/pitch of the starter changes. Once the piston comes back down, it’s easier to spin the engine, so the speed/pitch changes back, and then repeats as each consecutive piston moves up in the compression stroke. Every engine sounds different, but they all should have a very steady rhythmic starting noise. Kind of a WAAA WAAA WAAA WAAA WAAA. If one or more of the cylinders has low compression, you will hear the starter have an off-rhythmic sound that repeats. So for instance, if you have a 4 cylinder engine with one low compression cylinder, it would sound like WAAA WAAA WA WAAA WAAA WAAA WA WAAA WAAA WAAA WA WAAA etc. Every 4th pitch change will sound different than the other 3.

For reference, here’s what a normal cranking sound should be: [https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6v0h\_Ygqox0](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6v0h_Ygqox0)

Here’s what a low compression cylinder cranking sounds like. It’s at about :55 secs :[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pOghpmVhVng](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pOghpmVhVng)

If you listen closely, you’ll hear the unsteady rhythm. Loss of compression is usually piston rings, valves, or head gasket. All costly. If the engine sounds funny when cranking, walk away.

If the car you’re looking at doesn’t have a clear flood mode, you can remove the fuel pump relay in the engine compartment fuse box, which turns off the fuel pump. Most cars have one, but some don’t. Some cars can be a real PITA to disable it from starting. Google the car you’re looking at with something like “YYYY Make Model clear flood” or  “YYYY Make Model disable fuel pump” and see if there’s an easy way to achieve this. I'm sure there will be a Youtube video showing you exactly how to do this.

Practice this beforehand on cars you have access to if possible to tune your ear to the sound. You can also do this periodically on your own car to see if any problems are arising.

3. Check the fluids. All of the fluids will have minimum/maximum marks. If fluids are low, someone has not been maintaining the car well, or it has developed a leak. Not a good sign. When checking the engine oil, it should range from clear to black. If it looks like chocolate milkshake, there is a major problem. RUN AWAY. You can also smell the oil on the dipstick to see if it smells like gasoline. If it smells like raw gasoline, the engine is either injecting way too much fuel or you have bad piston rings. Either way they're bad. If the oil level is WAY above the full mark, like an inch or more, then either some other fluid is making it's way into the engine (very bad) or someone sucks at doing an oil change. Remember to check the oil with the engine off and on level ground. Some new cars don’t have dipsticks (mainly European). If so, you’re SOL. Check the coolant in the reservoir. It should be green, pink, red, yellow, orange, blue, or purple, depending on manufacturer. If it’s rusty, walk away. Remove the radiator cap (only if the engine is cold) and look at the cap and in the radiator. If you see any rust or chunky/gritty brown stuff, walk away. If it’s just water, walk away (be careful here, Ford’s yellow coolant almost looks clear). Check the automatic transmission fluid. For the most part, it should be red, but sometimes amber or green. It may be black. That’s dirty. Not a deal breaker, but they haven’t been keeping up on maintenance. It should not smell burnt, though. That’s bad. If it looks like strawberry milkshake, that’s really bad. Also, remember that you should check the level on automatic transmissions while the engine is running in Park and after driving it and getting the transmission good and hot. The only exception is most Hondas. That’s checked after driving but with the engine off. Google it for the car you plan on looking at to make sure. Many new cars don’t have a transmission dipsticks, so again, you’re SOL there.

4. Start the engine and listen for any noises. The engine should be cold. If it’s at operating temperature, the seller may have warmed it up to hide some cold start engine noises. Be wary. If it makes any noises, walk away.

5. Look for maintenance records. If it has consistent oil change records at an oil change place, at least they’ve been changing the oil. Unfortunately, oil change places only check easy profitable stuff. It’s better than nothing, though. If the records are all at an independent shop, that’s better. Indy’s will usually do a pretty thorough check up on the car when servicing it. If it has all dealer records, that’s the holy grail. Dealers will find any nick nack that’s wrong and upsell it. They also commonly don’t do thorough diagnostics (this is an unfortunate effect of the way dealer shops operate). So if it needed repairs, on top of having new parts that needed replacing, it may have other new parts that it didn’t even need. Plus those new parts will be good quality OEM parts, not chines junk of questionable quality.

6. Check that everything works on the car. Check the A/C, the heater, the windows, the locks, the mirrors, the head/parking/brake lights, etc. If the owner neglected to fix obvious problems, what else did they decide not to fix?

7. Look under the hood and look for any hokey work. Random zip ties holding things on, tape, broken plastic pieces, a battery that can move around if you push on it, wires hanging, etc. If it looks like unprofessional work has been done on what you can see, how bad is what you can’t see?

8. How does the car look? Is it dirty, full of scratches, stained? If the owner cares so little about the interior/exterior, they probably have the same attitude towards the mechanical part of it.

9. Check the tires. Aside from general condition, do they all match? If all the tires are different, they’re cheap/broke, and have probably cheaped out on a lot more than just tires. Lay your hand flat on the tire tread and light feel around the tires. If you feel a repeating pattern of flat spots/dips, you have suspension problems.

10. Try and stay away from used car dealers. Used car dealers get the majority of their cars from auctions. A lot of cars that go to auction are sent there by someone that doesn’t want it, usually because there are problems. Not all, but many. New car dealers send trade-ins that are too old or the wrong make to put on their lot, and some of those are decent. However, the small used car dealers usually buy the bottom of the barrel cars at auction. They’ll fix the minimum needed with the cheapest parts possible to maximize profit. They’ll make it look pretty, though. Good chance you’re buying a polished turd. Not all used car dealers are bad, though. Check reviews. Look at what they have on the lot. If they have a lot of high resale value cars on the lot, they're buying the good stuff at acution. If all of their cars are under $10k, with a lot under $5k, move on.

11. Obviously, test drive the car. Drive it at different speeds up to highway speeds. Brake easy, brake hard. Find a crappy road or railroad tracks to drive over. Make sure there are no noises or vibrations. Get it good and warm. When you’re done, open the hood and take a good whiff. Make sure there are no strong smells (like burning fluids or other things). Look under the car and see if anything is dripping or the bottom of the engine is covered in fluids (bring a flashlight, it can get dark under there). Don’t be alarmed if you see water dripping under the car at about the same area as the base of the windshield/firewall. If the A/C or defroster was on, that is just condensate from the A/C system. Touch it. If it’s not oily and looks/feels like water, it should be OK. If you’re test driving a manual car, the clutch engagement point should be somewhere in the middle of the clutch pedal travel. If it’s right at the top or right at the bottom, clutch repairs are in the near future.

12. This one is a little more advanced, but not too difficult. It’s also pretty important. You’ll need your OBD scanner. What you want to do is look at the engine data and search for the fuel trims. An engine computer injects fuel based on a bunch of sensor inputs. It has a base fuel map programmed into it that it references, based on those sensor inputs, and injects XXX amount of fuel. There is an oxygen sensor in the exhaust system that analyzes the exhaust gas and acts like a quality control inspector. It tells the computer whether it injected too much or too little fuel. The computer then makes adjustments to that base fuel map to make sure it’s injecting the proper amount of fuel. Those adjustments are called fuel trims. A 5% fuel trim would mean the computer had to add 5% more fuel than the base map. A -5% fuel trim would mean that the computer had to reduce fuel by 5% from the base fuel map. In a perfect world, fuel trims would be zero. However, that’s rarely the case. Fuel quality, different atmospheric conditions, engine wear, engine or sensor problems, etc, make it so that the base fuel map is never perfect, so the computer is always adding or subtracting fuel (usually it’s adding, but sometimes it’s subtracting). I don’t like to see a computer adding or subtracting more than 10% fuel. Any more than that and there may be a problem. Any more than 15-20% and there is definitely a problem.

So what you’re going to want to do is look at the data on the engine computer. You want to make sure you connect to the computer using the GENERIC OBD2 option on your scanner. Different car manufacturers will call these fuel trims by different names, and display the percentage in different ways. If you connect to the engine computer the standard way, you may be confused trying to find and read the fuel trims. But if you connect using the generic obd option, it’s always going to use a standardized display format across all vehicles. Some really cheap OBD scanners only connect using the generic OBD protocol. You’re going to see a long list of a bunch of different data. Scroll through until you find “short term fuel trim” and “long term fuel trim”. I'm not going to explain what the difference between those two data parameters are, as that doesn't matter here, and may end up being confusing. I'm just going to tell you what to do with the values you see.

Short term fuel trim, depending on your scanner, may be displayed as: Short term fuel trim, STFT, ST, or ST%

Long term fuel trim may be displayed as: Long Term Fuel Trim, LTFT, LT, or LT%

Let’s assume your scanner uses the more common STFT and LTFT designation. You’re going to see a number after the letters, so STFT1 and LTFT1. The number means the “bank” or side of the engine. A 4 cylinder engine only has one “side” so you’ll only see STFT1 and LTFT1. However, a V6 or V8 engine has two sides of the engine (3 or 4 cylinders on one side, and 3 or 4 cylinder on the other side, hence the V6 or V8). The computer controls fuel independently for each side of the engine, so you’ll see a STFT1 and LTFT1 for one side of the engine, and STFT2 and LTFT2 for the other side. Don’t be alarmed if you’re looking at a V6 or V8 engine and you only see STFT1 and LTFT1. Many late 90s cars and some early 2000s cars didn’t control fuel separately for each side of the engine, and lumped both sides into one bank.

When looking at the short term and long term fuel trims, you’ll notice the long term fuel trim number stays pretty steady, but the short term fuel trim number may change a lot. This is normal. What is important to note is that they are cumulative. So if STFT=4 and LTFT=3, then your total fuel trim is 7%. Let’s take a look at some examples on a V8:

STFT1 : 3 ...  STFT2 : 6

LTFT1 : 2 ...  LTFT2  : 1

So the total fuel trim on bank 1 is 5% (3+2) and the total fuel trim on bank 2 is 7% (6+1). Each bank is below +/- 10%. That’s pretty good.

STFT1 : -5 ...  STFT2  : 3

LTFT1 : 3 ...   LTFT2  : 1

Bank 1 fuel trim is -2% (-5 +3) and bank 2 is 4% (3+1). Again, that’s good.

STFT1 :  6 ...  STFT2 :  7

LTFT1  : 10  ... LTFT2  :15

Bank 1 fuel trim is 16% (6+10) and bank 2 is 22% (7+15). That’s not good. Walk away from this one.

Here's one more that's a littlte different:

STFT1  : -20 ...  STFT2  : -20

LTFT1  :  22 ...  LTFT2  : 20

Hey, 2% and 0% total fuel trim on each bank. SWEET! this car is running almost perfect! Well not really. Why is the LTFT adding 22% but then the STFT is taking  a bunch of it back? There may be an intermittent issue going on here. So add the absolute values together as well (treat -20 as 20) and see what that total is. Here we have 42 and 40. There's some interpretation required here that you'd need some experience to do, but I'd say anything over 25 when adding absolutes is cause for concern.

Check these numbers with the engine running at idle, and rev up the engine and hold it at about 2500rpms and check it there. Like I said, you may see the STFT number change pretty quickly, so just use the average of the numbers you see for that one. If you have someone with you, you can have them check the numbers while you drive as well.

Practice this on a car you have access to beforehand.

13. Last and not least, don’t trust the person selling the car. Trust your eyes, your ears, and your instinct. You don’t know this person, they may be lying about the car, or try and tell you that the thing you’re worried about is no big deal, it’s just this or that. Or they had a guy check it out and it’s a really easy/quick fix. Be patient and find the right car. If something is fishy or doesn’t seem right, move on to the next car. A car is a pretty big expense. Most people budget for the purchase price of a car and don’t consider there may be considerable extra expense in fixing major problems. Minimize the possibility of those extra expenses by inspecting the car the best you can.

I would recommend running through these things, and any others you want to add, on your current car, your parents’ cars, friends’ cars, etc. Do it several times. Get comfortable in making these checks so that when you’re doing them in front of some stranger on their car, you won’t forget anything.

EDIT7 - I'm putting this above my other edits so it gets seen. I totally forgot to talk about Titles and their pitfalls. u/BossMaverick has made an excellent post [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/egs81p/lpt_some_tips_for_buying_a_used_car_for_people/fcc67tp/?context=3) talking about it, and a few other good things as well.

EDIT- Forgot another tip regarding possible accident repairs. When you look under the hood, the color of the metal in the engine compartment area should be the same color as the car. If you see different colors or primer, it's had body repair. Also, if you look at the reflection in the car's exterior paint up close and at an angle, you'll notice that the reflection has a wavy pattern to it. That's called orange peel. Every car has it from the factory, except super high end cars. The orange peel pattern should be consistent all the way around the car. If the pattern changes in certain parts of the car, it's been repainted in that area. Good chance it had an accident. Another thing you can do is take a small magnet with you. You're going to place the magnet against the car in as many areas as you can. Make sure you wrap it in a microfiber towel or something  soft so you don't scratch the car (it's not your car). The magnet should attract itself to the body and even stick to it. If there are spots where the magnet doesn't stick as strong or at all, there is body filler there. It's had body work. Do keep in mind that some body panels aren't magnetic on some cars. If you can't get the magnet to stick anywhere on an entire panel (like the fender or hood) then you probably have a non magnetic body panel (maybe fiberglass or aluminum). I guess it's possible that the whole body panel is covered in bondo, but that would be rare, as that would be an extremely poor repair.

EDIT2 - Fixed some formatting

EDIT3 - Thanks for all the replies and awards. I'm glad people found this useful. But seriously, no more awards. Save your money for gas to return all those Christmas presents you don't want.

EDIT4 - There are lots of comments and questions. I'll try to answer what I can but there are so many. I'll get back to most of you eventually. Gotta get some work done....working on a Saturday (sucks)

EDIT5 - I'm back from the dead!

EDIT6 - added some good info brought up in comments, expanded on a few things, laymanized it a little more, explained some technical stuff. Still can't get the STFT and LTFT examples to format the way I wanted. Best I can do

EDIT 8 - Good night everyone. Thanks for all the awards and comments and conversations. I replied to all the PMs and chats. Tried to reply to as many comments as I could, but holy cow there were just too many. I just hope I did better than Woody Harrelson.
		-- u/Racefiend, 71664 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Sometimes it helps to think of life as a MMORPG. Facing a setback? Totally normal—it's part of the game. No way forward? Explore your surroundings. The game mindset allows you to take a step back from difficult situations and think about them strategically, and with clear-eyed objectivity.

Like a bird's-eye view and you're playing with Monopoly money.

Edit: now considering trademarking *The Game Mindset* /s
		-- u/m77w, 36951 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Stay away from the no sleep/hustler lifestyle. It creates unsustainable expectations, encourages an unhealthy lifestyle and promotes burnout. You'll simply work yourself into exhaustion. Instead learn to use your time wisely and enforce reasonable boundaries.

		-- u/BOOOTYEATER3000, 37071 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Staying in shape isn’t about being sexy or attractive. It’s about laying down the groundwork so that you can be active and healthy when you’re older.

		-- u/HawkFrost333, 80539 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Staying in shape isn’t about being sexy or attractive. It’s about laying the groundwork so that you can be active and healthy when you’re older.

		-- u/JefePo, 39413 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop Using Your Address for Lyft/Uber

I recently had an experience that made me realize why you should not be using your home address as drop off or pickup location. Use the closest intersection.

I shared a Lyft ride with my female friend. The Lyft driver immediately started hitting on her. When he asked who was being dropped off first, I told him she was first stop. He started berating me for scheduling a ride and having her as first stop, started yelling about why he could not drop me off first.... During his tirade he got lost and when I tried giving him directions he just yelled at me. It was not amusing, it was scary - because now this drunk/high/creepy a-hole knew her address and mine.
		-- u/AndroidREM, 71621 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop engaging with online content that makes you angry! The algorithms are keeping you angry, turning you into a zealot, and you aren't actually informed!

We all get baited into clicking on content that makes us angry, or fuels "our side" of a contentious topic.  The problem is that once you start engaging with "rage bait" content (politics, culture war, news, etc) the social media algorithms, which aren't that bright yet, assume this is ALL you want to see.

You feeds begin filling up with content that contributes to a few things.  First your anger obviously.  But secondly you begin to get a sense that the issues/viewpoints you are seeing are MUCH more prevalent and you are more "correct" than they/you actually are.  You start to fall into the trap of "echo chambers", where you become insulated from opposing views, which makes you less informed and less able to intelligently develop your opinions.

For example:  If you engage with content showing that your political side is correct to the point of all other points being wrong (or worse, evil), that is what the algorithms will drop into your home screens and suggestions.  This causes the following

* You begin to believe your opinions represent the majority
* You begin to see those who disagree with you as, at best stupid and uniformed, at worst inhuman monsters
* You begin to lose empathy for anyone who holds an opposing  view
* You miss out on the opposing side, which may provide valuable context and information to truly understanding the issue (you get dumber)

Make a conscious decision to engage with the internet positively.  Your feeds will begin believing this is what you want.  You will be happier, your feeds will be uplifting instead of angering, and you will incentivize the algorithms to make you happy instead of rage farming you.  The people fighting back and forth online over the issues of the day are a small minority of people that represent nobody, nor are they representative of even their side.  

Oh, and no, I'm not on your political "side" attacking the uninformed stance and tactics of the other.  I am talking to you!
		-- u/cyberkrist, 96137 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop looking for "the one", that's a made-up concept to sell romantic novels  movies. A real relationship needs work, commitment, compromise, understanding  willingness to have a two-way trade on every level  meet you halfway.

Always remember that every successful relationship needs to be a two-way trade; you give something you receive something in return, otherwise one side will finally get tired  the whole thing collapses. It doesn't need to be the same thing or on the same level but there needs to be some balance.

Update: this really blew up, thanks for all the upvotes  awards; btw, happy Valentine's day. Don't listen to anybody who tells you fantasies do come true without any effort, they might but usually last as long as a dream too.
Life is full of challenges  tests us every single day, you can either have/be a true partner to climb to the peak together or wait for the prince/princess charming to come  make your life a Disney movie.

Update 2: If your relationship needs no work, that's amazing, good on you, you have done the work! The safe place you created together  the trust despite life's ups  downs did not fall from the sky. The two of you did it together, now it's just like a well-choreographed dance.
		-- u/Eienkei, 46745 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop overthinking your tasks. It leads to analysis paralysis and you end up just thinking about work instead of actually doing it. Have a VERY basic plan, and just start working. You'll figure things out along the way.

		-- u/dasischilling, 62794 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop staying longer than you have to at work. Sure, you may think that it gets you noticed for a promotion but it also gets you noticed to be used.

If they’re paying you for 8 hours, work no minute more and no minute less.
		-- u/Trick_Gas3677, 42970 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop trying to prove a point to people who don’t matter in your actual life.

Reddit stop the meaningless insults n shit.
		-- u/Masol_The_Producer, 46311 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Stop watching movies/series you don't like. Don't feel obligated to watch them all to the end. There are too many bad movies/series out there, just start a new one or do something else.

		-- u/SpaceKnight42, 42325 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
LPT: Store potatoes and onions well apart from each other. They release moisture and gases that can make the other get bad faster.

		-- u/SalazarRED, 42321 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Strict parents can turn their kids into more effective liars because children who are afraid to tell the truth learn more deceptive behaviors to avoid getting in trouble. Set reasonable rules and expectations for your child, Reward positive behavior and Accept mistakes as a chance for learning.

Edit: Relevant study for anyone interested: [Here](https://journals.sagepub.com/doi/10.1080/01650250143000373)

Edit2: You guys are really great, I've really enjoyed reading through your personal experiences :) Please stop messaging me asking for acting advice though, what did you see on my profile that made you think I'm an actor?
		-- u/sheepameepa, 97703 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Struggling to find a thoughtful gift for a guy? Pay attention to small things that frustrate them.....

Been with my wife for almost 23 years, and she has always gotten me great gifts, even early on when we didn’t have much money to spend on each other.  About 10 years in we got into a conversation about how I find it so difficult to come up with thoughtful gifts compared to how adept she seems to be.  When I asked her how she did it, she casually said,

“I pay attention to what makes you curse!”

And I’ll be damned if the vast majority of the gifts that I found most memorable and oft-used were the direct result of the thing that guys often catch a bad rap for trying to do for others.......solving problems.

Did I trip over a power cable multiple times building out her chicken coop?  Cordless drill.

Was I always complaining about how I can’t get my pillow to support my head throughout the night?  Contour pillow.

Remarking how much I hated constantly cleaning out the gutters underneath a big oak tree?  Gutter covers.

That’s it.  Simple stuff that often doesn’t break the bank.  

That being said, of course there is room for gifts that don’t have to solve a problem and are a little more extravagant or frivolous and just make somebody happy, but I’ve put this technique into use in the years since and always come up with great gifts for the guys in my life.

Understand that this LPT isn’t exclusively for men, of course.  I think it can be applied fairly easily as long as it just comes from paying attention to your friends/family......at the very least it will make them feel great to know somebody is paying attention.
		-- u/NemesisR6, 55823 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Sunk costs is a concept in finance that applies to real life relationships too. You don't need to stay in a bad investment just because you invested in it. Just because you gave a person 5 years in your past, you don't need to give them 5 years of your future. You can walk away anytime.

Limit your losses. The past is irrelevant to the future.
		-- u/[deleted], 44576 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Take a shuttle from the airport to a nearby hotel or parking lot and then order and Uber to avoid surge prices and upcharges of being at a hotspot for rides. This can save you a lot of money.

		-- u/SC_Red, 38440 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Take pics of your kids before going to public places

When going to a large and/or crowded public place like an amusement park, fair, concert, etc. with kids (or perhaps with challenged adults), take a quick individual picture of each before entering. That way you have an image that can be shared with security / law enforcement if the child gets separated or lost, including the exact clothing they were wearing that day. It will greatly speed the process of organizing a search to have an accurate description and image of the missing person. Hopefully you never will need to use the pics in this way, and they can be a memory of a fun day.
		-- u/ChadNFreud, 39052 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Take pictures of your hair after a good haircut. If you ever need to see a new barber, a picture's worth a thousand words.

		-- u/Kojak_the_Bold, 41476 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Take regular photos of the everyday happenings around your home  family. Someone on the sofa, cooking, doing yard work, a regular old dinner etc. The big milestone events are memorable enough and easily reminiscenced. Pictures of everyday life are the real nostalgia bombs when looking back.

		-- u/Daniiiiii, 69809 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Take that break. Working around the clock isn't a badge of honor. You're going to burn yourself out. You may think you're too busy and you don't have the time for a break, but even 10 minutes makes a big difference. You need to take care of yourself and that includes taking a break.

		-- u/briannabethesda, 74724 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Teach yourself to not touch your face throughout the day - you’ll get sick less, as hand to face/mouth contact is one of the most common routes for microbial transmission.

EDIT: Some information to prevent myself from having to facepalm in response to some of these comments.

For a complete overview of the pathogenesis of the rhinovirus (a virus responsible for the majority of cold and flu-like illnesses) check out [this article](https://www.atsjournals.org/doi/pdf/10.1513/pats.201006-039RN). Some key excerpts are:
- “The most common way to ‘‘catch a cold’’ is to pick up a rhinovirus with the fingertip and introduce it into the eye or nose.”
- “It is possible to avoid catching a new cold by paying close attention to the hands. Not touching the eyes or nose with the fingers will decrease the risk of infection.”

Hence, this LPT. It’s based on the well documented phenomenon of self-inoculation. Washing one’s hands is still the gold standard. However, the vast majority of people are not washing their hands especially often. Conversely, people are constantly touching their faces, essentially subconsciously. Therefore, to reduce the risk of transmission/self-inoculation, stop touching your face (particularly around your eyes). 

The study "Protective Effect of Hand-Washing and Good Hygienic Habits Against Seasonal Influenza: A Case-Control Study." specifically concludes that "infrequent touching [of] the eyes, nose, or mouth with ones hands" led to a "substantially lower risk of community-acquired influenza infection" (frequent hand washing and getting the flu vaccine were also associated with substantially lower risk). 

In the article "Medical myth busting: Separating fact from fiction about colds and flu" from the Fred Hutch, Dr. Steve Pergam (member of the Vaccine an Infectious Disease Division there) says things like:
- "To infect someone, these particles don’t have to be breathed in, they just have to get into any mucosal surface — eyes, mouth or nose. . . Stop touching your face!"
- "Your hands touch elevator buttons, public transport rails, all the different places you go on a daily basis, then you touch your face hundreds of times a day. I have a bottle of hand gel with me at all times.  You can’t stop yourself all the time, but be more aware of whether your hands are clean before you start rubbing your eyes."

A 1982 study published in the American Journal of Epidemiology titled "TRANSMISSION OF EXPERIMENTAL RHINOVIRUS INFECTION BY CONTAMINATED SURFACES" found that in a controlled setting, when healthy adults touched a surface contaminated with rhinovirus and then touched their face, up to 56% of them became infected. 

The 2015 study "Survival of rhinoviruses on human fingers" states "person-to-person transmission is most likely due to the contamination of hands by the nasal secretions of the infected person passed to a susceptible individual, either directly to the fingers or via an environmental intermediary; infection then follows from self-inoculation to the upper nasal airways or eyes." and subsequently cites four more studies as supporting evidence.

I could go on and on but I think at this point it's on the Redditor to do their own reading.
		-- u/starbuilt, 46388 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Tell loved ones about a particular location they can go and ‘sit with you’ after you’ve passed. Regardless of what comes after death, the location and feeling of closeness will be comforting to them.

		-- u/adullploy, 44812 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Tell the DJ at your wedding NOT to give the mic to anyone...

under any circumstances unless they have received verbal permission from you or your wife/husband. This is any easy way to avoid people proposing, announcing pregnancy or preventing people from speaking when you don’t want them to.
		-- u/UseDaSchwartz, 58002 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Telling someone that a movie/book has a great twist is, in itself, a major spoiler. Don’t do that.

I’ve often seen people try to raise interest in movies by saying something like “oh plus there’s an AMAZING twist ending”. It might be common sense for most, but simply saying this can ruin how someone experiences that movie because now they’re guessing what the twist could be the whole time. When you know a twist is coming, it’s a lot easier to guess what it is.

Edit: apparently this was posted on r/books recently, had no idea
		-- u/mchgndr, 78576 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Texans, you are about to experience the worst potholes many of you have ever seen. Make sure your tire pressure is correct for your vehicles, drive slowly, give plenty of distance between your vehicle and the one in front of you, and don't trust puddles. Love from Michigan.

		-- u/this1tyme, 140003 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: That money that scientific journals charge you to read a paper goes 100% to the Publisher, 0% to the Authors. If you just email us to ask for our papers, we are allowed to send them to you for free!

There are a few exceptions, but most will send them to you for free, and will be genuinely delighted to do so.
		-- u/sonicyeayea, 57649 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: The Christmas work party is more 'work' than 'party'. You won't get paid for going but can get fired for acting a fool at the party. Drink less and be on your best behaviour.

		-- u/seanmashitoshi, 38143 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: The best thing you can ever do for a box cake mix is use real butter instead of oil, milk instead of water, and add one extra egg.

The difference those 3 small changes make in terms of moisture and texture is amazing. Turn that $2 box mix into a $100 professional bakery dupe and no one but you has to know.

Edit: since this has blown up beyond anything I could have expected, I feel the need to address a couple of things. There are about 1000 of you screaming "just make it from scratch!" and y'all are missing the point. Whether you love it or hate it, box cake mix is a thing, and they're extremely popular. Millions of people use them all the time. They use them because they're easy, inexpensive, and accessible. There are 8 billion people on this planet and not everyone knows how to bake. Not everyone wants to learn, or can even afford to. And that's ok. But for a lot of people, box cake mix is a great jumping off point. All I did was mention a couple of easy things to improve on that that people might not know *because maybe no one had told them before now.* Some of y'all are getting awful snobby about cheap cake and it's not a good look. 

Second, a bunch of people have suggested other things to jazz up cake mix, from instant pudding and applesauce to coffee and even soda. And you know what? That's fantastic! If you have something that makes baking easier or makes a cake that you think is delicious, then do it! You bake that cake! Baking should be enjoyable, and if it's delicious then why does it matter how you get there? Everyone has to start somewhere so play around with it, experiment, learn what you like, and what works for you. Have fun with it. It's just cake.
		-- u/Jenipherocious, 50624 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: The biggest raise you'll get is when you find a new job.

		-- u/ThePervyGeek90, 46067 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: The more items on a restaurant menu, the less fresh the food usually is going to be.

Sorry for the confusion. I was trying to say that certain restaurants where I live have many different types of food and don't focus on one type of dish. I know that Mexican and Asian restaurants can use the same 15 ingredients in many different dishes, but some places just reheat a lot of their food, making it mediocre, even disgusting.
		-- u/yeetusyeetus69420, 39681 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: The most helpful thing you can do when leaving a review for clothes is tell people what size you got, how tall you are, and what you weigh.

		-- u/RockleyBob, 43943 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: The news will NEVER be positive. Even if there was a news network in heaven, it would find something negative to talk about. It can only make money by injecting you with negative emotions and riling you up. Avoiding the news is the cheapest and fastest way to improving your mental health.

		-- u/CircleBox2, 58654 upvotes, 0.72 ratio.
%
LPT: The official LEGO website has a section where you can freely download instructions for any set they've ever made

if you're ever buying LEGO sets secondhand, a lot of sellers will increase the price because they include the original instructions, or even sell the instructions separately. but if you go [here](https://www.lego.com/en-us/service/buildinginstructions) you can download PDFs for ~~every instruction manual ever~~ many instruction manuals, all for free. if course if you really want that physical booklet go for it, but if not the LEGO company's got you covered

or if you just have a jumble of bricks you're pretty sure are a set, this is a good resource to help you recreate your old sets. and the search interface is *very* good

eta: I've been informed they do not have every instruction manual ever, but still a very large amount

and thank you for the awards!

eta2: thanks for the gold! i'm so sorry if i misled people on the "every set ever" bit, i've changed the post to reflect that. i'm glad at least this resource exists at all and is as comprehensive as it is, and i'm happy to have brought it to so many people's attention

eta3: u/minionmemesaregood has [brought to my attention](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/j7zt7w/lpt_the_official_lego_website_has_a_section_where/g89bcgk/) a site that has a lot of the older 20th century set instructions, though also maybe not 100% complete- lego.brickinstructions.com

and many others have mentioned bricklink.com and brickset.com, more great LEGO resources
		-- u/dagnummit, 53395 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: The one skill to learn, develop, and nurture to be successful is Negotiation - the ability to reach an agreement, a common ground. Work, social situations, personal life, the skill will serve you everywhere and not get pushed around. You get what you negotiate, not always what you deserve.

		-- u/hash1e, 41596 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: The only cheaper wage than minimum wage is a salaried employee working overtime for free. Quit giving up free labor when your employer should be hiring more help and paying more.

There are always exceptions and expectations, but in the current US labor situation your employer loves to see salaried employees stay to make up the missing labor. You won't see more help or higher wages if you keep working for free.
		-- u/Depx, 56379 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: The tip "just be yourself" isn't supposed to win over all your dream girls or guys, it's meant to find you the person that loves you for you, and not the fake personality you think you have to be to win them over.

		-- u/YellowB, 54626 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: There are no secrets to being fit, saving money, losing weight, or making friends, just well publicized proven techniques that people do not want to do because they take time, effort, and sacrifice.

		-- u/AgentElman, 44030 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: There are other search engines than Google's. You can choose to protect your privacy or plant trees while you search.

Some of my personal choices in alphabetical order:

[Duckduckgo](https://duckduckgo.com/) doesn't track you, simple as that. Downside is that it doesn't know you, your preferences and so on. But that's kind of the point.

[Ecosia](https://www.ecosia.org/) plants trees. Based on Bing. Has been my personal choice for years. Sometimes when I'm not satisfied by the search results I type in #g to be redirected to Google, which in my experience is very seldom more fruitful.

[Google scholar](https://scholar.google.com/) is quite useful in academics. If you're not sure how to cite a source in e.g. APA-style, Google scholar helps you out.

[WolframAlpha](https://www.wolframalpha.com/) is supposed to be really good for answering (numerical) questions. Plots functions which is nice. Haven't used it much for some reason.

There are many other alternatives, so if you know some specific search engines that you find helpful, please let us know in the comments!
Wikipedia also has a great [list](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_search_engines).

Another matter is Google translate. Depending on your language it can be less than perfect. [DeepL](https://www.deepl.com/translator) does neural machine translation and has much better results. It only translates Dutch, English, French, German, Italian, Japanese, Polish, Portuguese, Russian, and Spanish. It's pretty good at translating English to German and vice versa. I don't have a clue how the performance is in other languages though. Let me know if there has been some kind of breakthrough in translating Finnish.

Shouldn't forget maps. Google has great satellite images and street view. [Bing](https://www.bing.com/maps/) often has better aerial views. Check out if there are better local resources that have e.g. topographic maps which are just on another level, especially if you hike or are prone to getting lost in the woods. Get a compass while you're at it. I love maps in general btw. So [OpenStreetMap](https://www.openstreetmap.org) has to be mentioned. It's collaborative and non-commercial. Check it out and help to make it more precise locally!

English isn't my first language, and I'm also a grammarnazi, so please point out any mistakes that I made. +Shoutout to the Ask Jeeves crew! Yes, you are old, but maybe a bit wiser too. :)

EDIT: Oh my, over a thousand comments now, can't interact with everyone anymore. Thanks to everybody that has joined this discussion! To address a few concerns about me basically advertising for Ecosia. That's a valid critique, and now I feel a bit naive about well, kind of advertising for them. Commenters have come to my rescue in a way by confirming (with sources) that it is indeed a legitimate enterprise that uses the money they make to fund others that plant trees. Don't believe me, check it out yourself. I'm not their freaking spokesperson. I genuinely like to use it, and that crept into my post and maybe it shouldn't have. We have to live with that now. Oh, and their tree count is approximate. Go and count the trees at their different projects and update the database if that bothers you so much.

Next! Basically every online translator engine uses neural machine translation. WolframAlpha is not a search engine, but a computational knowledge engine, which understandably is a bit different to the former concept. What else? Oh, I actually was about to include bing/videos (for your preferred sexual practices), but left it out because I wasn't sure if it is still relevant. According to some commenters it is. So happy masturbating to everyone! Anyway, there haven't been many comments about alternatives, in search engines is what I mean. I would have made a list, but the wiki list above is pretty extensive anyway. I have to say that I'm amazed that my little thought has sparked such a great and civil discussion amongst you guys. Lots of love to all of you! Be critical, choose your search engine wisely, and don't listen to what I say.
		-- u/fliptrip, 44061 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: There is nothing tacky or wrong about discussing your salary with coworkers. It is a federally protected action and the only thing that can stop discrepancies in pay. Do not let your boss convince you otherwise.

I just want to remind everyone that you should always discuss pay with coworkers. Do not let your managers or supervisors tell you it is tacky or against the rules.

Discussing pay with co-workers is a federally protected action. You cannot face consequences for discussing pay with coworkers- it can't even be threatened. Discussing pay with coworkers is the only thing that prevents discrimination in pay. Managers will often discourage it- They may even say it is against the rules but it never is. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lilly_Ledbetter_Fair_Pay_Act_of_2009
		-- u/Working_Class_Pride, 80939 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: There will come a time in your life when it feels like you have no friends. The sooner you can learn to be alone without feeling lonely, the more survivable that time will be.

		-- u/9oreos, 51215 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Think of everything you do as progress. Sent someone a meme? You progressed your relationship. Drew a doodle? You progressed your art skill. Took a bath? You progressed your mental health. Life is a bank and any time you do anything that brings you joy, you are earning.

		-- u/KamikazeMachine, 48424 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: Think twice before buying someone a gift associated with their hobby. Unless you are just as knowledgeable, you will likely buy something they don't want or need.

		-- u/beatbox21, 68448 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Thinking of moving? Google "military BAH" for an idea on how much it costs to live somewhere

One of the things the military does very well is calculate the cost of living in areas of the US. This is heavily researched so the government doesn't over or underpay servicemembers. If you're thinking of moving to a new area and are curious how much it costs for rent  utilities, just google military Basic Allowance for Housing (BAH) and you'll see how much the military pays servicemembers to live there!

Edit: Lots of people are asking about this for non-U.S. territories.. There is! Check out the [Overseas Housing Allowance calculator](http://https://www.defensetravel.dod.mil/site/ohaCalc.cfm) for more information!
		-- u/aytoto, 36879 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: This is a friendly reminder that employees currently have more power to negotiate for improved benefits and pay raises than at any point in the last 20+ years. Take advantage of it!!

Due to the shortage of employees, most employers are desperate for good help. That means you should be seeking pay raises, promotions, and increased benefits.

Unless you are completely satisfied with your job and your income, shop around. Chances are you will find someone desperate for help and willing to pay more than your current employer. If you like your job, shop around anyway, then politely ask your employer to match/beat those offers.

Look after yourself! This employment opportunity will not last forever!
		-- u/hoesindifareacodes, 56083 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Those viral posts asking things like “Your stripper name is your first pet and your mother’s maiden name” are amazingly effective ways to reveal answers to common security questions you may be using elsewhere.

The next time you see a mass post or “share this on” message asking for information like this, remember you’re sharing important personal information which may be dangerous to share openly with others. There’s a good reason why so many of them rely on your funny answer being made up of your mother’s maiden name, first pet, favourite teacher or street you grew up on...

Always be careful where you’re sharing information, consider whether it’s really necessary to share it, or consider using incorrect answers - either to the post, or to the security questions themselves (as long as you can remember what you set them to).
		-- u/squonch, 66566 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: To ace any class, audio record the lectures while taking quick HAND WRITTEN notes simultaneously. Listen to the audio while reviewing the notes before the exam, it will work wonders for your learning and memory.

Ask for permission before recording the lectures.
Edit 1: These worked for me in engineering graduate school and my professors were amazing. Don't beat me up for the "any class" please. These are not universally valid.
		-- u/alinave, 49877 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: To all dog owners: If you comb out your dog's winter coat just leave it outside, don't throw it away. Some birds that build their nests now will be super happy to use the fur to make the nest extra fluffy and cozy.

Edit: Some of you complained for good reasons:

Don't leave the fur flying around in public areas where it might disturb others. Do it in your own garden.
Genious idea I learned today: Stuff the fur into a fence or bird feeder. The hairs won't fly to your neighbour and the birds can pull them out if they want to.

Also: Thank you for all the awards! I never thought this would blow up like this...
		-- u/Schlori, 46147 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: To block out noise from upstairs neighbors or loud roommates, hook up a Bluetooth speaker with good bass and play a “brown noise” app. The lower bass frequency does a better job of blocking footsteps and deep sounds than typical white noise machines.

		-- u/roberta_sparrow, 49007 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: To get an email reply from individuals notorious for not replying, frame your question so that their lack of reply is a response.

This is something I learnt while in Grad School/academia but no doubt works in most professional settings. Note this is a very powerful technique, use it sparingly or you are likely to piss people off.

As an example, instead of asking "Are you ok for me to submit this manuscript" you would ask "I am going to submit this manuscript by the end of next week, let me know beforehand if there are any issues/amendments".

People dont reply, not because they haven't read your email, but because they read it and stuck it in their "reply later" pile. This bypasses that.
		-- u/dovahkin1989, 63977 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: To prep for a hurricane, fill every food storage container you have with water and freeze it now. If you lose power, transfer these giant 'ice cubes' to the fridge. They will keep it sufficiently cool to preserve food for days and provide a drinkable water source as the ice melts.

		-- u/fanzel71, 69315 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: Today, the third Monday in January, is generally known as the most depressing day of the year. It’s been dark and cold for and New Years resolutions have likely failed. Be extra nice to everyone today, give a smile :) you never know what people are going through. Cheers!

		-- u/newherel, 81995 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: Treat your ears nicely. Ears don't repair themselves and earplugs to concerts are better than tinnitus for the rest of your life.

		-- u/[deleted], 72697 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Treat your own time off work as if it was your second job and you are the project. Invest in your self by doing things to learn new skills, give you a sense of accomplishment, and make you happy. You work hard for someone else's business; work just as hard to make your happiness your business.

		-- u/zer0w0rries, 46383 upvotes, 0.74 ratio.
%
LPT: Try to be understanding of people with chronic pain. Some people have pain disabilities you can't see in their joints, back or bones. It is easy to think they should be able to do more, but unless you have experienced sever back pain or similar items it is really hard to understand.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 50174 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Trying to learn a new language? Watch a movie you know by heart that's dubbed and/or subtitled in that language. It will aid in word association and comprehension and speed up the process of become proficient.

		-- u/[deleted], 37793 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Understanding who you don't want to be is as important as understanding who you do want to be.

		-- u/[deleted], 37072 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Use a spent, empty Visa giftcard to sign up for all those free 1st month trials. You never have to worry about being overdrafting or your personal info being compromised.

Edit: I'd like to shout out my Mom! Happy birthday Mom! Couldn't have done this without you. Can't begin to imagine all the things, let alone a small fraction of the blessings your being provides our family. You are appreciated. Say hi! 

Edit 2: Shout out to the homies who blessed me with Platinum and Silver, it was really cool feeling a part of a community here, shoot me a message back maybe we can *kick it*.
		-- u/[deleted], 38580 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Use an infrared thermometer to check for drafts around windows, doors, electrical outlets, it doubles as a quick cooking thermometer. They cost under $20.

EDIT 2: At the top now, since people don't like reading all the pretty words I wrote:

EDIT: Yes, you should check meat for an internal temperature prior to eating, should that be it's own LPT?

Got one last year, was surprised at how cheap and effective it is.

Our house is relatively new yet the downstairs gets frigid, my wife mentioned that the windows felt drafty yet they were solidly shut. We used this and found very slight cracks in the chaulking that were letting cold air in. After using it to find all the weak spots and rechaulking along with fixing some door insulation and closing a flue the house is much more comfortable.

Bonus: you can aim it at pans/foods and tell temps within a few degrees (surface only of course).

Double bonus: Aim it at your SO and say you found something hot.

You can get them on Amazon shipped right to you and the batteries last forever, enjoy!

EDIT 3: It's clear from this thread why warning labels and EULAs exist.

No this isn't a 100% perfect item, it's cheap and does a few things and is neat. Don't eat raw/undercooked meat. People are weird, including myself. 

 

Another poster kindly sent this to explain the (approximate) zone of temperature reading:

I’m way too late to get seen in your thread but I wanted to add the ir scanner makes a cone of scan. Some are 12:1, 16:1 or even 30:1 so the distance from the scanned surface will reveal the average temp of a circle 1/12 diameter the distance to the object. 12 ft away makes a 1 ft circle, 24’ = 2’ circle etc.
		-- u/shoppedpixels, 40840 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Use https://old.reddit.com/ to browse reddit using the old design. It loads more quickly and it's a bit more intuitive. Assuming everyone knows this, but for those that don't there ya go.

https://old.reddit.com/
		-- u/jfk_47, 52256 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Use olive oil instead of extra-virgin olive oil when cooking with heat. It has a higher smoke point and is cheaper. Use your nice oil for finishing dishes, not preparing them.

		-- u/pollywog, 40909 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: Wake up an hour earlier in the morning and spend 30 minutes on your body and 30 minutes on your mind. Every day you will feel like you've accomplished something, even if you have a bad day.

I chose to do yoga for 30 minutes, and study German for 30 minutes using an online course.

KEY: Whatever you choose for your body, don't exhaust yourself with it. Do something that leaves you feeling refreshed and relaxed so that you are eager to do it again the next morning.

I took a few yoga classes and watched a few videos to figure out poses that would improve my flexibility and strengthen my back and core. When I started, doing a simple standing bend I could barely get my hands past my knees, and now I can almost get my palms flat to the floor. I learned to focus on my breathing, and stretch into the pose and not strain. When I started, I could hold a plank for barely fifteen seconds, now I can easily plank for three minutes.

For your mind, it can be anything. Reading, doing puzzles, taking an online course in something that interests you. I started learning German because I had always been interested in the language but never spent much time on it. My job as a design manager requires me to think visually much of the time, and studying a language every morning makes my brain work differently.

Four years later, I've finished the German course (but keep reviewing it), I'm learning Spanish, and reviewing the French I took in high school and college.

EDIT: 

1. WOW. So. Many. Crankypants. Yes, PLEASE stay in bed.

2. The language course I use is Duolingo - the website, not the mobile app. Very easy to use.

3. I got most of my yoga poses from https://www.yogajournal.com/poses/

4. Doing this genuinely changed my life for the better.
		-- u/glarehead, 42607 upvotes, 0.65 ratio.
%
LPT: Walking 3 miles will burn more calories than running 1 mile. It’s easier to walk 3 miles while listing to music, a podcast, audiobook, etc.

		-- u/FiletMignonSteak, 40270 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Want a good dog? Take them with you everywhere you go. There is a reason that dogs of street people are amazing, and cooped-up condo dogs are hyperactive spaz dogs.

Ever notice how homeless people who have dogs - their dogs are amazingly calm, follow their owners everywhere?  They have life experience.  They've been out, seen the world a lot, socialized a lot, and just want to follow and hang out with their owners.  
If you were kept in a room your whole life, you'd freak and spaz and mis-behave the couple of times a day you were let out too.

(I have been working with dogs for over 20 years)

EDIT:  I should note that no, I don't take them into restaurants to mooch off diners, let them run around on airplanes, or through grocery stores to pee in aisle 6.  I thought that would go without saying, but I guess not.  :)

EDIT:  People on reddit seem to take everything literally.  When I say everywhere I mean everywhere that you can.  Again, I didn't think I needed to specify this doesn't mean 24/7 go to the movies with them, play tennis with them, etc.

ALSO:  NO WARM CARS with the windows up!!
		-- u/stinkerb, 55953 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: Want cleaner dishes? Clean the filter in your dishwasher machine. Yes! Dishwashers have filters underneath the blade that should be removed and cleaned monthly for better washing results and it’s not hard to do. Research the brand and model of machine you have for specific information.

		-- u/[deleted], 38953 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: Want to be more charismatic? Don't try to be more impressive or entertaining, focus on being a very good engaged listener. Engaged listeners make eye-contact, ask questions to bring the speaker out, and don't interject with their own stories or change the conversation to be about them.

		-- u/zazzlekdazzle, 63759 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: Waving someone through a stop sign when they stopped after you is not doing anybody a favour and most competent drivers are just annoyed at you for behaving unpredictably

		-- u/burgeroburger, 78144 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: Wear a helmet no matter how old you are. They are not just for kids. A super short fall into the concrete off your bike / skateboard etc can cause permanent brain damage with ease.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 47386 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Wear earplugs every time you go to places with loud music or use noisy machines, even if you are still young. Hearing damage is often permanent.

Seriously, don't make the same mistakes as I did 15-20 years ago.

EDIT: Nowadays I always carry reusable earplugs in a little metal container attached my key chain, so I always have them handy if needed.
		-- u/ConsciousnessWizard, 43280 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: What to do if it's too late to evacuate from wildfires.

G'day mate! Looks bloody awful over in America, those wildfires are right nasty. Lucky, us Aussies have been surviving through all that and much worse for at least a couple centuries, and I'm here to give you guys the inside info on how to survive.

1 - If you live on an upslope, ridge, or narrow forested road, get the fuck out early - no help will come.

People here who stayed then changed their minds later, and couldn't escape because trees fell within minutes and blocked exit routes.

Firefighters were either unable to get in, or were forbidden due to extreme risk of being cut off themselves - 1200 litres of water in a Cat7 is like pissing into a hurricane, especially if you're up on a ridge.

2 - if actually caught and unable to escape. dig in and cover with  DRY WOOLEN BLANKETS!

Please fill your bathtub before it hits - water tanks will melt real fast and you'll have no water - the thing that MIGHT make the difference between life and death could be as simple as layers of wool blankets,  a low sheltered concrete corner, some sheets of tin, some DRY wool blankets, and one moist towel to protect from radiant heat.

Wet clothing or sheets are inferior to a wool blanket and you will boil alive. Do not cover any yourself in anything wet!

3 - If defending your house - wool or cotton long sleeves and leather boots, and wear LEATHER GLOVES if possible. You can throw burning stuff back but without gloves, no way.

4 - Remember that the only safe area to run to is often INTO an area already burnt - you can also survive by having a shallow grave and laying in that under dry blankets, a layer of wet stuff and tin, and breathe through a wet cloth to avoid suffocation. You'll collapse real fucking fast without oxygen and remember also, many houses are made with plastics and toxic gas-causing materials so.... yeah.... stay safe out there and honestly, if you live on a ridge or uphill slope... run now.  Your life is worth more than stuff.

5 - If you think you can defend, don't forget to protect your water tank and exposed poly lines - if that goes, you're fucked.

People on gravity feed systems, this is your weak point. We were lucky enough to have a small Honda pump and Cat7, but our tank was on fire several times - if that had gone, we'd be gone.  Remember this, especially if on a bush block with some tank uphill off in the scrub. If you're not gonna be able to save that tank, forget about it.  You're going to lose your house, get out now.

6 - Remember, fire can move up to 400km (250miles) per hour uphill. If you change your mind and live on a ridge, you are quite likely fucked.  Don't die for stuff.  Escape, and we can hunt down the corrupt fucks who made this happen later. Channel that anger to the ones who sold us out and gave away our water and our future to line their own pockets.

Stay safe America!

: EDIT :

I had no idea this'd blow up so much, and it's great to see so many people invested in keeping fire safe, you're all fuckin legends 💪 and thanks to everyone who's put forward awards. I'm not sure what they do, but I appreciate y'all care so much.

: POINTS WORTH CLARIFYING :

A Cat7 is a type of firefighting engine available in Australia. Not sure what your American equivalent would be.

NEVER use water to cover your blankets or yourself, EVER. Use it as an external barrier to embers on the outermost towels.

Actually I'm a chick ✌️

Large bodies of water are good to venture out into if necessary, but keep in mind you need a decent level of physical fitness to maintain treading water whilst also inhaling smoke at the same time.

NEVER use synthetics or anything with a synthetic blend. Wool is best on a budget, duvetyne is probably the best material available, 100% cotton towels will also work in a pinch. Never synthetic .

: EDIT 2 :

Wow this really blew up. I'm fucking honoured, and I'm glad to see so many people out there really giving a shit about fire safety. 

All your suggestions, feedback, and positive discussion really reignite (haha) my faith in humanity. We can all get through this if we work together 💪

I'm working my way through all your comments (and there really are a lot of them), and trying to answer as many questions as I can.
		-- u/PUNCH-THE-SUN, 73759 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Whatever the day, situation (stay-at-home), or your mood, get up in the morning, take a shower, wear fresh clothes and get ready for the day, even if you don't have any plans or work. You're more likely to feel good and be in a better mood all day and send good vibes to others around you.

		-- u/hash1e, 48677 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: When You are Done Drinking Alcohol For the Night, Start Drinking Lots of Water

The major reason for nausea and hang-over effects from drinking is dehydration.  The body requires a lot of water to flush the toxins from your system.  After you're done drinking alcohol, if you start drinking plenty of water (even though you probably won't feel like it), it will greatly mitigate the negative effects from over indulgence.
		-- u/CaptJellico, 53722 upvotes, 0.78 ratio.
%
LPT: When a Nurse asks you to rate your pain on a scale of 1-10, never say 10+.

The pain scale isn't necessarily used only to tell us how bad your pain is, it's supposed to be used to tell us whether your pain is getting better or worse. If a patient says their pain is a 7 in triage, and later says it's pushing a 9, that X-Ray or CT scan might get expedited.  But if your constantly barking 10 or 1,000 your comments aren't going to be taken seriously. A (good) nurse knows a 10 when they see it, and if you walked in, you are not in 10/10 pain. That guy from Saving Private Ryan with his legs blown off on Normandy beach screaming for his momma, that dude is in 10/10 pain. Also, Kidney Stones.
		-- u/Good_Kid_Mad_City, 70359 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When a cat shows you its belly, pet around the cheeks and not the belly itself. Cats show their belly as a sign of trust, so going for their belly is seen as an immediate violation of that trust and may result in biting or scratching.

If your cat has shown in the past that it likes belly rubs, that's an exception of course, but the average kitty just wants you to know that you are trusted by exposing its most vulnerable area to you.
		-- u/JetSetJAK, 56879 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When a dealership tells you the vehicle is on the lot or will hold the vehicle for you and then tells you it was sold when you get there, leave. They pulled a bait and switch on you.

This is a very common tactic to bring customers to the lot. Half of the work in selling a car is to get the buyer to come to the dealership. I have found that most of the dealerships that pull this tactic are not ones to be trusted; they showed you that they are willing to trick you so you can come to them, they have a mindset of tricking their customers for profit. If they don't have your vehicle then leave and continue your car search, dealerships like these are more trouble than they are worth.
		-- u/[deleted], 65695 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When a friend is upset, ask them one simple question before saying anything else: 'Do you want to talk about it or do you want to be distracted from it?'

This is honestly one of the best things you can do for an upset friend. I use it all the time and people respond very well to it. Sometimes people come to you because they need to vent. Comfort them first, then follow up with 'do you want advice or do you want me to just listen?'. But other times, they just need to let someone outside of the conflict know what happened, and then they want to talk about something else. Talk about your own day, show them the latest funny thing you saw, go do something fun together. This question sets boundaries and builds trust. It shows you can be there in any way they need.

edit: WOW! so many awards! thanks so much. im going about pming everyone to thank them. but heres a carrd link to BLM resources and a bunch of campaigns, charities, and black owned businesses you can donate to. it would mean so much to me as an ally of the BLM movement if you put a few dollars towards a campaign of your choice. sorry, im on mobile: https://blacklivesmatters.carrd.co/
		-- u/dykejoon, 109090 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: When a job interviewer asks, "What's your biggest weakness?", interpret the question in practical terms rather than in terms of personality faults.

"Sometimes I let people take advantage of me", or "I take criticism personally" are bad answers. "I'm too honest" or "I work too hard", even if they believe you, make you sound like you'll be irritating to be around or you'll burn out.

Instead, say something like, "My biggest weakness with regards to this job is, I have no experience with \[company's database platform\]" or "I don't have much knowledge about \[single specific aspect of job\] yet, so it would take me some time to learn."

These are real weaknesses that are relevant to the job, but they're also fixable things that you'll correct soon after being hired. Personality flaws are not (and they're also none of the interviewer's business).
		-- u/Iron_Rod_Stewart, 101692 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When a pet has a mid to late-stage terminal illness, don't go through brutal and extraordinary measures to extend it's life too long. Especially cats. They cannot tell you they are suffering. Yes, we want more time with them. But not if they are hurting.

Our 2 senior cats died a few months apart during the quarantine.  The 1st had cancer.  And we extended his life by 1 year through chemo and monthly vet visits.  This included an endoscopy, and being poked and prodded by needles every few weeks.  He was skinny, vomited often, and had no energy.  But we thought it was okay because his loving personality was still there.  He died gasping, not being able to breathe.  **Immediate** regrets.

Our 2nd cat had kidney failure.  Daily IV fluids at home, pills twice per day.  Became super skinny.  She developed pancreatitis which is apparently (to humans) so painful that people are hospitalised as the only treatment.  We did not know until it became very obvious.  Ran her to the vet.  Figured she'd be back in a week and we can keep giving her IV's to extend her life at home.

She died gasping at the vet.  We made it just in time to say goodbye (vet called, drove there at 4am, held her as she passed).

It took 2 lessons, but now I know that **extending a pet's life by extraordinary means is selfish on our part, when they have a mid to late stage terminal illness**.  We just want more time with them.  But we may be causing them pain without realizing it.  

If I could go back in time, I would have called the vet to our home so our cats could pass peacefully here, with no pain, and no fear.  Their lives would have been slightly shorter by a few months.  But if I have to suffer pain and invasive medical procedures for the last year of my life...  I would rather not live that year.
		-- u/leelougirl89, 50870 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When an app asks you if you want to leave a review on the apps' store, instead of tapping no, choose yes, wait for it to send you to the review page, then close it: it will think you left a review and won't bother you anymore.

		-- u/alex2003super, 53987 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When asked at the last minute to work late or on a weekend, simply reply, "I can't." Don't offer reasons that can be countered, you'd be surprised at how effective it is.

I didn't learn this until my 40s, but I have passed the advice on to my kids and my nephew. My nephew, who was very timid about telling his boss he couldn't work, finally used this tactic and it worked like a charm.

Edit: this blew up more than I thought it would, thanks for the awards, kind strangers!  

Edit 2: First gold, thank you!
		-- u/furmanchu, 59781 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When at the beach, always beware the area where the waves don't crash. It often signals a rip current.

&gt; Edit : Since this is getting some visibility, I want everyone to know that this post doesn't explain all the dangers of rip currents, nor does it depict how they exactly appear all the time. i just wanted to share a side of the danger that may be interesting to be careful about. The most important thing to keep in mind is to **not try to fight back against the current**, **swim sidewides to break out of it**. Rip currents are not always like the areas mentionned in the title. Also, I'm not the most knowledgeable on the subject, please read about it on specialised websites.

People often think that an area where the waves are not crashing down is safer, since the ocean seems calm. However the lack of waves is often due to a rip current that will pull you away from the shore, and a lot of people die trying to fight it, not being aware of its presence.

It is way easier to see with [an image](http://cdn1.theinertia.com/wp-content/uploads/2018/07/rip.jpg). If you get caught, **don't fight it**, either **let yourself drift away and swin around it** once you've stabilised, or **break free from the current by swimming perpendicularly to it**.

A friend of mine died getting caught in a rip current last Saturday. Awareness literally saves life.
		-- u/ThePr1d3, 44784 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When browsing en.wikipedia.org, you can replace "en" with "simple" to bring up simple English wikipedia, where everything is explained like you're five.

simple.wikipedia.org

		-- u/FrenchJello, 45977 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When buying a blanket, always buy at least one size larger than your bed. It’s at least a hundred times more comfy.

For example, if you have a queen bed, get a king blanket.
		-- u/malcolmcc, 62628 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When buying a car at a dealership and they leave you alone to talk about it, check their desk phone speaker light. If it is on, they are most definitely listening to your conversation from the back office.

 

It happened to us when I bought my first used car at a VW dealership. We were discussing the sale price and he left us to "talk about it" while he went to "run some numbers" by the finance manager. I had given an offer of $1000 below their asking price as that is what I could afford. My mother said she could chip in $500 more if that would help me out. 

He came back and said his "boss" could meet in the middle, $500 off sale price.  We were quite happy about it all and it was done.

Later on I got an office job with the exact same phones the dealership had. Found out the green light button was lit when the phone was active, and the microphone on.
		-- u/ZZZ_123, 40744 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When buying a used car, start it and rev the engine while you have a friend watch the exhaust. If the exhaust has a blue tint to it, it means the engine is burning oil and you should immediately walk away.

EDIT: Thanks to everyone for the extra tips, but just to clear things up I completely agree you should take it to a mechanic once you've made the purchase and have them take a look. This is just for when you're initially seeing the car. Another thing is I know it's fairly common for cars to burn oil, however if it's burning enough that it's making it through the catalytic converter then you most likely have a head gasket that's shot. Not worth the risk in my mind. 
Source: I am a mechanic
		-- u/Mr_Fafnir, 37336 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When buying an appliance, don't overlook its decibel rating. In the long run, a noisy appliance can be more psychologically and physically draining than you would think.

 This is especially true for appliances that you use very often or which are continuously on (such as a fridge).

Depending on the appliance and the country you live in, there might be a value in db (decibel) written on a sticker on the appliance or it can be found in the specification sheet. Decibel is a logarithmtic value, so a few decibels less make a huge difference for your comfort (and health).

For loud appliances (e.g. lawnmowers) you should wear hearing protection whenever you use them.
		-- u/ConsciousnessWizard, 38825 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When buying baby clothes for someone that is expecting a child, get clothes for older age groups (3-6 months, 6-9 months) not newborn. Parents receive a ton of newborn sized clothes already and the baby will probably not get to wear all of them before outgrowing them.

I can say from experience that parents will greatly appreciate having larger clothes since their infant will inevitably fit those sizes at some point.
		-- u/alejdell, 41168 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When comparing ice cream for quality, but the ingredient list looks the similar, compare the weight of a serving on the nutrition label. Denser is better. The gums and fillers used in lower quality ice cream are lighter than cream and eggs.

If one says a serving is 1/4 cup (65g) and the other says a serving is 1/4 cup (73g), get the 73g one. They may both have some fillers, but the denser one will have less.
		-- u/SquirrellyNuckFutter, 37221 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When cooking things on aluminium foil, first scrunch the foil up, then lay it loosely flat again out on your baking tray. The juices will stay put - and the food will not stick to the foil half as much, if at all.

		-- u/johnlewisdesign, 43012 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When deciding on a new job, don't underestimate the importance of its distance from your house. Sometimes a bad job can be made worse by a long commute home and vice versa.

Wow what a response. And just to clarify...I'm not saying people don't consider their commute. I'm just saying too many people don't think about the effect it has on their day. Everyone is different and what works for you might not work for someone else. Thanks for all the love, and the hate, on this one.
		-- u/karacold, 49581 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When drinking with your boss or manager, always stay at least one drink behind them.

Unless they are raging alcoholics, then you do you. 
		-- u/nlyons23, 48115 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: When encountering an a English word with an umlaut (the two little dots), know that it is there to tell the reader to pronounce the second vowel independently of the first. Naïve and the name Zoë are excellent examples of this. An umlaut will never occur over singular vowels.

		-- u/TheBlackVelvetWolfe, 54336 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When flying, put a tag with your info inside your bag, not just outside. Any tag on the outside can come off. Also, when a bag gets lost, the airline will open it to try to determine who it belongs to. Source: Used to work at Lost Baggage for an airline.

		-- u/mellowkey, 54911 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When gifting to someone who is a long time hobbyist or expert in a particular skill, do NOT buy them a random gift related to that hobby/skill.

Chances are they already have it, or have a higher quality version of it, or don't really want corny paraphernalia about it. If anything, ask them what’s on their wishlist related to that topic, or buy them something related to your common interests.

Edit: Wow I really expected this to die in new, so thanks to everyone who commented. I just want to add that I am approaching this from the perspective of a gift giver. Yes, I want the person to know I was thinking about them and what they love, BUT I also want to spend my money on something they really enjoy or will actually use. Why spend hard earned income on something they’ll probably let collect dust?

I think that gift giving culture excessively pressures people into giving gifts as surprises. That combined with the social norm to always say “I don’t want a gift... just get me whatever” makes it very difficult to know exactly what people want because you can’t ask them. That’s why, IN MY OPINION, it’s fine to write someone a heartfelt card and then give them a voucher or gift card to let them treat themselves to what they want.

Ultimately it’s your choice how you want to spend on your loved ones. This is just my philosophy.
		-- u/latesnowdrops, 58358 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When giving advice, use the phrase “perhaps” in replacement of “I think” so it comes off more as a suggestion and not an opinion. It will be more likely to be heard and taken into consideration.

		-- u/raviji22, 50290 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When handling firearms, always assume there is a bullet in the chamber. Even if the gun leaves your sight for a second, next time you pick it up just assume a bullet magically got into the chamber.

		-- u/DebuggingThatPussA, 63601 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When handling firearms, always assume there is a bullet in the chamber. Even if the gun leaves your sight for a second, next time you pick it up just assume a bullet magically got into the chamber.

		-- u/sblack9ikfg, 65717 upvotes, 0.73 ratio.
%
LPT: When hired for a new job, copy the list of responsibilities they provide you and save it in a folder with your resume. This will make it easier to complete an application the next time you look for a job when the employer asks what your last job duties were.

		-- u/Blackberry_Creek, 42338 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When hosting a dinner party for people you're not familiar with, leave a simple task until they have arrived, like mixing salad ingredients, or slicing bread. Invariably your guests will ask if they can help, and you can point them to these tasks as a useful icebreaker.

		-- u/tapdown, 44468 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When interviewing for a job, when asked the salary question, turn that back around on the interviewer (nicely)!

This has worked for me on my last three jobs (one of them was a promotion) that I got. When the interviewer asks the question: what salary are you looking for?, instead of listing what you’re expecting ask them instead. 

I always start with explaining that I have been researching salaries in my field but wanted to know what they felt is a competitive salary for someone with my experience? (If this your first job interview or you’re going for an entry level job that you don’t have experience in, you can always change the part about experience to “this position”). 

Oftentimes, they will give you the number that they are expecting to pay for that position; and every time I ask a potential employer it has been at least $5-$10k more then I was going to ever say. 

This also helps you compare what they’re willing to pay vs whether that salary is worth the job. AND you don’t run the risk of under selling yourself! (If they’re expecting to pay $60k and you say $40k, they’re not going to correct you and also might think that you are not as qualified or have a high opinion of your own self worth).

Edit to add: a bunch of commenters are making valid points. Do your research, know your worth and what the worth of the position is. If the company lowballs you, ask for more if you feel comfortable. Salaries are often part of a negotiation, and if you know you deserve more then advocate for it. Prove to them that you’re worth the investment, because if they’re not willing to pay you what you deserve (provided they can AFFORD to do so, some businesses just don’t have the funds to meet the same pay as another business) then you have to consider if they’re worth your time. Does the money matter for you to accept the job, and if the answer is yes then get it!

Edit #2: Thank you to everyone for the awards! I treasure every one of them since these are my first time receiving them!
		-- u/Notyourmamashedgehog, 42454 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When lending a pen or marker hand it over without the cap, you are much more likely to get it back

		-- u/I_Am_RunninGunnin, 44039 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: When looking at potential houses, in the basement look at the door hinges. If the bottom one is different or newer, the basement may have a history of flooding that even the realtor may not know about.

		-- u/Rusty-Crowe, 48464 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When making a visible mistake in front of your peers, always admit fault immediately. Admitting you are a human who isn't perfect will diffuse alot of backlash and flack you would receive otherwise. It will reflect maturity and will take attention off the mistake you made.

		-- u/brandonmcgritle, 50564 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When making an argument, a single strong point is better than one strong point and multiple weak points. Weak points become targets and weaken your entire position.

		-- u/GreenTeaOnMyDesk, 39208 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: When making conversation with someone you've just met, ask them what they've been listening to lately, rather than what their favorite kind of music is - it's fresh in their mind and they won't have to pick favorites on the spot.

		-- u/[deleted], 51825 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: When meeting new people, don't make a joke with their name, however funny or harmless you may think it is. They're probably sick of it. At best you come off as boring, at worst you're a dick.

		-- u/fr0896, 39332 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When microwaving food (casserole, pasta, etc), make it in the shape of a ring or a donut, basically have it hollowed out in the middle. It heats up significantly quicker and more evenly.

		-- u/Joesen_Joestar, 47909 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When moving into a new house, create a separate email account for the house.

I asked for advice on moving into our first house a while ago and this was one of the tips. We did it and had no idea how handy it would be.

We have all our bills, white goods receipts, WiFi, everything, set up with this account and it’s amazing.

People are always amazed when they find out, even estate agents. Thought I’d share the love, hope it helps.

EDIT: thanks for the positive comments, it helped us out when we got our first place so hope it helps as well. A lot of people are asking what “white goods” are. It’s like household appliances and I assume it’s a British term.

EDIT: also a lot of people are saying it’s useless or more work, it’s just a personal opinion that it’s handy. I also like that my spouse can be logged in as well and handle any bills as I work away a lot

EDITEDIT: this blew up and I didn’t think it would. Not sure why this is such a divisive topic, half seem to love it and half hate it. The majority of the other side are saying just make a folder in normal gmail. I’m not saying this will work for everyone but we have busy personal lives with my spouse being a freelancer with the need for multiple emails, and myself likewise. I know how to use folders and have many set up in my work emails, this just works best to keep it entirely separate. Spouse has access to my personal emails whenever she wants by just going on my phone, but why would she want to receive all my boring newsletters about classic cars and old Volvos in her inbox? Also, it’s just a small tip that helped me out, no one’s forcing you to do it. Glad it helped some, have a great week
		-- u/millner_44, 52659 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When moving into a new house. One of the first things you should do is change the locks. You never know who might have a key to the house in their possession.

		-- u/MustangFinch, 41416 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When moving, pack a “first day” box with everything you think you’ll need right after you arrive. It’s annoying to dig through all your boxes for things like modems and hair dryers when you’re tired from your move.

		-- u/campperr, 47647 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When negotiating a salary for a new job, always ask them what their range is. If they tell you 'we don't have a range' they're almost always lying. HR and finance will almost never sign off hiring a new employee without a budget being in place.

As a first point, you should always push back on discussing salary as close to an offer being made as possible. The more they are imagining you being a part of their team, the better the negotiating position you have.

Once you're at that point, ask them what their range is. Your goal is to understand where you fit within the range. The more of the essential and desirable points in the job spec you meet, the higher up the range you'll be able to negotiate.

However – and this is the important bit – if they come back and say 'they don't have a range', then it's almost always a lie (I'll come back to when it isn't in a minute). As someone who has either directly hired, or been involved in hiring over 40 employees across different industries, there's one constant. If you don't have sign off from HR and finance (potentially via a senior manager), then there isn't a position to hire for.

To get sign off from those two crucial departments, you need a budget (the range) so the company can ensure that they will be able to afford the new hire, and that the salary is less than the ROI they will bring to the company.

(It's also good to know that it can sometimes be worth pushing for a little over the defined range. I once had a company come back with a £6k offer above the top end of their budget because they hadn't expected to find someone at my level. They'd under budgeted and were competing against three other solid offers – all above the original top end of their budget).

Now the only time that this might not apply is if they are hiring for a highly specialised position (either technical, or executive/c-suite level) where they need to pay whatever the market is demanding. But the chances are with those positions, you'll have a recruiter handling the negotiations who knows standard market rates and will be pushing for as high a salary as possible without going over what's reasonable, because their commission is usually a percentage of the accepted offer.

If the job you're interviewing for doesn't fall into those above categories, then be very careful – especially when there's a deliverable involved in the interview process. Sometimes unscrupolous companies have been known to use fake jobs to farm ideas from highly qualified candidates without having to pay them for them.

And even if that isn't the case, consider carefully whether you really want to work for a company where there is a culture of lying to you before you've even been hired.
		-- u/frontendben, 48782 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When planning a garden or backyard, always try to install a few plants native to your area. The local insects and birds have an ecological relationship with those plants, and might not be able to benefit from introduced species. Even a few small plants can help restore biodiversity.

		-- u/[deleted], 46738 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When putting down an animal, you don't need to take them to the vet. The vet can come to your home, and do it in a place that your pet is comfortable and familiar.

I've seen a few posts about putting down pets on here before, and people suggesting that you should be with them when it's happening because they will be stressed and scared at the vets office, and they shouldn't be alone with a stranger for their last moments. It is possible for a vet to come to your home and have the procedure done there. That way, they are more comfortable with their home surroundings, and don't have the extra stress and anxiety going to the vets office.

I'm not sure if this is possible everywhere in the world, but it's quite common in the UK where I live, and thought I would share this here.
		-- u/JeremyMcFake, 37434 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When renting housing, buy yourself a new shower head.

I lived in a crappy, hundred year old apartment with shitty water pressure for years before a roommate came in and bought us a new shower head. It solved the water pressure problem and made the shower feel so damn luxurious. I’ve done it all my new places now, it makes a world of difference!
		-- u/RaunchyButRelevent, 43498 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When someone gets interrupted while telling a story, invite them to continue after the interruption is over with an, “as you were saying about (x)” or something similar. It can be uncomfortable for the person to start back up and this makes them feel like you valued their words.

		-- u/Po1sonator, 98067 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When someone is excited about something that isn't a good idea, don't burst their bubble right away. They won't be open to hearing the negative. Wait til they're in a more logical state and then ask the questions that will make them realize why it's not a good idea.

 Edit: I'm talking about the INITIAL excitement, people.  When they're telling you the idea is the peak so just let that die down a bit first before pointing out the possible obstacles.  And whether the idea is good or bad doesn't matter......it's for the people who THINK the person's idea is bad and want to poke holes in it. 
		-- u/dez33333, 41763 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: When someone is going through a difficult time and is sharing it with you, don't talk about similar problems you're having as a way to relate. Instead, just listen.

When someone's sharing something difficult that they're going through, so many people get this urge to "empathize" by replying with similar struggles of their own. This is one of the worst things you can do when someone is trying to get something off their chest to you.

Instead of talking about yourself, just listen to them. Make them feel heard. Ask questions and help them work through it themselves. More often than we realize, people just to need to feel validated and heard when they're going through something personally difficult.

Years ago, I suffered a great loss, and turned to one of my friends for emotional support. His immediate response was, "Oh man, I'm really sorry to hear that. Because *I* remember when *I* had a similar loss, it was really rough for *me*. And what *I* felt was... etc." My friend wasn't trying to be insensitive or rude, but it reminded me that many people accidentally do this when dealing with someone else's grief.

I felt that my problem that I was trying to convey to my friend was lost on him, and I really just felt worse afterwards. But if he listened to me and made me feel heard, as another one of my friends did later on, I would've felt much better. Remember this if a friend or loved one ever reaches out to you to hear something they're going through.
		-- u/Calif0rnia_Soul, 61953 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When someone says no to a piece of cake, don't try to convince them saying "it's just one piece". It's not just one piece. It's a mentally lost battle that will affect the coming battles, possibly resulting in a lost war against an unhealthy lifestyle for a person actively trying to improve.

		-- u/nomansskydrive, 43274 upvotes, 0.72 ratio.
%
LPT: When starting a new change in your life such as going to the gym or quitting smoking, avoid telling friends or family. Their positive feedback can give you a false feeling of accomplishment tricking you into thinking you have already succeeded which can hinder your efforts to change.

I read an article about this several years ago and it has helped me tremendously.

I can't find the original article I read, but here is a good one from Psychology Today: 
https://www.psychologytoday.com/us/blog/ulterior-motives/200905/if-you-want-succeed-don-t-tell-anyone

Edit: Thank you Redditor for finding the original article that I read! - http://berkeleysciencereview.com/when-telling-others-about-your-goals-compromises-them/
		-- u/xarzilla, 43713 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When starting a new job, don’t stress about your new boss/manager liking you. They already picked you over all the other applicants.

		-- u/XPhanom, 36801 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When starting a new job, find out how long your coworkers have been there. If no one has been working there for very long, and it's not a new company, that may be a red flag.

		-- u/Ozzie-111, 71483 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When stressing over something, use the 10-10-10 rule. Will it matter in 10 days? 10 months? 10 years? After getting some perspective, you’ll notice how very few things end up worth stressing over.

Credit goes to my mom for teaching me this one. 
		-- u/InquiringMind886, 51588 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: When telling a boss about a problem, propose at least one solution to resolve it. It will show that you are working to resolve it instead of just passing the buck.

		-- u/Kindlynet2, 40371 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When things go bad at a job, good people leave, eventually followed by people who thought they could change things but got buried because too many good people left. Those left are bad people or hostages. The good people are your canary.

Brian Hogan posted this on Twitter. I thought it was very simple and profound advice if you’re in a toxic work environment and are considering making a job change. 
		-- u/gangbangkang, 53839 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When traveling with a friend or family member, don’t be afraid to suggest breaking off to each do your own things for a day. Going solo can be enjoyable (eat/go wherever want at your own pace), plus it reduces you being sick of each other by the end of the trip.

		-- u/josephtheepi, 48980 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When travelling via plane internationally with your partner. Put a set of clothes in each others bag so on the off chance the airline loses a suitcase, you have at least one fresh set of clothes to change into.

Saved a couple we were touring with recently. They got their luggage back 24 hours later.
		-- u/CrumycrustyDogurt, 67010 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When trying to convert your PDF file to an editable word document, you can upload it to Google Drive first then open it using Google Docs. It converts the file with great accuracy and is 100% free.

		-- u/navssvan, 55456 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When trying to solve a computer error code by doing a google search, include the word "solved" in your search.

I'm sure this has come been raised before, but I always forget until afterwards.
		-- u/CantSayIReallyTried, 37996 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: When using google, add “-Pinterest” (sans quotes) to your query to avoid receiving hundreds of useless Pinterest results.

		-- u/KruiserIV, 82700 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: When viewing a home you are interested in buying, watch what you say. Cameras that also record voices are everywhere.

We looked at a house recently for sale by owner that we really liked. The owner showed a few things then stepped out so we could look at it privately. We didn't gush too much about it inside but pointed out a few things we liked and discussed if we should make an offer. A few days later when negotiating the owner was pointing out word for word the same things we mentioned we liked. When we walked through a second time we asked about the security system  that's when we learned it had interior cameras very discreet in the alarm's motion sensor. Contacted the alarm company  sure enough it records sound and video. I am certain they listened to our conversation. Too many things we said were repeated verbatim to be a coincidence. 
Ethical or not, it happens. I am sure some more unscrupulous types also put their phones somewhere to record  use it to their advantage.
		-- u/Theskidiever, 55814 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When wearing a tie on a windy day, slip a coin down the inside of the hem to keep the tie from blowing around.

		-- u/raviji22, 52443 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When writing a thesis or a scientific paper, don't end your day with a completed section. Write at least one or two sentences into the next topic to make it easier for your future self to continue writing the next day.

		-- u/Myst1kSkorpioN, 47111 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When you are giving a presentation, always include in each slide not only its number, but also the overall number of slides, for instance, 11/25. That makes it much easier for the audience to understand the flow of your talk and gives them the feeling of a better control over the situation.

		-- u/Darkest_shader, 41400 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: When you are teaching someone HOW to do something you should also spend a lot of time explaining WHY you are doing it a certain way because the WHY helps the person remember the HOW.

		-- u/Habanero_Eyeball, 38345 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: When you are trying to resolve an issue where someone else made an error, put the focus on the error and not the person. Example of this: Instead of saying, “You didn’t send the attachment,” I say, “The attachment didn’t come through, please try sending it again.”

Edit: check comments for additional / better tips
		-- u/[deleted], 37183 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: When you break a glass on a hard floor, shine a flashlight parallel to the floor so you can see the shadows of tiny pieces you would otherwise miss.

		-- u/[deleted], 51265 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When you buy a house, be sure to save pictures of the interior design before the sale is over. You can recreate the “staging” that the realtors paid for to make the house look cozy.

Houses are often professionally “staged”, meaning a company will come in and make the house look as cozy and livable as possible using rented props. None of it will be there when you buy the house, but you can recreate the look from the pictures and get free interior design designed to maximize the house’s appeal.
		-- u/soulkz, 37970 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When you come back from a holiday, dont go straight back to work. Plan a few extra days off for when you can return, unpack, relax and still be in holiday mode. This way, going back to work won't be as daunting.

Edit: Wow..people you need the calm the farm down. For the few smarties out there..that caught on that I am not American..here is a slow clap for you. Now for the rest of you, let me reprase what I mean. What you Americans call vacation days..is what the rest of the world call holidays. That is what I mean. You dont need to travel all across the Antartic to enjoy this LPT. I merely mean, if you were to take a 3 or 4 day vacation, to even say go visit your grandma that lives in another time zone. Come home with another day or two off to spare..or close to a weekend (if your sadistic employers give you a weekend off) That way, you get to recoup, rewind, look at pictures, unpack..do whatever the heck your heart desires. Before you go back to the hell hole you call life.
		-- u/Fishwhocantswim, 39692 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: When you compare yourself to others, you’re almost always comparing one of your weaknesses against a strength of theirs. Don’t do that to yourself. We’re all superior at something. Capitalize on that.

		-- u/WhatUtalkinBowWirrus, 47642 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: When you don't have all the facts, try to give people the most generous reason you can for their behaviour. Annoyingly slow driver? Maybe it's a mom with a birthday cake in the back. This mindset will gradually make you less reactive, more compassionate and more forgiving of your own bad days.

Edit: thank you for all sharing your tips (didn't realise "they must need to poop" was such a common assumption!), awards and stories of how you do this in your own life. You're all fucking awesome, have a beautiful day and take all these good vibes out with you into the real world and spread them around! 🌻
		-- u/ContributionNarrow88, 124753 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When you encounter hate content in the internet, make it a point to not participate in it even if you have a valid counterpoint to offer. People spreading hate content are looking for attention, not a healthy conversation. All you’ll do by offering a view is fan the flames further.

		-- u/[deleted], 40227 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: When you feel like you need something, but you can’t figure out what it is, it’s water. It’s always water.

		-- u/GhostRoboX5, 50990 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When you get a compliment for doing a good job at work or cooking delicious food or anything you did well, just say THANK YOU. Do not tone it down by saying something like "it was so easy" or "it was actually the spices I used" or "anyone could have done that". Just smile and say thank you.

		-- u/hash1e, 47333 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: When you get a new notebook, leave the first page blank. When you finish using the notebook, you can number the pages and use the first page as a table of contents.

		-- u/BiohackedGamer, 46350 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: When you go on vacation, bring a new soundtrack/album you have never heard before. In the future, every time you listen to the soundtrack/album again it will bring you vivid memories of the places you have visited.

		-- u/itsDiven_, 50363 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: When you go shopping and there's that one retail worker who's exceptionally cheerful and helpful, get their name. Later find their manager contact info and send an email about it. Retail work is tough, the ones who go above and beyond deserve recognition and praise!

		-- u/Maximum-Barracuda-27, 49372 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: When you have a 3 day weekend, do all of your chores (laundry, cleaning, homework, projects, etc) the night BEFORE your 3 day weekend begins. You may have to stay up late that night but you'll thank yourself later when you have 3 full days to relax.

Edit: Wholy crap I didn't realize it'd be this big of a response...I get it for all of you that have kids (I do as well he's just a lil one so I'm not there just yet hahah) But someone else in the comments I think said what I was trying to say in my LPT but much better:

Do all your chores (yes I know thet never end but the ones that seem most pressing) before your weekend, if possible.
		-- u/karacold, 65124 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: When you have a doctors appointment write down a list of everything you want addressed or want to ask during the appointment.

		-- u/greenmachine11235, 36982 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When you have the opportunity to give a guy a genuine compliment, do not hesitate to do so. Not only are compliments fielded at men more rare, but a man can ride the high off a single compliment for years.

This post is in no way trying to exclude other genders or even pandering to the "now we have to compliment the patriarchy! What a pathetic patriarchal post blah blah" people...I'm just merely pointing out that women receive far more compliments than men. From fashion, to hair, to looks, women grow up receiving more compliments than men. They also grow up with far more judgment too which is definitely a heavy trade-off (mostly from other women if having 8 sisters showed me anything), but that's just how it goes it seems.

Knowing this, I found that when I spoke to my male friends about my feelings on the topic they all unanimously agreed that they too received very few compliments in general. But when they did, man do they still think about them even years later.

So to summarize, continue to compliment (genuinely) when you can, but know that men in particular can really get hit in the feels when a sincere one lands
		-- u/magnanimous14, 48822 upvotes, 0.8 ratio.
%
LPT: When you host a party, create a Spotify / Apple Music playlist, include a link to it on the invite and task each guest with adding a couple of songs to it. People love hearing their favourite songs at a party and it takes the guesswork out of creating a playlist that will appeal to all.

Make sure you preface your request by asking that people only choose party-specific songs (or whatever other preference you have).

Also, have a bunch of your own party songs pre-loaded on the play-list to give people an idea of mood/genre.

*Disclaimer: For many people, this is an LPT for post COVID. I hope everyone is keeping safe in the meantime.*

Edit:

**Regarding the risk of people adding silly songs to the playlist / adding duplicate songs:** ensure you do an audit on the day of the party, and lock the playlist so no-one can make further edits.

**If you are concerned with what the flow of music at the party will be like:** ask people to stick to a couple of specific genres.

**Regarding 'giving people homework' before a party:** you don't have to make it compulsory.
		-- u/menwithmanners, 55331 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: When you mess up writing the date as xx/xx/20 the first bit of this year instead of erasing or scratching through it, just write 21 after the date xx/xx/2021.

		-- u/aserverinblack, 38485 upvotes, 0.76 ratio.
%
LPT: When you receive a hospital bill, ask them for an itemized bill and it will be much cheaper

Example: You get an expensive bill for a $1,000 unfortunately. U.S. healthcare really shouldn’t be so expensive in the first place...but the first thing you should do is call and ask for a review of the level of care, and while on the phone the next thing you do is ask for an itemized bill with every single charge. 

They make bills unnecessarily expensive because in the backend of things, they rack up ridiculous charges like $37 for a bandaid. Once you call and request what I’ve mentioned, they’ll knock all the BS charges right off before sending you the itemized statement.
 
Some bills can go down from $500 to $45. It may not be that drastic for everyone, but many can be reduced by several hundreds of dollars.

If you or anyone you know has been to the ER recently, tell them to try this. It can majorly help!

You can try to even further this by looking for medical debt reconciliation companies. They make money by cutting down on your debt, even in cases like these.

If you have insurance, you can contact your insurance company and ask for a breakdown of what was billed as well.  Most services you were billed for likely weren’t even done. So yes ALWAYS ask for an itemized bill, they get scared and remove a whole bunch of items!

You can also apply for medical financial assistance (MFA). Every hospital has it, you just need to submit financial info and they will pay it all or half. Sometimes you can even get medicine and visits waived for 6 months or more. 

Another thing you can do for extra help is ask to apply for charity. The charity department will ask questions about your income situation however, but many people do lie about their income. There’s a chance you’ll get approved and your account is adjusted to zero balance.

EDIT: this may be a bit simplified and there’s some contradictory statements in the comments, but I don’t think you should be discouraged from trying it because it has 100% WORKED for many... such as people in this thread saying it reduced their bill firsthand, hospital employees confirming this, genuine comments on twitter of people sharing their experience with it and how much it lowered their bill, and other videos of people explaining their situation showing gratitude for having learned this info because it saved them a lot of money... no “propaganda” or angrily fueled desire to spread misinformation. Many of these people didn’t get much recognition for sharing their experience either, it’s not like they’re just lying to go viral. They’re not all wrong.
		-- u/VerySlump, 55144 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: When you repaint a room write the paint brand, color name and code on back of the light switch face plate in that room with a permanent marker

		-- u/pking84, 50119 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When you replace "why is this happening to me" with "what do I need to do now" everything shifts

EDIT: WOW - thank you for sharing your stories. Your amazing strength and resilience is truly an inspiration!
		-- u/Nerdyfaxmachine, 46925 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When you sign up for anything online, put the websites name as your middle name. That way when you receive spam/advert emails, you will know who sold your info.

		-- u/mc1nc4, 48053 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: When you sign up for anything online, put the website’s name as your middle name. That way when you receive spam/advert emails, you will know who sold your info.

		-- u/raviji22, 149921 upvotes, 0.97 ratio.
%
LPT: When you spill wine on fabric (clothing, carpet, couch). Dab it carefully with a paper towel to absorb most of the liquid, then pour salt over the remaining stain. The next day, the salt will have absorbed most the wine and you just vacuum it up. This has saved me tons of permanent wine stains!

		-- u/[deleted], 51229 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When you submit a resume to a potential employer, submit it as a PDF, not a Word doc

I actually judge the potential of the candidate by how they format their resume (typos? grammar? formatting? style?). If you format it as a PDF, I see your resume how you want me to see it. If you have it as a Word document, margins, fonts, etc may be lost or adjusted when I open it.

Ensure you show me your best self by converting it to a PDF.

And please... proof read it. Give it to a friend or family member to proof read it thoroughly. I will likely not recommend you for interviewing if you have poor grammar or obvious typos. I assume you are providing me a sample of your work when I look at your resume. It shows either that you don't care or aren't detail oriented when you have typos and I assume I can expect the same if I hire you.

Edit: There is a lot of conversation about Applicant Tracking Systems (ATS) and how they can vomit on PDFs. So, please be aware of this when submitting to systems that may utilize this.
		-- u/AGrainOfSalt435, 51907 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: When you tell someone you need to speak to someone at a later time, let them know what the subject matter is. It saves the person you need to speak with a lot of anxiety.

For me personally, I already have a lot of things going on at any given moment and struggle with anxiety. Instead of saying “hey we need to talk” and refuse to give any context, say “hey when you get a chance I’d like to talk to you about X” or “hey later on I’ve got a couple questions about Y”. If people would let me know what needs to be discussed, I would have a better chance to have an intelligent discussion as opposed to entering the situation already on edge.

Edit: Damn. Went to sleep with 10 updoots, woke up with 25k and a ton of awards. Thank you all for the internet points, random strangers. Hopefully this is 25k fewer people that needlessly give someone crippling anxiety
		-- u/Too_Caffinated, 60974 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When you're constantly hitting backspace to delete the mistake you made letter by letter, you can hold CTRL and hit backspace to delete word by word instead.

		-- u/1gnik, 50963 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: When you're picking someone up from the airport, bring a snack for them. They likely haven't eaten in hours and will appreciate it.

ETA: Thank you, kind strangers, for all the awards! I posted this right before picking my sister up from the airport and packing her a slice of homemade cheesecake. She really appreciated it, as she was coming from across the country and wanted to keep her mask on until she left every public space.

To those asking why you'd be hungry after a flight, in the U.S., you don't get food on domestic flights, unless you want to purchase the world's most expensive cup of instant noodles or something similar, and that would require you to remove your mask to eat it, of course.  Between the flight time, airport wait time, and time to get to the airport, it could easily be eight hours since they last had a proper meal, even with a direct flight.

To those that are hostile towards the idea that you might consider doing an additional nice thing for someone on top of an initial nice thing: You don't have to do it, and the person isn't obligated to eat it. Sometimes it just makes me feel good to do nice things for people I care about to make them happy, especially when they've had a tough day/week/year. And aren't most people having a tough year?

Edit #2: I love all the comments from people remembering times they appreciated unexpectedly having a snack upon being picked up from the airport!

Also, despite the first edit, I still woke up to hundreds of hateful comments. To those, I add: I hope you someday experience the feeling of being excited to pick up someone you love from the airport. I hope you someday feel joy yourself when you make someone else feel happy and loved and cared for with a small gesture rather than being filled with scorn and disdain for them. It's amazing!
		-- u/[deleted], 62938 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: When you're sitting at a drive-thru speaker, we can always hear everything - even if you think your interaction is over. Be careful what personal details you reveal to strangers.

As soon as you drive up to the speaker, we get a beep over our headsets and the transmission begins. If we don't answer you right away - we can hear everything. If we apologize and say we'll be with you in a minute - you're not on hold, we can hear everything. If you've ordered but the drive-thru line won't let you pull ahead yet - we can hear every single thing you're saying. 

I wish I could forget some of the stuff I've heard.

On the flipside, some of the stuff I've heard has made me give the customer a nice little bonus on their order when it sounds like they need it.

		-- u/wreckinitralph, 53004 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When you're taking someone's photo, count to three, then keep counting until they laugh at you.

I'm no professional but I've been doing this for a while now and it hasn't failed to get a genuine smile rather than a forced 'photo face'.
		-- u/gmf24, 42998 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: When you're unsure about an event's formality, choose the outfit which is nicer. Almost always, it's better to be over-dressed than under-dressed.

		-- u/[deleted], 46350 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: When your company sends you an "anonymous" survey, always assume it's not.

I am in charge of a team at work, and every time the company sends a survey I emphasize the same point. I strongly believe that in a real survey there is no right and wrong (I'm talking surveys about how you feel regarding certain subjects), yet as we all know since we're in the internet right now, anonymity gives people a huge sense of security and disregard for potential consequences, so the idea of anonimity can make people see a survey as a blank slate to vent, joke or throw insults around.

Always assume any survey from your company is NOT anonymous, keep it honest, but keep it respectful.
		-- u/pablocassinerio, 53505 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: When your loved one is close to the end be aware that in most cases it isn’t the peaceful way it’s depicted in movies. Be prepared to go to therapy if you plan to be there at the end.

For most here this probably won’t be something you deal with more then a handful of times in your life. Which is why I think it’s important to know what  your potentially walking into and the shit that follows you afterwards. I lost my dad three years ago to lymphoma/complications from it. Ive watched my brother fall into serious addiction issues, my mom never really recover and only in the last year have I finally come to peace with what I saw. I hope that this will encourage anyone whose about to go through this with a loved one to go to therapy and not turn straight to something like drugs or alcohol. 

For context I’ve seen or immediately arrived after my grandfather passed and it was similar to what you kinda expect from pop culture, Breath slip and drift off. However if your about to lose a loved one whose battling a disease like a cancer be prepared for a very jarring and potentially drawn out experience. 

With my dad for the last 12 hours of his life he fought for every breath, and when I say fought I mean like gasp, cough and vomit blood and have to call emergency services. All to be told they can’t do anything except to give him more morphine. In his final few minutes he began to panic as he realized this was it. He looked at my mom, my brother and I and shed tears. Then as he slipped away his body expelled blood from his mouth. The entire experience still haunts me to this day, I remember every moment perfectly clearly and whenever I do I break down a little bit that he had to go through that. My mom will call me and wonder if she did enough, was she strong for him at the end, which is it’s own kind of heartbreaking. My brother couldn’t cope and has since become addicted to drugs. 

I’d strongly encourage all to go to grief counseling, I did about 6 months later and was able to settle myself and stop drinking away pain. RIP dad miss ya everyday
		-- u/SFW_shade, 58068 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: When your mental health isn't in the best state, give yourself a break. Don't feel guilty for things you can't do. Normal things like eating, sleeping or socialising may be difficult, it's okay to struggle. Rest, recover, be kind to yourself and know the bad times are temporary.

		-- u/ritzz2_0, 49794 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: Whenever you travel abroad bring a new soundtrack for each place you visit, preferably one you have never heard before. In the future, every time you listen to each soundtrack again they will bring you vivid memories of the places you have visited.

		-- u/Martin_the_Hammer, 57262 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Whenever you're in a group situation and everybody has to take turns to do something (giving a presentation for example) and they ask for a volunteer, ALWAYS go first. Your audience will be fresh, the organiser will be happy someone stepped up, and you can get it over with straight away

Edit: thanks for the response you lovely people
		-- u/simian_fold, 57696 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: Whether you're in college on budget or just hard times. Rice is many times cheaper than ramen and more filling. Especially if bought in bulk(25lb bag). It's also way healthier due to salt content.

		-- u/throwawaycrossstitch, 41869 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: While using laser toy with cats place a treat somewhere on the floor when the cat isn't looking. After doing some laser-play, allow the cat to "catch" the dot which you have directed to the treat. It gives them a sense of catching pray and It will be helpful for their mental health.

		-- u/abu_tva, 67364 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Working around the incompetence of your higher-ups and not being unpleasant about it is an essential skill for senior positions

		-- u/alvmnvs, 40020 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: X percent of Y is equal to Y percent of X. So, if you want to find out what 7% of 50 is, you could instead find out what 50% of 7 is, which is 3.5. This means that 7% of 50 is also equal to 3.5.

More examples: If you want to find out what 2% of 20 is, do 20% of 2 instead and you'll get 0.4. So, 2% of 20 also equals 0.4. 

Or, 12% of 25 can be alternatively written out as 25% of 12 instead, which would be  3. 

Explanation: Commutative Property. So, 0.07 times 50 will always equal 50 times 0.07.

I hope you found this interesting and/or helpful! 

**Edit #1:** Thank you for the gold! 

**Edit #2:** You can also solve percentage problems by multiplying the two numbers (7 times 50, which equals 350), and then taking the product and dividing it by 100 (so the answer would be 3.5). Thank you to everyone who pointed out this alternative method. 
		-- u/[deleted], 93630 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: Yelp replaces restaurant phone numbers with a special number that charges that business a marketing fee. If you find a good restaurant on Yelp Google their phone number instead so they don't lose any money.

		-- u/OwlThief32, 82661 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: You can access most MIT courses for free online

[https://ocw.mit.edu/index.htm](https://ocw.mit.edu/index.htm)

They have high quality courses on everything from business to computer science, complete with notes and video lectures, FOR FREE.
		-- u/RocketRambo, 39014 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: You can almost always remove "just" or "really" from a sentence to achieve a stronger meaning.

		-- u/zeamp, 36952 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: You can stop Spotify from playing certain artists.

To stop Spotify from playing Chris Brown  Travis Scott 

Step 1: go to the artist home page 

Step 2: click the 3 dots (…) 

Step 3: select “Don’t play this artist”

Edit: to add Travis Scott because yeah
		-- u/yellowsloth, 39145 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: You don't get paid more by working harder. You get paid more because a job you can do is in demand because not many people can do it. If you want to be paid more, learn a skill that's difficult for most people and valuable to an employer.

		-- u/abramcpg, 43361 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: You don't have plot armour. Stop speeding. Stop drinking too much. Stop doing drugs. You can die, super easily and meaninglessly. Don't let that be your story.

		-- u/Hillano, 46127 upvotes, 0.71 ratio.
%
LPT: You don't need to commit to one path in life. You'll often find that your interests change, and once you're done with one thing, it's perfectly healthy to look for something else to pursue.

I'm only 32, and I've already done more jobs and pursued more things than I can count. I've been a filmmaker, a game developer, a therapist, a business systems programmer, a game tester, a customer service representative for god knows how many companies, a bartender, a chef, and currently, a university lecturer. If you're focusing on one thing and placing all your perceived self worth in success at said one thing, that's a mistake that will only make you miserable.

Edit: Just wanted to say thanks for all the lovely messages and awards (aside from this one:  [Thanks for that... - Imgur](https://imgur.com/gallery/51C039b). Sounds like that person could use my therapy skills XD)

Edit 2: There seems to be a lot of fussing and feuding in the comments, so I'll address that. A university lecturer here in the UK is simply someone who teaches at a university. I know in some other places we are called "professors", but that's kind of an inaccurate term, since we are rarely professors in terms of our qualifications. A professorship in terms of the qualification comes after a doctorate. I personally have a doctorate, and thus my title is "doctor", but that's entirely different to a MEDICAL doctor (M.D), which I am very much not. At any rate, you don't even need to be a doctor to teach at a university here in the UK, just someone experienced in the field you're teaching in (my doctorate isn't even remotely related to games development, which is what I teach, for example). I wonder whether people are thinking I'm claiming to be a medical doctor or something? My doctorate is in a subject related to medicine, but I am not qualified as a literal MEDICAL DOCTOR, as in someone who can treat you in a hospital and prescribe medication etc. Do I sound that intelligent to you?? Trust me, I'm not XD

Maybe people are confused because a doctorate simply means you've completed a doctorate (often called an "academic/research degree") in the UK? Anyone can apply to do one, and universities frequently publish requests for people to apply to undertake them. In my case, I was required to take an MPhil (Master of Philosophy) course before I began the doctorate. That's pretty standard since I didn't have one yet, and someone else was funding my doctorate application.

If you want more information, shoot me a message and I'll provide proof of this all. I'm not posting it out in public.  
		-- u/kutuup1989, 48514 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: You don't owe a company anything. You're selling your time to them, not visa versa. You don't need an explanation to take a day off. If the company is under scheduled, that's on them. Live your best life.

Edit: Thank you everyone for the awards. I see this post reached some of its targeted audience and brought out the trolls and hatred of others. 

I'd like to give some background before I move on. This post was not intended to be Identical to any others out there. I posted this after having a conversation with one of the people under me who wanted to call in today. Our work is paying for his college, but having him come in to make up hours he misses due to school. He's running behind on homework and wanted a day off to catch back up. I told him I didn't need any explanation. Just don't come in. He has 7 vacation days which can be used as PTO. I as the supervisor and the company do NOT need a reason for his use of PTO/Vacation time.

I'd like to thank those who posted great ideas and stories regarding their past experiences with prior jobs, Either being screwed over or helping those under them realize this as well.

I'll post some of the comments and remarks a bit now, to help stop the identical spam posts.

**-You'll Get Fired-** Is one of the most commented posts on here. Yes, there is always a risk of getting fired, But if a company wants to fire you for using your PTO or Vacation days, then is that really a place you want to stay at? 

**-Only Privileged People can do this-** As seen below in quite a few popular comments, Privileged people get way too many PTO/Vacation days and can bargain for more. Those who are less privileged rarely get time off. Jobs such as retail claim you can schedule unpaid days off, then turn around and deny them, forcing you to use their trash point system, until you're forced to come in every day or get fired. 

**-As a XXX This advice doesn't work for me-**  I understand that some fields, such as Military, Teaching, Railroad, etc, can't take time off due to either contracts or legal reasons. However, this post wasn't fully intended for your positions. There are a lot of young adults out there that work at retail or fast food jobs that are getting screwed over by their management and scheduling teams. I faced the same thing when I started working years ago. This is just personal advice I wish I knew when I was younger.

**-It's Vice Versa, Not Visa Versa-** Alright grammar police, I'm not a robot. I make mistakes just as well as everyone else.
		-- u/coldog22, 55068 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: You know how your house smells totally off and different when you come back from vacation? That’s how every guest smells your home, pay attention to this smell and address it.

Recently came home from a trip to the south west us and visited Mexico for the first time. When I came home I noticed a funky mildew smell had developed in my kitchen and there was actually a very small leak and moldy spot underneath my sink!
		-- u/Savage762, 39081 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: You will be forgotten when you leave. Whether it's a job, a relationship, or even life. People will move on. Accepting this will free your mind and let you discover yourself rather than making you attach your identity to a job, a belief, or a sect.

		-- u/vishipedia, 53970 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: You'll watch an entire Netflix series even when the first episodes are slow just because someone told you "it gets better" - but what if you looked at your goals like that and watched your life get better instead?

I found this [here](https://www.instagram.com/p/CCqpoCSDnHj/). Made a lot sense, so I had to share it here. 

:")
		-- u/vivekta, 48040 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: Your browser's Private mode does NOTHING to protect you from Fingerprinting. Nor does using a VPN, deleting Cookies, or removing Cached files. There is almost nothing you can do, so never assume you have privacy.

In light of the class action lawsuit against Google for continuing to track visitors' private sessions, I went down a rabbit hole to see if it was possible to avoid being "fingerprinted" by websites like Amazon  Google.

Turns out, it's almost impossible. There is literally almost *nothing* you can do to stop these websites from tracking your actions. I can't believe there haven't been MASSIVE class-action lawsuits against these companies before now. The current private-browsing suit doesn't even scratch the surface.

Even when you delete your Cookies, clear your Cache, and use a VPN or a browser like Brave (effectively telling websites you do NOT want to be tracked), these websites will still track  build every action you take into a robust profile about who you are, what you like, and where you go.

This goes deeper than just websites. Your Spotify music history is added into this profile, your Alexa searches, your phone's GPS data, any text you have typed into your phone, and more. Companies like Amazon and Google purchase all of this and build it into your profile.

So when you are 'Fingerprinted' by these websites, it's not just your past website history they are attaching to your session. It's **every single thing about you.**

This should be illegal; consumers should have the right to private sessions, should they chose. During this time of quarantine, there is no alternative option: we are forced to use many of these sites. As such, this corporate behavior is unethical, immoral, and in legal terms, a contract of adhesion as consumers are forced into wildly inappropriate terms that erase their privacy.

**TL;DR LPT**: You are being fingerprinted and tracked by Google, Amazon, every other major website. Not just your website actions, but your Spotify listening history, phone GPS data, Alexa searches, emails, and more are all bought  built into these 'fingerprint' profiles. Private browsing does not stop this. Don't ever assume your browsing habits are private.
		-- u/Rand0mly9, 59114 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Your company didn’t know you existed before you applied and won’t notice you when you’re gone. Take care of yourself.

That’s it.
		-- u/CalJackBuddy, 127197 upvotes, 0.95 ratio.
%
LPT: Your hobbies are your hobbies for a reason, let it be a thing a of comfort, and not a chore or a burden.

		-- u/Im_Casual, 46896 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: Your life doesn’t need to be special to be enjoyable. Having a regular job, food to eat and a roof over your head is more than almost every person who came before you or living now has had/have. Stop comparing yourself to crazy talented lucky people.

My cousin is in her late 20s and going through this thinks she needs to be a (famous) artist because that’s her calling. I tell her you can always be an artist and find a way to earn a living along side. I don’t wake up excited to do my job every day but I get satisfaction out of it because it matches what I am good at and is new and different every day. 

Edit: Thanks for all the love! Also my first awards! If this helped one person understand that they are ok who and where they are in life I will be ecstatic!!

Edit 2: Clarity that she is a great artist just doesn’t have to make it or live some crazy artist lifestyle to be fulfilled. Added Famous in there.
		-- u/Thedaulilamahimself, 54970 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: Your life is a finite resource. Don't gift it to your employer as if it was free.

		-- u/DoctorDoctorDeath, 45109 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: Your mental health is just as, if not more than, important as your physical health. Do not be ashamed or afraid to speak to someone if you’re struggling or in need of help.

We all deal with some sort of mental health issue in our lives - whether long or short term. There should be no shame in seeking help for your mental wellbeing. Please have the courage to talk to a professional if you need help.

ETA: thank you kind internet strangers for the awards, but if you’ve got a few extra bucks please donate it to mental health services in your area!
		-- u/StarQueen37, 45018 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: You’ll never spend as much on a Uber as you will for a DUI

		-- u/xdhailey, 62091 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: a Word or any Office file is a zip in disguise

Just rename your file from .docx to .zip and open it. You will get a  folder of all the stuff inside the doc, like all the images and some crazy xml content. This saves a lot of time. All of the Office files that end  with ‘x’ (.DOCx, .PPTx, .XLSx) are built on an XML foundation and can be opened that way. If you get an older file (.doc) just open in Word and  “save as” a docx file to get an unzippable file.
		-- u/karloproducer, 38435 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: a marriage proposal should NOT come as a big surprise, despite what you may have seen in the movies. The topic of marriage should be thoroughly discussed well before you propose.

Lots of TV and films depict a proposal as this dramatic, surprising moment where someone finally realizes their true feelings. While it may make for good entertainment, in real life your significant other should be well aware of where the relationship is heading.
		-- u/intelligentiam, 100592 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: always assume when you’re put on hold that the other person can still hear you.

I work at a towing company, sometimes when people call in with damage claims complaints etc. we just mute the call and listen for a minute or two, usually someone slips up to a friend what ACTUALLY happened and we just blow them off/ give them the run around from there.
Most calling services listen in while your on hold for training. So mute your side if your going to say something you wouldn’t want the person you trying get a hold of to know.
		-- u/Kadybaby, 52864 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: buy yourself a pack of socks, and put them away. When you are having a bad day, throw a pair on. There are few things nicer than a brand new pair of socks.

		-- u/Laotzudigsby, 51249 upvotes, 0.74 ratio.
%
LPT: don't use your child's embarrassing stories as dinner party talk. They are your child's personal memories and humiliating them for a laugh isn't cool.

I've probably listened to my mum tell one particularly cringe worthy story dozens of times and I think everyone she knows has been told it. Every time she tells it, most of the time in front of me, I just want to crawl under the table and hide. However, that would give her another humiliating story to tell.

Just because you're a parent doesn't mean you have a right to humiliate them for a laugh.

I do think that telling about something cute they once did (pronouncing something wrong, for example) is different to an embarrassing story, but if your child doesn't like you telling about it then you should still find something else to talk about.

Edit: I mean telling stories from any part of your child's life at any part of your child's life. When I say child, I don't mean only someone under 18, I mean the person that is your child.

Edit again: This post blew up, can't believe how big it has gotten. Getting a lot of comments from the children (including adult children) involved but also parents which is awesome.

Im also getting a lot of comments about how this is a self-selecting sample and in the wider world, not as many people would support this. All I have to say is that just because there is another 50,000 people out there (or whatever number) who wouldn't care about this doesn't mean that the 50,000 here matter any less. It's not about proportion, its about that number existing in the first place. How do you know if the person you are talking about isn't one of those 50,000 people?

There is a much, much more constructive way to teach your child to be less sensitive. I laugh with my kid, not at him. We do it when we're on our own or in safe groups. If he tells me something funny he did, I laugh with him and I'll tell him stupid things I do so we can laugh together.

I don't humiliate him with personal and embarrassing stories around Christmas dinner or whatever. It's about building people up, not breaking them down. Embarrassing someone to give them thicker skin is a massive gamble between ended up with someone being able to laugh at themself and someone who is insecure, or at worst fuels the fire of an anxiety disorder. I'm not gambling with my kid.
		-- u/[deleted], 111444 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: don’t let yourself consider a job done until you’ve put away all your tools and/or cleaned up the work area.

		-- u/gimmeslack12, 52801 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: don’t use a condom if the packaging feels flat and not like a little bubble of air. If it’s flat, the condom is compromised.

Edit: get a new condom obviously. Just don’t use that particular one.
		-- u/meltingwaxcandle, 37275 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: even if you aren't concerned about security, always latch/lock your doors anyways. Wind gusts can be really strong, and raccoons have thumbs.

I'm in SE michigan, the weather is unseasonably warm and the evenings have been a wonderful 60°F lately. For me, that means every window in the house open all day and night!

I have a significant distance between me and my neighbors, and a balcony that looks into some woods. The frogs at night and the birds in the morning are wonderful to relax to. However, I underestimated how good raccoons are at climbing.

Despite having no stairs on my balcony, when I went to get water at 2:30 a.m. last night, a raccoon was curiously exploring my balcony. If he wanted to, he could have simply slid open the screen door and gotten into the house. I know I can't stop them from exploring, but those doors will remain latched at night from now on!
		-- u/IAmAPhysicsGuy, 38715 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: family member in a nursing home? Please send full zip sweaters, not quarter zips.

Your loved one is cold, invariably, and they can't control their arms. I have a really hard time dressing the residents when all they have are the quarter zips. I will forever love you if you can send the full zip sweaters so I can grab it and dress your mom or dad in 20 seconds or less. 

I love my job. Get ya sweaters right.

EDIT: YAY my post blew up! Let me add a few things, since a lot of my fellow healthcare workers have chimed in. 

1. CD Players: YES PLEASE. Plus your loved one's favorite CDs. 
2. So many photos. All of them. You can't go overboard. I will sit there and go through every photo with them every day, if you want me to. I really don't mind. 
3. Clothes, one size larger. Please label them. I will do it myself if you can't but don't be upset when/if you see Mom wearing roommate's clothes. Maybe you didn’t send enough, maybe the washer is broken. Maybe you didn’t label correctly. Kindly point it out and someone will explain or rectify the problem. 
4. Food gifts are almost always allowed, just be sure to check with nursing staff first. If your loved one is on a low-sodium diet and you keep bringing them McDonald's, that's a yikes. Also be careful about sharing with other residents. Your loved one's roommate might be on a special diet and you keep giving them french fries and we can't figure out why they're not feeling good. 

Additional points:
OH MY GOD YOU ARE NOT A BAD PERSON FOR PUTTING YOUR LOVED ONE IN A COMMUNITY. CARING FOR SOMEONE WITH DEMENTIA IS A FULL TIME JOB, LITERALLY I HAVE TWO DEGREES TO HELP ME DO IT. IF YOU ARE 90 YEARS OLD AND YOUR SPOUSE HAS AN AGGRESSIVE FORM OF DEMENTIA AND THEY HIT YOU IN THE MIDDLE OF THE NIGHT, WHAT ARE YOU SUPPOSED TO DO? Keep your judgement out of my inbox. I have now worked in a geriatric psychiatric ward too- and these 90 year old women who have literally been assaulted by their once-loving husbands at 2am have to hear your fucking bullshit about how they can’t care for their spouse and what the fuck is wrong with you? Jesus Christ use your brain. Maybe your grandma insists that she needs to get to the bus stop at 4pm, right when you’re getting home from work every day- do you want to quit your job because she can’t stop wandering into the street? Can you afford a loving, caring facility that provides a lock on the door and 3 square meals every day with 24/7 nursing care? THEN BY ALL MEANS, GO TAKE A FUCKING TOUR OF IT AND SEE IF IT’S A GOOD FIT! THERE IS NO ONE-SIZE ALL FIT FOR DEMENTIA CARE. This is a full-family journey and the focus has to be on the DIGNITY, SAFETY, AND EDUCATION of all involved.  

I. Love. My. Job. Mind. Your Business.

EDIT 2: I'm enjoying the hell out of everyone's energy on this post. Keep your questions and DM's coming, it's 1am EST but I'll be up for a bit longer if I can help support you either emotionally or with advice if this journey is relevant to you.

EDIT 3: Big shoutout to the guy who wants to know if I have two degrees in "wiping ass" because this job takes "no brains". Foolish question, everyone knows that WIPASS-201 is only an undergrad course.

In all seriousness- both of my degrees are psychology based but geriatric specific. I am NOT clinical- I am the program director. Basically the cruise ship captain.

EDIT 4: I keep getting this question of what the hell a program director is, so I'll post my response here too:

As the program director, I am in charge of scheduling, coordinating, and facilitating the activities. I either lead the activity or I delegate it to an aide who works in the afternoon. I interact with and update the families as necessary or on a schedule. I come up with creative solutions to behavioral problems and advise/inform staff and management on layouts of how to address concerns resulting from cognitive impairment. I work closely with the nursing staff to coordinate the best care with behavioral interventions paired with the pharmacological interventions. It's a huge team effort. Takes a village.
		-- u/[deleted], 52949 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: find someone's locked phone? Turn it in to their carrier. They will locate the owner by serial number. This LPT makes you a bro and returns the phone the fastest way to its owner who really just wants the photos. (Talking to you who found my phone in White Mountains, California last weekend)

		-- u/driven2it, 77502 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: for those of you going to college for the first time this month: GO TO CLASS! No matter how hungover, tired, or busy you may be, being present is the most important factor in succeeding in your first year as you adjust to living independently. Missing class is a slippery slope to failing out.

		-- u/doctorfeelgood33, 99037 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: iOS has an option to turn off apps asking to rate them

Like me most of you are probably sick of playing a free game then a pop up appears asking to rate the app? Apple have put in an option to turn this off (asking to rate is automatically on by default) so they can’t ask you anymore. To turn this off on iOS 11, go to settings and tap ‘account’ at the top then ‘iTunes and app store’ at the bottom there’s an option to turn off in-app reviews.

Edit: this is still in beta and is a new feature by Apple. Companies had to put in rating notifications for themselves before but Apple are phasing out apps being able to do there own in app review notifications and replacing it with this Apple feature which you can turn off.

My first Gild! Thank you! /u/Jkuz
		-- u/[deleted], 48067 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: if a child is giving you something, take it off them. No matter what it is, children don't have a lot of things and their world is very small, and they are choosing to give you a gift.

It could be the most pointless thing in the world, however that child is giving you something they feel is special.
		-- u/Djblue23, 44305 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: if a friend makes a recommendation, at least check it out. Worst case scenario is it will give you the opportunity to grow closer to them and maybe even understand them a little better. When you ignore recommendations it communicates a lack of investment in the relationship.

		-- u/TheFlightlessPenguin, 61516 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: if a friend or a family member gets diagnosed with dementia or alzheimer, in the early stages try to find out what their favorite songs of all time are. In this way you would be able to create a playlist for them that could be of great benefit in the later stages of the disease.

Music helps dementia patient recall memories and emotions. Especially when specific songs are connected to previous parts of their lives.
		-- u/socratit, 111665 upvotes, 0.96 ratio.
%
LPT: if a loved one is taken in an ambulance, do not follow us to the hospital. Go there on your own time and own route.

As a medic, whenever I was loading a patient in the ambulance, a family member would inevitably run up to me, keys in hand saying “I’ll follow you to the ER”. 

No. 

People in an emotional state following another vehicle will develop tunnel vision and forget all traffic laws. You will blow stop signs. You will follow me right through an intersection even if the light has already turned red for you. And you will slam into the back of the ambulance if we need to make a sudden stop. Remember, the patient faces backwards and can see out the back window as you blow a red light and get t-boned by an overloaded ice cream truck. 

After we leave, wait ten minutes, take a deep breath and slowly make your way to the hospital.
		-- u/thenewyorkgod, 87434 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: if an indoor cat gets outside and lost, put their litter box outside. They can smell it from up to a mile away and find their way home.

		-- u/ShameYourBrains, 40763 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: if someone offers you something you want, take it. Don’t decline every kind offer out of politeness.

Something I’ve had to grow out of that has cost me so many opportunities. Growing up with severe social anxiety I found it so hard to accept things people offered me: drinks at their houses, going on outings with people who I think are inviting me out of kindness, money, job opportunities. There is NO shame in saying yes when someone offers something and usually they’re asking because they WANT to help. Help yourself out, you don’t have to do everything on your own
		-- u/[deleted], 71374 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: if you are donating to a person or family that has fallen on hard times, consider household items instead of food. Lots of people bring meals, but TP, dish soap, paper towels, etc run out quickly and are usually just as appreciated as food.

		-- u/[deleted], 37803 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: if you are going to order flowers for your mother for MOTHER'S DAY (this Sunday), call a local florist, not a national flower service... the national place will just call a local place, charge you more and take a cut of the money.

		-- u/FUNKYDISCO, 48992 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: if you are using curbside grocery pickup, turn off your engine when they are packing your trunk.

Your carhop does not need to be breathing your exhaust fumes.

Edit: while in theory, turning off your engine at any time you are waiting is wise, weather (particularly summer in TX or winter in the north) and wait times make this not always a practical or safe option.
		-- u/busty_chemist, 37118 upvotes, 0.83 ratio.
%
LPT: if you aren't already, start brushing your teeth using both hands. You'll hit different spots and different angles than just brushing your teeth with your dominant hand. You'll also get the added benefit of training your non-dominant hand.

This helped me a while back when I hurt my dominant hand and was unable to brush my teeth. Luckily, I was already comfortable brushing my teeth with my non-dominant hand. I also noticed that my teeth felt cleaner when I brushed with both hands. I realized that I was stuck in a pattern of only brushing a certain way with one hand, and switching it up made me teeth feel cleaner.

Edit: yeah, I realize now I could have worded the title better. I didn't mean to hold the toothbrush with BOTH hands at the same time.
		-- u/flightofthenochords, 45161 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: if you call a suicide hotline and get put on hold, it’s not that we don’t care about you! We also don’t read off of scripts. Other misconceptions below.

I have worked at a suicide hotline for about 2 years now and I have found that there are many misconceptions about suicide and crisis hotline workers and volunteers.  I can’t speak for every organization, but I hope that I can address a few of the general concerns that I see now so that you feel more comfortable calling.

1.  “Why did I get put in a queue? Do they not care that I’m about to kill/hurt myself?”  We absolutely DO CARE! Please, please stay on the line.  At my organization, when you call you first talk to a “crisis screener” who’s job it is to take down whatever information you want to give them and then send you to one of two queues.  One queue is for people actively wanting to commit suicide and the other is for people in general crisis but not suicidal.  This is where some people get stuck on hold for a while because we are actively taking calls from the queue as they come in.  Every night is different and every shift is different. Sometimes I’ll get 3 calls in 4 hours and I can really take my time with each person.  Other times, we have 10 people waiting in the queue but I still want to give each person their respective time to de-escalate.  We can also see if someone has dropped from the queue and it always makes me sad to see that someone hung up.  I want to talk to you. We all want to help.

2. “Workers just talk from a script so there’s no point in calling”.  This is absolutely not true.  When you talk to me, I’m given a blank notepad and that’s it.  Through extensive training, we learn about ways to help you de-escalate your thoughts, open up and feel comfortable, and help you specifically identify what you are feeling in a crisis moment.  Our onboarding teachers really focused on how every caller is different and every situation is case-dependent. I would never boil down your experiences to a script. 

3. “I don’t want to call again tonight because I’ve already called once and I’m going to bother them”.  Please feel comfortable calling as many times as you need if you are in active crisis.  Most likely you won’t even be talking to the same phone worker as everyone goes into the same queue.  I would say about 50% of my calls are people who I regularly hear from every day/week - they say their name or I recognize their voices.  20% are likely callers who have already called once in the night and need to talk again.  This is perfectly fine and I’m happy to explore what worked for you last time you called and what can work again this time.

4. “They’re going to hang up on me”.  We are not allowed to hang up on anyone (and I wouldn’t want to) unless they are being abusive to us or won’t let us speak.  We get a surprising amount of prank calls and people who call just to scream at us.  THAT BEING SAID - I have accidentally hung up on people before.  I feel absolutely horrible when this happens but I hope that everyone knows that they should call back.  If I am actively talking to you or you are telling a story and we get disconnected, know that I didn’t get bored and hang up. Something definitely happened on the worker’s line.

5. “I don’t want to call because they will record what I’m saying and it will be used against me later.”  From my knowledge, most privately and gov owned phone lines do not record phone calls.  Some that I am unaware of may have different standards but at least with the ones I’m aware of in my state and National level, we all make it very clear before your call that we are 100% anonymous.  We don’t record conversations or calls - I don’t even think our phones can do that.  Most times I take notes so that I can remember your name and specific hardships that you mention but we have shredders all around the office to discard those after we hang up.  You are also welcomed to not disclose your name if you have something really personal that you feel scared to let out.  If you are ever unsure about what is being recorded, please ask your phone worker and they will tell you what your organization allows. 

6. “My problems are too big for them to handle”.  We have heard everything, trust me.  Everything from teens wanting to shoot up their schools to people who are having affairs to people calling us so that they can masterbate.  Nothing you say will surprise us or be too much for us to talk you through.  

I’m happy to answer any more questions in the comments if you have additional things that you are curious or unsure about.  I greatly recommend that you print out your local crisis line’s number and hang it on your fridge and enter it to your phone.  You have no idea how many calls we get from children/teens who got our number from their parents/friend’s parents either directly or indirectly.

If you are looking to find a hotline in your country, please refer to this link: https://www.suicidestop.com/call_a_hotline.html.  I recommend if you are in the United States that you look up a free, 24 hour hotline in your city or state (rather than the National hotline) as they will be more likely to have a smaller queue and can also give you strong resources within your zip code or area.  You can save this number for if you are having an emergency.  Never hesitate to call the National hotline either, though which can be found at that link.

Please call us.  We are ready and eager to help.

———————

Edit:  concerning mandated reporting to 911 because many people are asking about it, every organization is different.  For mine, we are mandated reporters in cases where people are in active suicide or planning to hurt someone else.  We don’t call the police but we do call 911 and we have no control over what they decide is best in that situation (whether they should get cops involved or just emergency services.). However people saying that they feel suicidal is far from being in active suicide.  Even people that have access to suicidal methods, like if someone has a gun or pills in their home, we will not call unless they are actively trying to use them to kill themselves.  De-escalation is our main priority.

That being said, if we do need to call the 911, my call center and certain others have no way of knowing where the caller is since we are a 100% anonymous call center.  Some organizations may have trackers or can give your number away but we either have to convince people to call 911 themselves so that their location can be shared or we have to talk it out of them.

For example, I got a call one time from a lady who had just taken a bunch of sleeping pills and just wanted someone talk to while she died.  Through about 20 minutes of conversation I was able to get her to tell me where she was located and so emergency services were sent.  This is pretty rare and it only is required maybe once every couple of months.  Many people are sharing stories of themselves getting hurt by police and thrown into mental wards. I know that this is common and this is why my organization really doesn’t call 911 much.  Again, I cannot control if the 911 operator decides if the police should be involve or not and if this does happen if you get taken to a psych evaluation at a hospital.  My job in that moment is to save your life and remember, it’s not a choice - I’m a mandated reporter to 911 which means I’m required to call.  I try HARD AS HELL to prevent this from happening though but some situations are dire.  I really recommend asking whatever hotline you are calling what their mandated reporting requirements are or looking on their website under terms and conditions where it is laid out in writing.  

Most times if people are in very bad mental crisis that we cannot completely de escalate in a 30 min call, we can offer to send a mobile crisis team to your location. This involves sending two trained mental health professionals to an address that you give us and consent to them coming out to.  This is fairly common and probably happens around once every two hours on the line but it still not the most preferred conclusion.  We work very hard to help you on that phone anonymously and quickly.  I wouldn’t want anyone to be turned away from getting help because they’re scared about what me as a phone worker is going to do.

If you are ever concerned about what is reported, being recorded, etc... please ask your phone worker.  We are legally required to be transparent to you.  Thank you!

———————

Edit #2:  here are some additional answers to questions I’ve been getting in the comments:

1.  “Should I still call the line if I am just depressed and not suicidal?”  There are two different types of lines that I wish were spread around more clearly.  One is a suicide-only hotline.  These workers will only answer and respond to people who are actively suicidal or having suicide ideation right now.  Many of the negative stories in the comments have people saying that they were hung up on because they weren’t “that depressed”.  I can’t diminish your experience and I’m sorry that it happened.  In the future, if you know that you are not actively suicidal but still need someone to call, call a “crisis hotline”.  These are also trained volunteers and workers who deal with general crises.  Things like if you are depressed, having anxiety, want to vent, need to cry, need to get resources for drug addiction or domestic abuse etc... this is the place to call.  It’s also okay if you call the crisis line and later end up talking about suicidal thoughts, it happens more than you know.

2. “How do I get a job as a phone worker or volunteer?”  The way I did it was that I went on my local hotline’s page by searching ones near me on google.  There was a tab that said volunteer and I filled out my email and a small application on there.  Within a week, a supervisor reached out to me and asked me to fill out more information involving sending them my resume, filling out a 4 page document on why I want to work there, and undergoing a background check.  Another week or so later, I got instructions on how to join an orientation where they told me more about the work and we could choose if we were still interested or not.  After a year of being a volunteer, I applied to a bachelors-level paid position at my hotline in which I oversee other volunteers if they have questions or concerns about calls.  My organization has bachelors and masters level positions.  I got my B.S. in physiology.

3. I want to say thank you to everyone who is sharing their bad experiences here as well as their good ones.  It’s important that organizations learn from people’s shitty experiences so that we can all get better as a whole.  I’ve been suicidal and have attempted in my lifetime.  I’ve called a suicide hotline and had a bad experience where I felt like I was wasting their time. I also called a couple times after that and was connected to the best people I have ever had the experience talking to.  They saved my life.  I applied to help because I want to make sure that everyone has a good, or atleast fair, experience when they are speaking to me as a phone worker.  

There are a couple of things that I recommend if you want to get the best chance at having good experience calling a phone line.  For one, I’ve said it before and I’ll say it again, National phones lines have longer queues and they are likely rushed as phone workers.  They’re not a bad resource at all but if you are of sound mind, I recommend searching and saving a smaller hotline’s number around your area that deals with suicide or crisis that way you can have them in your phone when you need them.  Next, if you are concerned about if giving away your information will be tracked or reported... ASK.  Always ask so you never feel like you were duped into having the cops called on you or your address taken.  Ask if your call is recorded, ask if your number is recorded, and ask if you can even remain anonymous.  I don’t care what information you give me about yourself, I care about helping you get through tonight.  Many of this information can be found on your hotline’s website under the terms and conditions. Read through these if you don’t want to ask.

—————-

I have taken a break from this account indefinitely.  I don’t know what some of you want from me. I made an informational post based on MY experiences as a phone line worker and told you all of my knowledge on how to have the best chances at a good experience because often people have bad ones.  I’ve called 911 on probably about 5 people in my whole career because they already took active measures to end their life or were planning on ending someone else’s soon.  They also knew that I was going to call and GAVE ME THEIR INFORMATION AND LOCATION because they realized that they needed in-person and immediate help that we cannot give them.  I didn’t “swat them” or “send police to their door for no reason”.  I understand that this may be a rosey organization that I work at but the advice I gave to ask questions, call smaller hotlines, and read the terms and conditions still stand for any hotline you are calling.  Take a look at their website and understand their protocol. 

People have been messaging me that I should kill myself, that they hope I get cancer, that I’m the reason their father/mother died, I’m the reason they got sent a 20,000 dollar medical bill, I’m the reason they were trapped in a mental health facility for 7 months, I’m the reason they got beaten up by cops, etc... How can you say these things to another human being and then complain about how your own mental health was treated?  I’ve been blamed for the actions of a huge line of decision-making people that I don’t even come in contact with at my job.  I’ve been blamed for the actions of people at other organizations who I will never meet or talk to in my life.  I have a history of depression and suicidal ideation as stated in my post, and frankly, the comments attacking me have brought up a lot of that which is why I need to go.  I’m not upset that people have had bad experiences and are sharing them, that is inevitable and encouraged as I have also had bad experiences and we need to learn from them. I’m upset that people are messaging me really horrific things and attacking me.

I still want people to know that there are good organizations out there filled with people who want to help.  I know the comments here seem overwhelmingly negative but, often people who have had good or life saving experiences will not comment.  Not all hotlines are good but I hope, if you need it, you will still try to find one based on my advice above.  I wish I could bring all of you who have had bad experiences to my line and let you listen to the constant stream of people that we help for 8 hours a day, but I can’t and I realize that asking you to trust me after your personal, horrific experiences is too much to ask.  I hope that you all have found a therapist, psychiatrist, support group, or other healthcare professional or service and are working to heal from your mental health issues.  I’m still doing so myself.
		-- u/wheresyourpickle, 43482 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: if you go clubbing or to concerts a lot buy yourself acoustic earplugs. They don’t muffle the sound, just get rid of the harmful frequencies. Tinnitus is something very easy to get and very hard/impossible to get rid of.

Edit: As professional audiologists in here have pointed out, the earplugs of this type don't remove any harmful frequencies, but reduce the overall noise without affecting the quality of the sound too much. For those wanting to read more:
http://www.earmarkhc.com/sound-and-ears/2016/8/8/how-do-musicians-earplugs-really-work
		-- u/[deleted], 38504 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: if you have a friend who has their own business. Don't expect mates rates or discounts. Instead always be prepared to pay the full amount, a pay full price if they offer a discount. It is their livelyhood and they may feel pressured to do you a deal that will actually leave them out of pocket.

		-- u/Fredmarklar, 39157 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: if you have to put your pet down, stay with them, it will be hard, but they’ve been there for you their whole, don’t let them spend their last minutes looking for you.

		-- u/Shirowoh, 83241 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: if you need somewhere to work/relax with friendly staff, nice AC, plenty of seating, free WiFi, and available all across the US, you’re in luck! There are more public libraries in the US than there are Starbucks or McDonalds! And you’re under no obligation to buy anything to sit there

[16,568 - Public Libraries in the US. There are over 116,000 if you include academic, school, military, government, corporate, etc](http://libguides.ala.org/numberoflibraries)

[14,606 - Starbucks stores in the U.S. in 2018](https://www.statista.com/statistics/218366/number-of-international-and-us-starbucks-stores/)

[13,905 - McDonald's restaurants in the United States in 2018](https://www.statista.com/statistics/256040/mcdonalds-restaurants-in-north-america/)

Edit: This post got more traction than I was expecting. I’d really like to thank all of the librarians/tax-payers out there who got me to where I am. I grew up in a smallish town of 20k and moved to a bigger suburb later. From elementary school through medical school, libraries have helped me each step of the way.

They’ve had dramatic changes over the years. In high school, only the nerdy kids would go to the library (on top of the senior citizens and young families). A decade later, I can see that the the library has become a place to hang out. It’s become a sort of after school day care for high school kids. Many middle/high school kids have LAN parties. Smaller kids meet up together with their parents to read (and sometimes cry). My library has transformed from a quiet work space to more of a community center over the past decade.

Even though I prefer pin-drop silence, I have no issues with these changes. **It’s better that kids have a positive experience in an academically oriented community environment than be out on the streets, getting into trouble, etc. And putting younger children around books is always a great thing.**

Plus, they have a quiet study room for pin-drop silence people like me!
		-- u/z3roTO60, 78832 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: if you need to defrost your windshield, you can do it more quickly by flipping down both of your sun visors.

Flipping down the sun visors will direct the air down and back towards the windshield, circulating it a bit more. This will help the hot air stay by the windshield longer instead of traveling along the ceiling to the back of the car.
		-- u/scarycloud, 37735 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: if you offer someone a drink and they say they don’t drink, unless you’re very close with this person, just let it go. Asking them why they don’t drink could make them uncomfortable, or give them unwanted attention.

People stop drinking for a lot of reasons, but often when asked why they suddenly find themselves being questioned, doubted, and that others around them accuse them of judging their own drinking. 

If you just say “ok” and move on, you could be preventing a potentially awkward or uncomfortable situation.
		-- u/aliengames666, 47833 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT: if you start crying while having an emotional argument or discussion, just keep talking

Crying is not a sign of weakness, it shows that you care a lot about whatever you’re talking about. However, it’s also often distracting to all the parties involved. 

If you stop talking, it draws even more attention to you crying, and the other party may stop your discussion to ask if you’re alright or if you need to stop. If you keep talking and draw as little attention to it as possible, it keeps the conversation going and draws the attention away from you and back to the discussion. Wipe away your tears as you need, and ignore any voice cracks as well. 

Eventually no one will pay attention to you crying and your voice will steady out. You may even stop crying without noticing. Not stopping keeps the conversation moving and draws the attention from you and back to the the discussion.
		-- u/s-quea-k, 42989 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: if you tell someone a secret they are almost definitely going to tell their spouse, even if you promise them to secrecy.

		-- u/MeaningfulPlatitudes, 85661 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: if you want to read a book, or need a book for a class but don’t want to spend a bunch of money, go to archive.org, about 95% of the titles I’ve ever searched are there, in their entirety, for free.

		-- u/Maximum_Pass, 54297 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: if you want to separate some pdf pages without using any new software. you can open the pdf file in chrome then click on print then select custom pages option, and finally choose to save as pdf

		-- u/lashuel, 38540 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're a redditor, for a happier day, follow positive subs like aww, GetMotivated, HumanBeingBros, MadeMeSmile, and unfollow negative subs like PublicFreakout, RelationshipAdvice, JusticeServed, any Karen type of sub, or sub with violent content.

Believe me this is a big change.

Looking at those Karen subs made me concerned about any American White woman I saw on the internet. PublicFreakout is nowadays filled only with violence from the roads. You unfollow them and look the positive subs.

Cops helping a baby who's just about to die, a small kid donating her restaurant food to homeless and her dad being proud of it, people motivating each other to fight depression - these are the things you should have more in your life.

PS - You can still be active about protests like BLM without following PublicFreakout. Just read the newspapers. Or maybe one video once in a while to be aware.

Bonus tip: Unfollow people who always spew hate on Twitter. Follow what people who are artists or experts in the field you like. I unfollowed political activists and followed tech experts. I can happily look at my Twitter feed now.

If you want good subs
To actually laugh out loud - 

r/funny

r/memes

r/jokes

r/dankmemes

r/cursedcomments - Funniest comments on the internet

r/madlads - People doing the craziest things

r/AccidentalComedy

To motivate yourself or uplift yourself or renew your faith in humanity -

r/MadeMeSmile - The best one if you ask me

r/MadeMeCry

r/wholesomememes

r/HumansBeingBros - You see the most generous people here

r/UpliftingNews

r/ContagiousLaughter

r/happycrowds

r/Positive_News

To watch something adorable and go aww..

r/aww

r/Eyebleach

r/AnimalsBeingBros

r/AnimalsBeingDerps

r/rarepuppers

r/Zoomies

And then there's all kinds of cute animal subs (even rats and snakes). Just search for the animal you like.

Edit: Two awards. Damn! Thank you people. I guess spreading happiness gives you happiness.
Edit 2: Removed GetMotivated. It never helped me but I thought it helped others. But a lot of backlash here.
		-- u/AssortedCrap, 38667 upvotes, 0.74 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're ever not sure what to do, clean. When you figure it what you should be doing, you'll have a clear work space.

		-- u/harleyquinzilla, 64217 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're in a bad mood or something has annoyed you, be as kind as you can to the next 3 people you encounter. By not reacting to the bad mood, as well as helping others, you'll feel miles better.

Edit: I've ALWAYS wanted to say this, but RIP inbox. Love you guys 
		-- u/usernameslreadytaken, 42480 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're in a hurry and something goes wrong (e.g. can't find your keys) resist the urge to get angry and focus on clearly thinking. It's practice for real crisis

This is something I learned I think because I despised acting like my father in a crisis.  He blows his top and is more a problem and then can't fix simple things in front of him.  When I am late and can't find my keys I want to get angry but I resist the urge and concentrate on thinking clearly to figure out where they must be.  If you make a habit of this, you'll deal better with unexpected things in life and if a real crisis occurs you'll be set up to think clearly and react productively.
		-- u/madmaxextra, 41875 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're looking for a job, mention it to everybody that you come in contact with. You never know whose sister's neighbor's uncle is hiring.

I was trying to make a career change in my mid-20s and was having problems getting my foot in the door. I visited a loan officer at my credit union in the middle of my job hunt and mentioned it to her. her eyes lit up and said that the person that she had just had a meeting with worked in HR at this kind of company that I was looking to get into. She said that she could pass on my information if that was okay with me. She did and within 24 hours this person contacted me and I had an interview at his company and was hired the next week. If I had never mentioned it to this loan officer, I wouldn't have gotten my foot in the door when I did.
		-- u/pouncebounce14, 78443 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're taking care of children, always make bed time special and safe, always

Doesn't matter what happened that day or who you/they are, treat bed time like a separate universe where nothing even remotely bad or negative exists or happened, especially if you're not the best with kids. Dump everything you have into bed time, stories, I love yous, tuck ins, everything and don't let any negativity from you, them, videogames, or anything slip in. Bed time is unique as it's their reset button for the next day and is huge in their development as it's the precursor for sleep which is vital emotionally, physically, mentally, spiritually, everything. It's their only true alone time even if they don't remember the dreams. If you can only be nice at one point in the day for some reason, make it bed time.

Edit1: Woow holy moly thanks everyone, warms my heart reading the stories and hearing the gratitude. Glad it's helping some people! Love you all, everyone gove yourself a hug for me please. :) &lt;3

Edit2: Also thankyou very much for the awards! They're the first ones I've ever gotten c':

Edit3: I love you all, sorry I can't reply to every comment haha but I'm getting to what I can. Thankyou all again for sharing your stories and everything! &lt;3
		-- u/Phishylicious, 52143 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: if you're unable to fall asleep at night instead of closing your eyes do the opposite. Keep your eyes wide open. You'll feel drowsy and will automatically close your eyes. If your mind starts racing again open your eyes again. Keep repeating this process and you'll fall asleep quickly.

I sometimes have trouble falling asleep and this works like a charm everytime.
		-- u/Anci3ntMarin3r, 69870 upvotes, 0.87 ratio.
%
LPT: if your landlord claims your entire deposit, ask to see receipts. They legally have to provide them

Recently had a situation where a landlord claimed my entire deposit. I asked for receipts, and lo and behold I have $800 coming my way

I’ll add this is info from the state of California, so double check on your state laws.
		-- u/CharlieTrees916, 38894 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: if you’re stuck on an annoying call, put your phone on airplane mode instead of just hanging up. The other person will see “call failed” instead of “call ended”.

		-- u/fifa_god_786, 93889 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: if you’re traveling use the big chain truck stops, loves/pilot/flying j/TA

I’m a trucker and I’ve come to know these spots really well.before I was a trucker I knew they existed BARELY.but I had no idea how great they are. These big truck stops are always well lit at night. The restrooms are always very clean.they still have the normal snacks gas stations have and they even have some better choices like fruit cups and small salads. There’s also different fast food places attached if you’re more into that. Hell they even have clean hot showers if you’re in need of one for like 12$. Good luck out there and be safe!
		-- u/Archyyx, 40766 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: in a job interview when they ask if you want anything to drink, ask for a glass of water and nothing else!

They will most likely ask if you want tea or coffee, which you absolutely don't and here is why: Tea or coffee leads down a rabbit hole of sub questions to what kind of tea or coffee, with or without milk, sugar or sweetener and possibly with people having to run down to the kitchen for your order. It creates an akward pause at a time when you really just want to get on with the show and will ultimately end up with you getting a piping hot beverage which you have no chance of finishing during a 20 minute interview, where you do most of the talking. So what happens instead is that you burn your hands and mouth and leave most of the cup behind for them to clean up after you leave.

Water is a different story however! you \*do\* want to get a glas (or bottle) of water as it will generally be much faster for them to handle (it will most likely already be in the room) and it has a few practical uses during a job interview: water will refresh you, immediately clear up a dry mouth and give you a natural excuse to take a sip and win a few extra seconds to think about a difficult question.

You came here for a job, not a free dink. Drink your damn coffee on your own terms!
		-- u/J0shua1985, 37764 upvotes, 0.68 ratio.
%
LPT: in college it is much better to be friends with the people who have the party house than it is to live at the party house.

		-- u/BobCarsonF, 56347 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: in college it is much better to be friends with the people who have the party house than it is to live at the party house.

		-- u/fredsterchester, 107351 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: installing a lift-kit? For the love of god, adjust the headlights. Your lifted truck no longer has low-beams; it’s now either high beams or higher beams and you are blinding everyone.

		-- u/muffin_fiend, 100089 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: interview starts immediately

Today, a candidate blew his interview in the first 5 minutes after he entered the building. He was dismissive to the receptionist. She greeted him and he barely made eye contact. She tried to engage him in conversation. Again, no eye contact, no interest in speaking with her. What the candidate did not realize was that the "receptionist" was actually the hiring manager. 

She called him back to the conference room and explained how *every* single person on our team is valuable and worthy of respect. Due to his interaction with the "receptionist," the hiring manager did not feel he was a good fit. Thank you for your time but the interview is over. 

Be nice to *everyone* in the building.

Edited to add: it wasn't just lack of eye contact. He was openly rude and treated her like she was beneath him. When he thought he was talking to the decision maker, personality totally changed. Suddenly he was friendly, open, relaxed. So I don't think this was a case of social anxiety. 

The position is a client facing position where being warm, approachable, outgoing is critical.
		-- u/sawta2112, 45737 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: it's getting cold outside. Throw an extra blanket in your car, a spare hat and gloves, a shovel, and some cat litter. These items can quite literally save your life in the winter.

		-- u/catdad2019, 47091 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: just because you’re related to someone, doesn’t mean you have to love, or even like them. If someone doesn’t respect you, don’t be fooled into respecting them because they’re a relative.

Edit: really wild how much this has blown up, thanks to everyone for the gifts. Some of the comments have been really validating and allow me to feel a little less alone in my opinions that made me post this to begin with. Hope everyone gets through it &lt;3
		-- u/skepticallincoln, 42126 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: keep your mouth shut, and don't volunteer information

I had a phone interview scheduled this morning, but accidentally slept through it. When I got up and saw that I missed it, I had the desperate urge to call and offer up excuses, in the hope that maybe, just maybe, they'd be understanding and give me another chance. 

Instead, all I did was apologize and ask if we could reschedule. That's it, one sentence, no additional information, no explanation or excuse as to why I missed the first interview. 

They replied within 20 minutes, apologizing to ME, saying it was probably their fault, that they'd been having trouble with their computer system for days, and of course I could reschedule, was I available that afternoon?

Don't ever volunteer information, kids. You never know what information the other party has, and you can always give information if asked for it later.

Edit: I still get notifications when people comment.
Keep them coming, I'm glad I've helped you out :)
		-- u/w2555, 188230 upvotes, 0.97 ratio.
%
LPT: microwaving leftovers or a frozen meal? Turn the power DOWN and the timer UP. 10mins at half power does a better job than 3 minutes on full throttle. Food comes out looking like food!!!

Seriously, microwaves only do a shit job if you're impatient. Dial the power back, cook it for longer, and go choose your show on Netflix or whatevs while it cooks - you know you're just gonna let it go cold while you choose a show anyway, so get on top of your shit, flip it and reverse it, choose the show first and enjoy your hot leftovers rather than choking down a cold soggy mess.

For example: a lean cuisine green curry  rice says on the box "COOK ON HIGH FOR 3 MINUTES LET STAND AND SERVE" - but it only says that because they know you're an impatient little shit and won't buy the box that says "COOK ON 1/4 POWER FOR 12 MINUTES" because if you're not going to cook your own calorie controlled curry, you're also not going to stand around waiting *TWELVE WHOLE MINUTES* for this one when the *other* brand says it's done in three.

EDIT BECAUSE YOU PEOPLE NEVER STOP POSTING THE SAME 'SUCH TIME YUCK MICROWAVE 20 MINS IN OVEN INSTEAD AM SMART' COMMENT A MILLION TIMES OVER:

I'm a chef. You all have high hopes for how quickly your oven pre heats, and how easily you can remove a frozen meal from plastic Tupperware to change into an oven safe dish. You all also seem to be the type of person who would blast their shit in the microwave anyway, because s frozen curry being cooked through in the oven in 20 mins from turning the oven on would mean using a blast furnace. Also, did the title say "if you're choosing how to reheat something...?" No. It doesn't. Because I'm SPECIFICALLY addressing **Microwave** usage, so outta here with your faux superiority, go make your own thread about ovens and toaster ovens and airfryers. Not everyone has those things - dorm students may have a cooktop and convection microwave. I certainly don't have space for a toaster oven to sit around on my bench like a jerk all day (that's what the microwave is for). 

Also for those asking about fries: skip the microwave and go straight to the sandwich press. You're welcome. 
		-- u/[deleted], 38829 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: millennials, when you’re explaining how broke you are to your parents/grandparents, use an inflation calculator. Ask them what year they started working, and then tell them what you make in dollars from back then. It will help them put your situation in perspective.

Edit: whoo, front page! 

Lots of people seem offended at, “explain how broke you are.” That was meant to be a little tongue in cheek, guys. The LPT is for talking about money if someone says, “yeah well I only made $10/hour in the 60s,” or something similar.   it’s just an idea about how to get everyone on the same page.

Edit2: there’s lots of reasons to discuss money with family. It’s not always to beg for money, or to  get into a fight about who had it worse. I have candid conversation about money with my family, and I respect their wisdom and advice. 
		-- u/campacavallo, 57184 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
LPT: most men today are STARVED of emotional support. If you show them a bit of empathy and treat them like humans, they will return it 10 folds.

Life experience from a gay guy, I don’t like to play an identity card but I feel that it’s relevant to the topic.

Most of my friends who are straight men are absolutely starved of affection, respect and emotional support, you can’t even imagine how dire the situation is.

And I know this because a lot of these guys consider me a close friend that they’ll share problems they wouldn’t even do with their SO. 

All I do is show them the most basic form of empathy and support - I tell them they look good often. (Because hell, they are! All types of men are fucking beautiful in my gay eyes.) I listen to their problems, try to come up with solutions and I don’t judge or tell them they’re less of a man because they can’t solve it themselves. I’m not worried of crossing some imaginary boundary of ‘that’s gay’ because I already am. 

It’s really obvious to me - no matter how old these men are, they’re never too mature of a man to ask someone else for help. They might think they do, but I’m here to tell them that it’s ok to feel sad or vulnerable or frustrated with not living up to the standard of what a real man is. 

And the result of all of that is these men reward me with their trust and friendship, and as corny as this might sound, there really is a sense of accomplishment when you uplift someone’s spirit, at least that’s how I feel.

Treat your fellow men better, because you deserve it, and they do too.
		-- u/Kiraxairius, 43248 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: much like a gun is always loaded, a microphone during a work Zoom is always unmuted

Inspired by this thread https://www.reddit.com/r/AskUK/comments/o6w2d7/my_microphone_was_accidentally_on_and_i_called_my/?utm_source=shareutm_medium=ios_apputm_name=iossmf
		-- u/Caraphox, 51014 upvotes, 0.93 ratio.
%
LPT: never go into anything without knowing how you will get out

This is my NUMBER 1 rule for my kids. At its most basic, it means don't close any door you don't know how to open (unless a trusted grownup says it's ok) and don't climb inside anything that you aren't 100% sure you will be able to get out of from the inside (eg fridges, wardrobes etc). Know where your emergency exit is and how to use it. My kids learned how to open and unlock a car door as soon as they were old enough to understand they should only do that when the engine is off.

As they get older - I will teach them that this extends much wider than just locations and physical objects. It extends to religions (any religion you can join but not physically leave safely is a cult), relationships (my kids know - you always need a bank account in YOUR NAME ONLY with enough money to live on for at least a month; possessive relationships are a HUGE red flag; you NEVER stay in a relationship where someone even loosely implies they will kill you or themselves if you leave - having the conversation early in the relationship about how, if it doesn't work out, you will respectfully go your separate ways is really important), jobs (never sign a contract with a non-compete clause that would ruin you or prevent you from earning a living wage), etc.

The only thing in your life that (I would argue) shouldn't have an emergency exit is your relationship with your kids. As they grow, they obviously need to become independent, and Once they reach adulthood, they need to be able to pull away from you entirely if they choose to - but you need to be there as a safe and stable base for them if you possibly can be.

Edit: RIP my inbox! Thanks everyone who posted and replied and awarded - I'm so glad my words could help.
		-- u/sweet_chick283, 38587 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: pack your toiletry bag the night prior to traveling and only use that travel bag when getting ready the morning that begins your travels. This way, you will identify anything you may not have packed the night before and will have time to add it to your toiletry bag before setting off.

		-- u/mbaradi, 46052 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: parents of teens, give your child an innocuous sounding phrase to text you as a code for “get me out of here” when they want to avoid peer pressure but not look like they are bailing/lame

For example, ours involves our son texting asking if our dog is okay. Then we can come get him and tell him he *needs* to get home. Parents look lame, not the kid.

Edit: whoa, thanks for all the coins and constructive comments and everything!! Never slept through a FP post before!

Couple of generic replies to the more common replies:

- to “why do you need a coded text, nobody else will see it?” - have you never ever had someone looking over your shoulder before? Or you hand your phone to someone for a different use and a text comes in? Etc 

- to “don’t teach your kids to be lame, they should stand up to peer pressure” - yes, they should, and that is in fact how we roll. And sometimes it’s really goddamn hard and if they need a backup, they have one.  And considering how tough teenage life is these days, I don’t exactly think it’s teaching them anything other than “I have a parent who cares about my being and might just understand what I have to go through”...
		-- u/dart_catcher, 60332 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: put your mushrooms in the sun before you cook them. They naturally produce vitamin D when exposed to UV light.

		-- u/genescheesesthatplz, 46718 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: replace the "en." on Wikipedia with "simple." to get a far less complicated version of the article like it was written for five-year-olds

Example: [https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantum\_mechanics](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantum_mechanics) is super complicated. [https://simple.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantum\_mechanics](https://simple.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantum_mechanics) is way easier to understand

This really helps when you want to understand complex subjects without slogging through pages of details that you don't want. It's like ELI5 but for Wikipedia. It doesn't work on every article but the vast majority have a simple English version.

EDIT: Thanks for the gold but use that money to support Wikipedia instead of me!

EDIT 2: ...HOLY CRAP! Hi r/all! I'm honored and I'll be reading literally every last one of your comments.
		-- u/30phil1, 61683 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: take photos of your parents doing things they do every day. When you get older, they will bring back memories more than any posed pic ever could.

Source:  me, a 50 year old man who can still see his father sitting on the couch, reading the evening paper and drinking a Falstaff after work.  Rest in peace, dad.
		-- u/neetoday, 57454 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: tell your family, if you die, to let your pet see your dead body

If I die while I have a pet, let my animal see my dead body. Let them see my dead body please. They understand death and seeing me dead will allow them to mourn but if I just never show up one day they’ll think I abandoned them

Let my animal see my dead body.
		-- u/Anon293357, 47845 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: to Ukrainian from a syrian refugee

If you find yourself forced to leaving your home, don't forget to take your photo albums with you.
It sounds silly and not important. but if you can't go back home again. You memories and photos will make it easier for you sometimes.

You can always get a new passport/ID.

LPT2: scan all your photos and keep a digital copy as well.
		-- u/tarek437248, 38760 upvotes, 0.94 ratio.
%
LPT: to quickly convert between kilometers and miles, use the clock as a reference

For example: 25% is a quarter. A quarter of an hour is 15 minutes. 15 miles is roughly 25 kilometers.

30 mi = 50 km

45 mi = 75 km

60 mi = 100 km
		-- u/LoopyPro, 38236 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: unfollowing celebrities, companies, and people you don't actually know will do wonders for your mental health. no, you will not miss anything. if it's something so important that you should know then it will find its way to you.

i did this some time last year and ever since i've been feeling much better about myself. my confidence has improved and the best part is that on my feed and timeline i see people i actually know! it turned social media back into what it was meant to be; a way to connect with friends and family. it can still be that, you just have to make it be that way.
		-- u/sparx7th, 44125 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: wear a helmet. I know many kids and adults think they’re stupid. Be really smart and look stupid in helmets. Brain damage is no joke.

My son hit his head almost 8 weeks ago. He had a concussion, broken skull, and brain bleed. He’s now admitted to an inpatient psychiatric facility for suicidal tendencies. He’s 12. You don’t want to go through this.

Edit: I can’t thank you all enough for sending so many kinds words our way. He is getting the best care we could find, and is expected to recover. We are proud of him for being open to help. But please, protect your brain.

Edit 2: I’m sorry I can’t answer all the questions directly. He fell off a golf cart actually. One wouldn’t think he would need one on it, but I’ve learned when in doubt wear one. He was mentally stable before the accident. And we have no idea how he is doing. We can’t even visit him in the hospital due to Covid. Please protect those you love.

Edit 3, a month later: For those who may still see this and are curious, he is doing marvelous now. He still has a road to recovery, but my son is himself again.
		-- u/Rekrabsrm, 90054 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: wear earplugs to loud concert venues. Tinnitus is real and not fun.

You can still hear the music just fine. After many years of loud shows, I’ve got tinnitus pretty bad. Hearing loss is no joke. Lots of people wear them at shows, and don’t worry about someone judging you. Stay healthy!
		-- u/flux_capacitor3, 65331 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: went on a bad date? Just be honest and say you are not feeling the spark. No need to ghost. Take responsibility for your own feelings, while helping the other party to not worry.

		-- u/jjqueens, 61516 upvotes, 0.7 ratio.
%
LPT: when making nachos, put a tortilla underneath your chips to turn leftover toppings into a taco.

		-- u/CommanderNightHawk, 47000 upvotes, 0.75 ratio.
%
LPT: when making nachos, put a tortilla underneath your chips to turn leftover toppings into a taco.

Also helps with cleanup (no cheese stuck to plate).

Edit: RIP Inbox!  Glad so many of you enjoyed my LPT!  And thank you for the golds, kind strangers--may you always pick the nacho stuck to other nachos (after all, it's still one nacho).

		-- u/notdanb, 45857 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
LPT: when one of your employees does something very well, email them explaining what they did and what positive impact it had, and cc your boss. This will build their reputation and also your own.

Your boss likely doesn’t know them as well as you do; this allows them to get kudos from higher up. 

Explaining the positive impact of your employee’s actions allows your boss to understand more of what your team does. It also forces you to think about the positive impact in a way you may not have. 

And this process makes it easier for you to recommend your people for raises/promotions/other recognition because you’ve already helped build/spread a positive reputation for them. 

Then save the email (and your boss’s response, if they respond) in your employee’s personnel file to refer back to when you’re writing their annual performance review or award!

Edited to add: Do this for things they do that are exceptional - not ‘thanks for how you always show up for work on time’ but ‘thanks for saving that valuable client who was about to leave but you discovered how to resolve their really complex issue/working with another division to share your expertise to help them build their new process that will help the company reach x more people/that great interview that the governor personally commented on, it made us look really good”

Also, know your people. If they are embarrassed by direct praise, then just praise them behind their back to others. If they prefer quiet recognition or a cash/time off reward, do that.

And if they do always show up to work on time, and that’s notable, mention it to them. Don’t cc others or exaggerate how big a deal it is; on the other hand just because it’s their job doesn’t mean they don’t deserve to be recognized for it. “Hey, just want to say I noticed you’re always extremely punctual; may not seem like a big deal to you but it says a lot to me about how you respect other people’s time. Thanks”
		-- u/Cleverusername531, 46233 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPT: when someone asks you what you want to do, if you don't care then say "doesn't matter to me I'm just here to hang out with you" instead of "I don't care"

There's a huge difference between the disinterest of "I dont care" and expressing to someone that as long as they're a part of it, you're down for anything
		-- u/moseph999, 84041 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT: when training someone new, do not assume they know things. Go over everything unless they tell you specifically that they already know it.

		-- u/eldridge2e, 37782 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
LPT: when walking your dogs, make them sit and wait before crossing streets. This will make them hesitate about running into roads if they ever get loose.

This was taught to us long ago and we've implemented with all of our dogs since. Recently one got out of the side fence and we saw her run to the street, stop, look around, then run back. It's not foolproof but it is good instilled behavior in case of an unfortunate incident. 
		-- u/MaxwellVador, 39536 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
LPT: when you arrive late for an important event no one wants to hear why in that moment, just apologize, do not give your excuse, no matter how 'good' it is.

If someone asks later or you are in conversation with individuals - that's the time to give your reason.
		-- u/Rhyndzu, 49742 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
LPT: when your ISP raises your bill, call in and say “cancel service” to the automated operator. You’ll be sent to their retention team with no waiting on hold. They will usually take $10-20 off your monthly bill for a year. I do this once a year.

		-- u/flux_capacitor3, 56925 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: when your child tells you anything about a friend of opposite sex don't make jokes about them beeing together

When i was young my parents used to make a lot of jokes regarding my friend (which eventually led me to stop meeting with her not to give my parents an opportunity to joke about) . It made me really insecure about talking with them about girls. Even when i was already an adult there was a period when i didn't feel safe to talk with them about my relationships. When your child tells you about some friend of opposite sex don't assume anything. I hope my parents wanted to talk about my relationships as I was young instead of assuming and forcing jokes about it (Even on family gatherings, which was the worst).
		-- u/Strike2311, 61044 upvotes, 0.86 ratio.
%
LPT: when you’re in a financial pinch or saving money, Instead of eating Ramen, eat Potatoes. Potatoes are cheaper, have more nutritional value, and will keep you full longer.

It’s a common saying that someone “lives off ramen” when they are broke, and most of us have been there. But instead, try potatoes. They are more nutritious, aren’t filled with preservatives and sodium, and will keep you full longer. Also they are an excellent source of potassium. And cheaper.
		-- u/tandyman234, 58225 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: while driving, if you decelerate instead of tapping the breaks when trying to slow down, you'll not only save on gas usage, but reduce traffic.

This is a personal pet peeve of mine.
		-- u/remindmein, 37915 upvotes, 0.84 ratio.
%
LPT: ‘Work friends’ are colleagues first and friends second. Never forget that. Be careful about gossip and how much you share.

		-- u/BowTrek, 63355 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
LPT: “e.g.” and “i.e.” are not interchangeable. e.g. means “for example,” while i.e. means “in other words.”

		-- u/youcaneatmypudding, 66899 upvotes, 0.85 ratio.
%
LPT:If you work in a place that loses pens constantly, you can order a box of thousands on Ebay for pennies each if you look for misprinted advertising pens.

		-- u/joseycuervo, 39503 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
LPT:Learn how to convince people by asking questions, not by contradicting or arguing with what they say. You will have much more success and seem much more pleasant.

		-- u/orientsoul, 47434 upvotes, 0.92 ratio.
%
LPTs: Chrome extensions I wish I knew of back when I started college.

As I am about to enter my grad school I have been looking for ways to enhance my productivity to make my experience go by easier. As a result, I recently started exploring Chrome extensions, and man I wish I had done this earlier. Some will no longer be of use to me but I hope it can help others. 

[**Cite This For Me: Web Citer**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/cite-this-for-me-web-cite/nnnmhgkokpalnmbeighfomegjfkklkle?hl=en)
This one hurts me a bit as my days with MLA, APA, Harvard, and Chicago are coming to an end. The extension adds a button to the top of your browser that you simply click, and it will automatically site whatever website or article you are on. From my experimentation with it, it seems to work just as well as EasyBib or any of those other sites and it is much faster to go through.

[**Google Dictionary**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/google-dictionary-by-goog/mgijmajocgfcbeboacabfgobmjgjcoja?hl=en)
If you get this extension, you will have no excuse to not know a word that is on a article or text book (online). It's very simple, double-click or highlight over a word you don't know and it will define it for you. I imagine any science or legal majors will love this one in particular. 

[**Grammarly for Chrome**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/grammarly-for-chrome/kbfnbcaeplbcioakkpcpgfkobkghlhen?hl=en)
I often use bad grammar and I know it. This extension gives me shit for it all the time, but it helps. It highlights grammatical or spelling errors for you anywhere and allows you to quickly correct it. 

[**Readability**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/readability/oknpjjbmpnndlpmnhmekjpocelpnlfdi?hl=en)
This extension simply aims to trim the fat off of articles to provide you with the main point. I would not trust it for anything in depth, but if you are running low on time and need to skim an article I'd give this a shot. 

[**SpeakIt!**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/speakit/pgeolalilifpodheeocdmbhehgnkkbak?hl=en-US)

I know I can't be the only lazy shit who sometimes does not want to actually use my eyes to read text books or articles. This app lets you highlight over text, you click a button, and a pleasant voice reads it to you as you browse reddit. Or I guess you could take notes as you listen too...

It works in several different languages and accents (if you somehow understand German-English accents over the default one). You can also control the speed that it talks to you in words per minute. I could see myself playing it out loud randomly just to try and feed the information into my brain, but I would still recommend reading like a normal person every once in a while too. 

[**Block  Focus**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/block-focus/dcpbedhdekgkhigjgmlcbmcjoeaebbfm?hl=en)

Type in the websites that distract you *cough* and let this thing keep you away. Manage your workflow and control when you take breaks and when you work. There are others like this one and they are all probably worth a shot. 

[**MolView**](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/molview/nogcacamdkipgkfpfiakaoamdnihinnm?hl=en)

I haven't tested this one out but it looks amazing for those who are in O-Chem or higher. It allows you to draw up molecules and look at them 3 dimensionally. I was one of those losers that bought an actual molecule set for $40 to understand what I'm looking at, so this might save you money if you have trouble visualizing molecules.

**Bonus Tips That I Learned**

***Make a folder on your bookmark tab, and slide all of your nonproductive websites in there.*** Leave a bookmark for any of your online school based websites. It will be hard but it has helped me stay away from time wasting sites.

***Use [sleepyti.me](http://sleepyti.me/) for your late night studies or binges.*** It's a simple interface that aims to synch you up with your rem cycles for the best sleep possible. I cannot say it works every time, but this site has saved me some cranky days as I stayed up too late studying. 

***Use [RainyMood](https://rainymood.com/) to destress yourself.*** I'm sure many of you know about it but I love this one.

I'm sure I have missed a lot of good extensions and tips. Feel free to tell me any I should try out! 

**Use [f.lux](https://justgetflux.com/) to dim your PC screen to prevent eye strain and help you fall asleep** -Credit to KreekyBonez for that one!

Good luck in your studies my friends!
_________________________________________________________________________
EDIT: Cleaned up the post and added the links to the extensions. Also added Flu.x per KreekyBonez as it is one I think people should be aware of. 
_________________________________________________________________________
EDIT: Thanks for the love guys, this blew up way more than I expected! Glad to help. Wanted to mention a few things after reading through many of your comments.

I hope that most of you know to still be careful with your grammar and citations. It isn't really that different from the autocorrect for word and easy bib. **Always double check your writing if it is an important paper, especially with citations**. But if you're like me you can use it for the basics and check over the formatting after the fact. Just wanted to throw that out there as many Redditors have been commenting on those two extensions. Otherwise thanks for all the suggestions and upvotes of course!

		-- u/onqqq2, 44187 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
%
Lpt: Don't take unsolicited advice personally. Most of the time the person giving the advice is giving advice they wish they had, not advice they think you need.

		-- u/homelessdreamer, 45229 upvotes, 0.9 ratio.
%
Lpt: To all young teenagers looking for their first job, do not have your parents speak or apply for you. There's a certain respect seeing a kid get a job for themselves.

We want to know that YOU want the job, not just your parents.
		-- u/icecreamdude97, 73963 upvotes, 0.82 ratio.
%
Lpt: don't buy TV's or computers on black friday. Most TV doorbusters are made special and lack some features as the "real TV" including fewer HDMI ports and refresh rates. Computers are also usually spec'ed down and will be obsolete within a year. Best time for computers is back to school sales.

		-- u/gingernuts13, 42302 upvotes, 0.88 ratio.
%
Reddit is killing third-party applications (and itself). Read more in the comments.

		-- u/killHACKS, 40404 upvotes, 0.79 ratio.
%
Reddit is killing third-party applications (and itself). Read more in the comments.

		-- u/killHACKS, 46750 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
Reddit is killing third-party applications (and itself). Read more in the comments.

		-- u/killHACKS, 61059 upvotes, 0.77 ratio.
%
We call upon Reddit to take action against the rampant Coronavirus misinformation on their website.

		-- u/PhlogistonAster, 58421 upvotes, 0.67 ratio.
%
[LPT] If you suffer from anxiety or an uncomfortable feeling of butterflies in your stomach, simply wash your face with cool water. An effect called the "diving reflex" will instantly lower your heart-rate substantially, helping you calm down.

Edit: For the best effects, you should fully submerge your face in ice cold water for about 40 seconds - 1 minute (obviously don't drown yourself or push yourself too much, do whatever time is comfortable for you), although in my experience even splashing your face with ice cold water has managed to disrupt feelings of anxiety for me.
		-- u/TimothyGonzalez, 39547 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
[LPT] Use cold water to clean semen off of you or your clothes. Heat coagulates semen, making it much harder to wash off.

Hi!

That's it. Nothing more to add.

You're welcome.
		-- u/In_shpurrs, 54887 upvotes, 0.89 ratio.
%
[LPT] You Don't Hate Vegetables -- You Hate the way your Parents (Over)Cooked Vegetables

A lot of people don't know how to cook or season vegetables apart from steaming them, maybe with a little salt or butter/oil. Steaming is easy to overdo, and works best with very fresh seasonal veggies - anything that is frozen, canned, or even just spent more than a few days on the shelf will most likely wind up mushy and unappealing. Learn how to grill, roast, or even fry different vegetables, try out different seasonings or sauces, and be amazed at the horizons of deliciousness ten-year-old you never knew existed.

EDIT: Apparently this is a sore subject with some people! You \*PROBABLY\* don't hate vegetables, but individual tastes and physiologies differ of course. No one should ever be harassed over allergy or sensory processing issues. The point is to learn to cook things different ways before you write them off. Sorry that people have given you a hard time about this, but if your reply begins with "my mom/dad/wife/etc does know how to cook" and not "I know how to cook" then the source of the issue is pretty clear.

EDIT 2: Holy crap, that's a lot of awards. Thank you all, and I discovered the real LPT, which is that people with food limitations know exactly what does and doesn't work for them and often share lovely tips for alternative ingredients and techniques, while picky eaters tell you to f--- off. 
		-- u/Calliophage, 54593 upvotes, 0.81 ratio.
%
lpt use a fake employee to handle solicitors

The company that I work for has a manager, her name is Alicia and she doesn't exist.

Alicia handles EVERYTHING. 

She is accounts receivable, she is the owner of the company, she is the operations manager, warehouse manager, fleet manager, parts department. There is nothing Alicia can't handle. 

She has her own direct line and email address. 

Whenever an obvious solicitor that we have no business with calls, we transfer them to her voicemail (she's very busy and often out of town) and give them her email address. 

She is our most valuable nonexistent employee. Everyone needs an Alicia. 

I especially love when solicitors call a week or so after being given her contact information and lead with "I spoke with Alicia just the other day, wanted to follow up". Oh you did? Wow. Crazy.

Edit- it's important to note, someone at our company is responsible for monitoring her emails and voicemails to make sure that nothing actually important is missed
		-- u/needverbs, 40388 upvotes, 0.91 ratio.
